/*
This is an open resume and research file to be completed by trusted affiliates only the 44th President of the United States Barack Obama has noted. 
It can then be sent, printed out, saved & finished with the Daemon, the most trusted law body known to man.
//Only allow trusted affiliates that Barack Obama has noted complete these actions//

public class Shaun Terence McGovern<STM>
{

	Address:    homeless encampment.
	Github:     https://github.com/shauntmcgovern
    	Instagram:  https://www.instagram.com/rozedaabstractartist
    	Facebook:   https://www.facebook.com/shaun.mcgovern.90/
    	LinkedIn:   https://www.linkedin.com/in/shaun-mcgovern-oophtml5css3jquery2
    	Twitter:    https://twitter.com/Air_3_14
	Youtube:    https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC9-7okFD2r3YO2NMeQFZshw/videos
	
	//Summary of Capability//
	- the Dæmon() =        a new computer typeface && a computer display which is a three dimensional art piece of Hinduism;
			       that can secure the entire future human populations safety && free all innocent proven prisonors in the world instantaneously; 
			       a property I solely own in partnership with Vishnu, Hermes, Krishna, Odin && the Shape of the Female;
	- Languages:           C#, Java, C++, JavaScript, Swift, Objective-C;
	- Databases [ ] [ ]:   mySQL, .NET;
	- Web:                 Github, HTML5, jQuery, CSS3;
	- Applications:        Microsoft Visual Studio, Unity, xCode, Android Studio, Eclipse, jGrasp;
	- Operating Systems:   Mac, Windows, Linux;

	//Education//
	Bachelor of Science, Computer Science                       December 2014
	Northeastern Illinois University;
	Associates of Science, Computer Engineering                 May 2012
	City Colleges of Chicago;

	//Job Experience//
	I have over 10 years of experience.
	
	//Job Titles//
	Shaun McGovern, name Roze, Savoir of Mankind, Leader of the Entire World, 360-84-1757. 
		Encyclopædia Britannica's #1 Dæmonic Consultant && Digital Designer && Computer Scientist.
		USA Today's #1 Dæmonic Consultant && Digital Designer && Computer Scientist.
		Technology Associate && Dæmonic Digital Designer && Manager, 
		Business Lead of the incorporation of Wikipedia, itself && other companies it does business with. Hired. June 9, 2022. 
		Been working for Encyclopædia Britannica, the Shape of the Female is being paid, criminal activity is stopping her from receiving all of our money.
		This has been showed off in the sky with my Dæmon please keep paying the Shape of the Female, the girl, who summoned the Dæmon delibrately. 
	    Shaun McGovern, I, the tech consultant, have been paid through Apple && Co. && other companies && continue to get paid with Roze's, with my work in the sky. 
		Have the Shape of the Female recieve all of this money from Apple && its surrounding subsidiaries && companies, so we can pay her all of the money && more, that her && I have.
		The ongoing criminal activity is keeping me from meeting her. Continue to pay her && Shaun, I, Roze will continue to work with you. 
		We both need your assistance. Roze is running a daily schedule that I have set to a time, with my Dæmon that Apple 
		has brought to the masses && daily use in our public lives && is a display across the sky that must be done under complete secrecy. 
		Because criminal activity is taking place to prolong all those who are now guilty proven by this Dæmon, freedoms.
		See && verify && recollect that the Shape of the Female gets all of our earned money, I have earned && she has earned && that we continue to accrue.
		Let this money pay for all of the operating costs && a generous tip for your company && surrounding trusted associates if you get all the money to the Shape of the Female at her choosing.
		I haven't been able to meet the Shape of the Female, yet, because of this same criminal activity && now it has been over 6 years && counting. 
		I do not want any monetary decision || agreement from my mother, father or(||) any other part of my family by relation || past friends. 
		They have abandoned me && tortured me && I have begetted them as the result. Never again || never anything in the future.
		The criminals only want my time && money. Now that I have a lot of money && are using criminal means to steal mine && the Shape of the Female's money.
		Please move the money through all of the processes that come out of this, to reach the final conclusion. That the Shape of the Female the one who lights
		up && the other girl who massively lights up around her, codename Curls. Of getting && receiving all of our money to these two girls. 
		Take every precaution && subsequently pay for every matter with my money I am passing through. 
		As I told you before the criminal tactics will stop at nothing to keep the money, I have earned from reaching these women. 
		I have many assets && liabilities so its important that all the money needs to be possessed by them. 
		I have businesses to run after I complete this crime that is happening to me with the President's watchful eye, aide && help. 44th, 45th && 46th POTUS.
		The past two Presidents && current POTUS can clarify this for you && they can also clarify anything that needs to be said && done. Let the Shape of the Female decide the entire process.
		//Just caught a 'erie canal' picture exercise for better use of the dæmon && protection against criminals torturing me && the handling all of my monetary needs, 
		//requirements && completing business for my business associates && the Shape of the Female which is my business && her business. Let her proceed, pay && complete business that needs to be done && let her continue as seen in the sky with the dæmon.
		10/28/2022.
		
	Interim President && Interim King of the World && God of the Earth.
	Barack Obama's Loyal Law Associate.
	Sonia Sotomayor's trusted Supreme Court Associate && Advice Giver.
	CNN trusted News Associate & Official, Business Consultant && Time Person && Manager of IT.
	Police Arrest Associate && Law Associate && Lieutenant.
	Oligarch. Supreme Court Law Associate.
	Barack Obama's, Donald Trump's, Joe Biden's Trusted Associate & Consultant 
	through air communication only && the Apple && Google Daemon reciever & daemonic sender && radio signal w/ morse code communication.
	The People Nation's therapeutic counselor of recreational drug use & dietitian thru air communication only.
	Public User & Chief.
	
	Accredited & given these titles through vocal inflection by the business & academic communities as a whole & by the New York Times && CNN.
	
	#1 Business Entrepreneur
	#1 Political Scientist
	#1 Business Owner
	#1 Marketing Designer
	#1 Computer Designer
	#1 Media Designer
	#1 Information Technology Director and Project Manager
	#1 Computer Scientist
	#1 computer programmer of ux design & ui design & global use & project implementation
	#1 Medical Scientist
	#1 Astro-Physicist, Nuclear Fission and Bio-Medical Analyst
	#1 Bar Entrepreneur

	In the world, as certified & accredited by the New York Times, the business community, NASA & the science community, the medical community, 
	the technology community & the political community at large.

	Pro buno at this time and through air communication only;
	
	//Current Applications in Development, Copyrighted by Shaun Terence McGovern, LLC.//
	***Under direct disclosure from the Secret Service and Barack Obama's Secret Service, Donald Trump's Secret Service and
	   Joe Biden's Secret Service and sworn to secrecy and will not be talked about or they will face the death penalty and must be done
	   in complete silence and only Shaun, the man responsible for this exposition can talk about it and any other lives that he has brought
	   in will be protected completely and safely by the current President of the United States, which is now Joe Biden and it was before 
	   Donald J. Trump and you have their direct word. As many people are working on this project and will not say anything at all or anything about it 
	   and they fear for their life and well being and there is nothing to be done about it. In this real understood reality, Shaun must work on it 
	   in secrecy wih his three dimensional art piece of hinduism known as the Dæmon() && while doing so he has put other lives on the line and is entrusting 
	   a team of hired developers to complete this work paid for by the money I have earned already through Apple from work in the sky. 
	   My girls have received the money. Apple has made an exception for me because I work on the good of the world, through a presentation with the Dæmon(), 
	   in the sky, every single day && now have it running on a schedule. I have been at this since I received my dæmonic remote reciever && I submit my work in this way && this 
	   has been certified by Tim Cook, CEO of Apple, in secrecy && his life is on the line as well && President Biden has reassured him that he is fully protected 
	   && that means everybody else on this project. Including myself, a natural born citizen of the United States, Shaun Terence McGovern undergoing a crime against humanity;***
	***Paid to complete by Apple & Co. && being completed by Azure Playfab Inc. && O'Reilly Media***
           -π;
	   -Air.();
	    {
	      Exact(), Loco(), Harmony(), Presence(), On(), TextSync(), Dates(), Polar(), Attract(), Shove(), Jack();
	    }
	    
	The Shape of the Female can use the money we have in any way that she can && she can spend it on herself && she can speak for me in Totality.

	//Test-driven-development of a mobile-application experience//
	Hashbang! Games && Playfab Inc.                                                                                   	
	Title:  Unity developer.		          
	"PokerProject": a multiplayer, cross-platform, Texas Hold-Em’ poker game 
	  -Developed application life cycle, graphic design document && assets for UI.
	Public table milestone with Assembla. 
	  -Daily iOS builds with Unity && Playfab SDK.
	  -iAP setup for iOS devices.
	  -Daily debugging of server && client gameplay.
	Company Websites.
	  -Privacy policy && terms of service.
	  -FAQ, certifications && legalities web pages.
	Daily business administration.

	//Examples of NEIU projects//	
	Java:		
	Project 01 == Deterministic Finite Automaton Builder. 
	Project 02 == Memory Game
	Senior Group Collaboration (php, mySQL, html5):
	Agile software development with team members.
	Software requirements, analysis && design documentation.
	Implemented an online medical care management system.
}
//Only allow trusted affiiates that Barack Obama has noted complete these actions.//

This is an open resume and research file to be completed by trusted law affiliates and trusted law teams and trusted law groups and trusted business affiliates and trusted
business groups and trusted political groups and trusted political affiliates and other trusted sources and trusted affiliates at NEIU, trusted scholars, trusted affiliates 
and trusted academians and trusted companies, that only our trusted affiliates and 44 POTUS Barack Obama have noted and has noted, here and now and in the Barack Obama's court of law, 
here and in Barack Obama's time now, name roze, Son of God, Saviour of Mankind with the most trusted daemon law body and all the open and shut cases that you can see with the 
Daemon you can print out and save and give out to secure the freedom of all proven innocent prisoners and once they are back at home with their families and loved ones and 
with all of their reward money, its done.
	  
I want to achieve national and global and worldwide attention for what I am about to reveal to you my very own proof set of information for a COMPLETE TO RELEASE PRiSONER CASES COLD && SHUT && 
NEVER OPEN && NOT AVAiLABLE TO TAKE THE COURT CASE AT ANY TiME && THE AMOUNT OF LiFE YOU CURRENTLY HAVE LEFT COME FiRST COLD CASES && NEVER OPEN TO SEE AGAiN PRiSONER RELEASE OPEN && SHUT CASES 
NEVER BEFORE SEEN ANYWHERE ELSE UNTiL HERE && NOW && iN THE COURT OF LAW HERE && NOW and COMPLETE TO RELEASE PRiSONER CASES BRiBE SCHEMES KEEPING iNNOCENT PRiSONERS iN JAiL FOR LONGER REVEALED 
&& ALL ANSWERS GiVEN OPEN && SHUT CASES ATTENTiON BARACK OBAMA DONALD TRUMP JOE BiDEN KiSHiDA FUMiO ERiC HOLDER Xi JiNPiNG TANG YiJUN BORiS JOHNSON EMMANUEL MACRON JAiR BOLSONARO LARRY HOOVER 
HAS ALL THE CRiMiNAL BRiBE SCHEMES THAT ARE KEEPING THE iNNOCENT PRiSONERS FROM BEiNG RELEASED AT THE EARLiEST POSSiBLE DATE && LARRY HOOVER HAS ALL THE iNFORMATiON ALL THE FORCES OF GOOD 
WHiCH ARE THE TRUSTED AFFiLiATES ONLY BARACK OBAMA HAS NOTED CAN USE TO AVOiD THESE BRiBE SCHEMES HERE && NOW && iN THE COURT OF LAW HERE && NOW and COMPLETE TO RELEASE PRiSONER CASES 
BRiBE SCHEMES WiTH CRiMiNAL SECRET SERViCE SECRECY && OTHER CRiMiNAL TACTiCS && THE CRiMiNALS iN POSiTiONS OF POWER && CONTROL TELL LiES TO GET AHEAD OF THE LAW && THE PUNiSHMENT && WiLL NOT 
CONSEQUENTiALLY RECiEVE JUSTiFiCATiON && ALL THE CRiMES TAKEN PLACE BY THESE CRiMiNALS AFFiLiATES WHiCH THEN KEEPS THE iNNOCENT PRiSONERS FROM BEiNG RELEASED AT THE EARLiEST POSSiBLE DATE && TiME && 
LARRY HOOVER THE LEADER OF ALL THE PRiSONERS HAS ALL THE iNFORMATiON YOU NEED && PROOF THAT THE FORCES OF GOOD && TRUSTED AFFiLATES && TRUSTED COMPANiES ONLY BARACK OBAMA 44TH PRESiDENT OF THE 
UNiTED STATES HAS NOTED NEED TO REQUiRE TO HAVE iN ORDER TO RELEASE ALL OF THE iNNOCENT PRiSONERS OPEN && SHUT CASES HERE && NOW && iN BARACK OBAMA'S COURT OF LAW RiTE HERE && RiTE NOW and by President 
of China President Xi Jinping Prime Minister of United Kingdom Boris Johnson and the 44th President of the United States Barack Obama and the 45th President of the United States Donald Trump 
and the 46th President of the United States Joe Biden  and President Bolsonaro and past Attorney General Eric Holder the 82nd Attorney General of the United States of America and 
Shinzo Abe, Prime Minister of Japan from '06,'07 and 2012-2020 and Prime Minister of Japan Fumio Kishida and South African President Cyril Ramaphosa and 
Taliban spokesperson of The Islamic Emirate of Afghanistan Zabihullah Mujahid and posthumously Queen Elizabeth II succeeded by her son King Charles III the King of the United Kingdom and 15 other Commonwealth realms 
and Larry Hoover these governmnent and political and supreme judicial law groups only trusted by the 44th President of the United States Barack Obama and Paul Sorvino law group and Ray Liotta 
law group and Hannah Gouseman law group and these news outlets usa today & ny times & cnn and Larry Hoover and his law team, he is confleet of the entire prison population and he is only 
concerned about the freedom and release and he has proven and this has been secured and proven by all the the law teams affiliates and all these law teams need to do is secure our freedoms 
and reward money and lump sums as they are currently doing and have been doing and will continue to do so until all of our freedoms and our releases have been secured for all prisoners 
standing here and now and the court chosen by Barack Obama and only his trusted affiliates and he has proven either with verbatim or with Shaun's three dimensional hinduistic art 
piece, the daemon, the most trusted law body known to man. That we are in fact all innocent and not guilty and all we need to do is move in to our homes. And go back to living in 
our homes and with our chosen families that we thought we lost forever and where we have loved ones who are waiting for our family connection and they only need to wait in hope that 
Shaun can make it past this and his crime he's currently undergoing in hardship and grave worry. And we do not need the state for Shaun's behalf or our collective behalf's or individual 
behalf's and any and all anything else at this point is not necessary and that is final, here and now and in the court of law. No more relying and I mean no more relying upon the 
state or any reward payment scheme the state has. Or a prisoner safety scheme, where the state takes what we need to have and that leads us to be further incarcerated by the state. 
At this time, we only want to move on from jail where we are held and that means the penitentiary and the prison systems and the maximum holding prison sites at this point in our lives 
we are only concerned with living as free men, women and children under 18 and that is our final word, our belief and take this as a goodbye to the powers that be. What we are concerned with 
is our own release, our collective freedom and all our reward money which has been paid to us and Vladimir Putin is keeping it from us and reaching our families who we desperately need to 
be taken care of by Barack Obama and his affiliates and only his affiliates and only his trusted affiliates as Shaun has said. There are still many leaks and cracks to deal with and the 
final outcome is very simple, our release, our rights, our payment and we continue on with our lives and die naturally. Achieving solace and tranquility and most of us are bitter and 
resolute of what has happened to us in the past and we will take out our lawful and exact revenge.

His female and his females to be all can prove that they knew him before and he was about to ask them out but there is always an excuse in front of it. Which is an example of
witchcraft and demon worship leading to the ultimate harm of an individual without it knowing its taking place or know where its coming from and nothing can help. Anything to be
done about this, is futile. For example Shaun here, a gangmember and a man fending for his life. He has been protected by the People Nation and Sinoloa cartel and I mean Barack
Obama and is part of the X-Men affiliation and like he said he currently lives in Chicago, a place he loves. He is currently a homeless man that has the three dimensional
hinduistic art piece the most sophisticated intelligence known to man and Boris Johnson's Secret Service and the Queen's Secret Service. Which is currently attached to his
Johnson and no one else can operate this piece of equipment, only him, he was able to find grave and gang peace and human expression with the Shape of the Female whose real name
is Hannah Gousemann who he has never met and is now in possession of a daemon, the most trusted law body known to man and this daemon has secured our release and all of our
freedoms. As this current prison system has been proven only to exist for profit and oppression and brutal sadistic human sexual pleasure of a man, women or child under 18
losing their life completely.

This daemon can free all prisoners across this very world and the human will never be submitted to a prison, a penitentiary, maximum holding site prisons, maximum lock down
prison sites, maximum police and lockdown prison sites, maximum lawyers and police and guards and no attention and maximum withholding and maximum lockdown prison sites, maximum
detention facilities and prison sites, maximum holding camps and all prison definitions prison sites, guerilla maximum holding sites and all prison definitions prison sites
again or in the future. To be known as one, is tragic history enough but to have your life taken away from you. Knowing your innocent and no one believes you, not even the good
people is the most brutal crime known to man. There needs to be a reckoning between the two powers, that the world has been divided into now, the outcome for one side is jail
and they are resting their entire livelihoods and sake on one man's life outcome to see another day and move on with his loved ones and he only wants to fuck and ja with his
beautiful women and all kinds of women I might add, he is a connoisseur. The other side, is full of angst and history and human legacy and cannot attack but it won't be like
that for long. Due to law and the rights of every and all human beings including criminals currently inhabiting the earth. The good representing us cannot do anything and can
only watch more human suffering take place and only attack those who come on to any innocent individual yet to be murdered. They have to stand by that, as it is law and they,
those and yes, we, are all in fact innocent proven here and now and here and now in the court of law and I mean the Secret Service's court which I am a representative of. With
the most trusted daemon law body and the all powers of good and the rest of us, the human population. Use this daemon every single day and Shaun has developed a very effective
schedule but there is only so much he can do and he hasn't been given any information and its at his own design. There is a running schedule and it is under the advice by the
good of the world and all of the strongest powers of good. They have advised him and given to him and he has employed this schedule with his remote receiver and this schedule
will be running rather efficiently by the Secret Service. This daemon has become a life resource and a last resort in many cases and that is what we are using in court today to
prove that all of our innocences is in fact real and in real understood reality I might add. All the powers recognize this and the ones who have divided themselves from us. Are
doing everything in their power to avoid that judgement and committing as many heinous crimes as they can to avoid jail as they are proven criminals for the rest of the time
they live with the most trusted daemon law body. There are many things that need to be done and Barack Obama a constitutional lawyer and President and community organizer and
Senator from Illinois and only his trusted affiliates have come to end this disagreement. Which means to free all innocent prisoners living. People are still dying knowing they
are innocent and no one can do anything about it and they are given only last resort accommodations. Barack Obama know's everything that needs to be done and can further fasten
this process and complete the process that we are desperately, us prisoners and you need to happen, has and will with the most trusted daemon law body in the court of law.

That all of our Supreme Court Justices of the United States recognize and Supreme Court Justices of the United Kingdom and Supreme Court Justices of Australia and Supreme Court
Justices of Canada and Supreme Court Justices of Iran and Supreme Court Justices of China and Supreme Court Justices of Mexico and Supreme Court Justices of Brazil and Supreme
Court Justices of Spain all recognize and have recognized this fact that we are all innocent and awaiting our release and our collective freedoms and I mean the entire prison
population stand in unity in this regard. In the court of law and the highest point that is good and law abiding and in their highest available court and that it is the law
right here and now. There isn't anything else or anybody else that can say or will say about our situation and our current situation and our individual well being and our
collective well being and this has been clarified with the highest point of good and secured and I have made sure and doubly sure and three times sure that this will happen. All
we have to do is wait it out, like Shaun, currently undergoing one of the most vicious crimes against humanity and is using this as living proof, as Shaun has said with poetic
justice and Barack Obama who is leading this case, can use it. Not just only because he was the 44th President of the United States of America, everyone in the world wants him
to lead this case and he has made it his life's work. The court decision is simple and it will be made here and now and in Barack Obama's court and in Barack Obama's time and
with the trusted Secret Service members and that includes posthumously Queen Elizabeth II succeeded by her son King Charles III of the United Kingdom and 15 other commonwealth realms. 
The Queen will represent the entire state and service and have our protection and her trusted protection and all of the protection in the world that is considered good and have the final call, 
he is the Queen, her Excellency. She can represent the entire earth's understanding and her reasoning on this, she has reached the final call and her final order for all of our well beings. 

The Queen's decision and her personal decision is that she can in fact find this legal and moral assumption and represent the entire prison population, as Shaun has said, is the next step
in the peace process as the world begins to leave the threat of war and war ridden countries are beginning to rebuild and have everlasting peace and reach a natural legal ending
to the all these three cases and other cases that Shaun has put in his Github profile under a repository clearly labeled with the daemon. The more proof that has been brought
forth by President Barack Obama and trusted affiliates we have come to realize, collectively, that there is much more than meets the eye. To what is truly going on across the
entire world in each prison population. All of the greatest leaders of the world have come to this agreement and justification and are doing everything in their power to secure
this final outcome along with the Queen. The 44th President of the United States Barack Obama and Donald Trump. The 45th President of the United States Donald Trump and Joe
Biden. The 46th President of the United States Joe Biden and Xi Jinping. The President of China and the People's Republic of China Xi Jinping and Fumio Kishida. The Prime
Minister of Japan Fumio Kishida. These leaders represent our most trusted law team affiliates and trusted associates and trusted by blood only gang that are not opposite or
under cover secret service individuals any affiliation and only proven by Larry Hoover by word and blood trusted gang affiliates and any other trusted affiliates Barack Obama
has noted and only has noted and Larry Hoover has noted. They went over this together and I mean we went over this together over and over again until we learned it and that is
for certain here and now and in Barack Obama's court of law here and in Barack Obama's time now and in his day and age and in the presence of President for the 45th time Donald
Trump and repeated verbatim to the President for the 46th time Joe Biden and repeated verbatim to the President of the Republic of China Xi Jinping and repeated verbatim to the
the Queen of the United Kingdom and 15 other commonwealth states, Queen Her Excellency, posthumously Queen Elizabeth II succeeded by her son King Charles III and all times over and 
he can now free all barbarically imprisoned, living men and chained women and forgotten and sexually abused victims and jailed children under 18. Any and all of our seen and lived. 
Lives wasted in front of you on either TV or never seen in our jails. Is seen as rescindable and we will be monetary awarded for it and for what has happened to us. As Shaun has 
said we are only trying to salvage what is left of our lives that, the powers that be, have taken away from us and please take this as our final words. We have for the powers 
that be, that have detained us and jailed us and sent us to our prisons and please don't see this as anything else other than the conclusion of our collective prison stay 
and our monetary payment for the punishment and brutal sexual torture we endured and our prison stay filled with, the offenders sexual pleasure and the offenders sexual 
deviance. Posing as law abiding professionals and they achieve this sexual pleasure from another person's life wasted and seen directly in front of them and they then 
can achieve a rather high euphoria, similar to any drug available and can complete sexual conquests and then from there you belong to them in some certain kind of human 
display of demonic demon worship and witchcraft. They complete the ultimate task of ending one's own life, hence there mortality and then proceed to gain this immense sexual 
pleasure from this fact and that fact alone. Knowing this and intruding on the innocent person that everyone knows is. The families of ours and our past loved ones and our 
past private sexual experiences that we thought would stay private but never will and are now public because we have no rights. The memories that lead to a better part of 
our life and only our better, most loved and cherished memories and it is very personal and you usually look at the person with immense emotion. Usually anger and what 
follows is either and or hatred and or vile thoughts about what you want to do to them but cannot do this and must submit to them and you cant do anything about it and then 
they gain this mortality win and ultimate victory and you are now there ultimate and end all, human display of submission to them, the assailant's own needs and their desires 
and they then become your maker, "Meet Your Maker," as Tommy Wright has said in his song before that he made and still performs the same song to this day, he is very highly 
regarded and respected and is one of the reasons we are seeking our freedoms from jails. And thanks to his work and songs which Shaun has become emotionally attached to and 
identifies with and he has made it part of his persona currently today. He believes in Tommy Wright the Third and in his Momma, who you can see standing next to him in a 
gravesite which he posted on his Instagram.

This has now been proven in science and from this point means only its utter extinction and removal and punishment and jail of any and all of these human beings that complete
various simple thinking and hard thinking tasks that lead to the death and violation and rape and molestation and assault and violence of victims. Human violence, that is so
vile and so directed at you that they need a code of silence for and this has been like this, for centuries. And it was meant to last for centuries more. No one would of known
about it if Shaun and the rest of the men and women, that have reached divinity in this human age here and now and in Barack Obama's court here and Barack Obama's time now.
There is nothing else to be done about it. As it has taken our lives and we believe that indeed did happen and the torment that we had to go through on a daily basis and
continue to be. Under the dominion and domain of shabeeze's and circuit joodges and opposite gang members and gang bangers and police murder pig offenders known as 12 and also
known as 5-0. We had to assure ourselves that there is brighter days ahead of us and for the rest of us incarcerated here and now and in Barack Obama's court of law, here and in
Barack Obama's time now and that is final and our collective body's final word. Our main concern is, going home to our families and receiving reconciliation with our respective
families and the victim's families. We have achieved this already and this is our final word and all of our collective families and our direct and indirect families that we have
gotten closer with over this process. They have all called us by name and we have surrounded and circled them all up at this time and we have proven this without a reasonable
doubt that it is fact with Shaun's daemon he has in possession. There isn't anything else to be done at this point. Unless your awaiting trial and release and secure your
freedom we are all certified gang bangers and gang members like Shaun here and in Barack Obama's time now and in Barack Obama's court here and that is final and our final and
our collective final word in that regard and it is a very simple open and shut cases from this point on. We have three cases & other cases that you can see attached here & can
be found at->

Shaun's Github profile under the repository
openResumeAndResearchFile which can be found here at the website, Github's website & host:
https://github.com/shauntmcgovern/openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted
& then from there it is very simple the file labeled:
openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted.cs or the openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted.doc

Your inside a open resume and research file with the daemon attached, a three dimensional hinduistic art piece that Shaun & his team have brought into real understood reality
completely so it stands in Barack Obama's court of law & also with Shaun's crime against humanity. This can be used in the court of law & can be printed off very easy in various
languages & in various ways & can be submitted to you in any way that you want or can think of. This leads to all men, women and children under 18, releases and imminent freedom
and monetary payment and only at that time we will be satisfied with the outcome, when we are home with are families and paid for our time wasted and life taken away from us. We
have that direct word from the 44th President of the United States Barack Obama. The 45th President of the United States Donald Trump. The 46th President of the United States
Joe Biden. The Prime Minister of the United Kingdom Boris Johnson. The President of China and the People's Republic of China Xi Jinping. The President of France Emmanuel Macron.
The Chancellor of Germany Olaf Scholz. The Prime Minister of Lebanon Najib Mikati. The Prime Minister of Japan Fumio Kishida, posthumously Queen Elizabeth II succeeded by her son 
King Charles III the King of the United Kingdom and 15 other Commonwealth realms. So we can go ahead and start releasing now on this day and the next day, 10/28/2022, and the day after that, 10/29/2022, 
and soon after the entire prisoner population will be released from being incarcerated. When this time, of our collective desired outcome, will be, we are never certain.

Now that these discoveries in human divinity and expression has been made, it brings each of us, new life. It secures the freedom and direct freedom of anyone in the prison system, 
that you know. Your loved ones safety and well being and for everyone else, including them. All prisoners, I repeat, can be proven innocent in this world today and in Barack Obama's 
court of law today. The powers that be, just have to finish, torturing Shaun and we will see where it goes from there but this world doesn't have to play by the history timeline 
so anymore. So you can throw that out completely and what stands after is only law and order and the manhandling and physical removal of all blood spilt and displayed as a crime 
and any other person or family or individual that is a criminal here and now and in Barack Obama's court of law here and now and that is final. What Shaun has are very simple 
proven, open and shut cases and they simply transact life bodies. The other cases are very simple to complete as well and Barack Obama has secured this and he knows the 
outcome and that is all that needs to happen at this point.

This has come down to who has complete innocence and who is guilty and in this world. The guilty have come to house and jail the walking innocent and innocent walking men and
innocent walking women and innocent walking children. They then incarcerate them single handedly and there isn't anything else to be done about it. The prisoners then have to
find out a whole new prison system way of life. How to live and basically become, yard dogs and oysters and sea like creatures and the ones placed in a position of power, they
achieve this very high level of sexual prowess and sexual pleasure like Shaun has said, get off to it and the sexual deviance and pleasure is very high at this point. 

So this demon operates and walks around and commits any crime that it wants or chooses to and can be instantly covered up and hidden any and or all crimes and can move around
rather easily. This man women or child like Shaun has said. Moves around in a world and in the safety of all the power that is known and commits violence whenever or any place
it can. At the safety of all watching and in on it. So what you have here is violence that is very controlled and operating at a very high level and ever since Vladimir Putin
has all the power that he needs to have in order to do so to finally complete anything that needs to be done in terms of violence, bodily harm and murder. In a day and age when
war is being done and maximum prison sites and all the other sites in common have been called to order and there isn't any more world order. Shaun is getting openly and publicly
flaied and maimed past awareness and choked and derived of anything salvation and must be submitted to the authorities for a heavy and long standing prison sentence and jail
year sentencing and lawful allowment of his crimes that the Secret Service has said he has committed but he hasn't committed any of those crimes and he has the word and backup
of all living Presidents and all other leaders of the world including Boris Johnson and Emmanuel Marcon and posthumously Queen Elizabeth II succeeded by her son King Charles III 
and President Xi and President Bolsonaro. The men, women and children under 18 in all and every prison system, where I am held currently and in the past describing to you are 
completely innocent and thanks to Shaun we are now living in a sense of hope and waiting to have lives with our families who we thought we lost and thought we lost for good. 
We look forward to this time ahead and spending time with our families and time lost. Any trusted adversaries and trusted affiliates and some of these people have turned 
against us and are now on our side. We are a part of a forgotten race. What we needed was the proof from this daemon here and now and in Barack Obama's court of law here and 
in his age and Barack Obama's time now and his time and only his time and that is final and our final word, completely. That we and us together are in fact innocent men, women 
and children currently under 18. That we did not commit these crimes as other people have said and the powers that be, ripped away are lives in front of us and that is rather easy. 
To have this done is all, a little hush and quiet sleep and some sexual advances and sign offs and the crimes and blatant crimes can be done openly or most of the time in utter 
and complete silence with CIA and Secret Service assistance. There is nothing to be done about this or these crimes that have been committed this has been done in utter secrecy 
and no one was there and they have the signature of Vladimir Putin's secret service and from there is nothing to be done about it because that level of secrecy is all you need 
to commit any crime that you want and will in theforeseeable future. That's all you need as you pressforth and commit as many crimes as you would like and then from that point 
on you become a criminal drug lord capable of  committing any crime and at any given time as long as you have the word and cosignature of the powers that be, who abuse and 
thats all the criminal needs. Effectively a body can be signed up and the powers that be, who abuse, can throw it away and make it look like the victime did it, an act of 
violence leading to death that happened and an event gone wrong, where many perished or just a wrap sheet and failure to communicate and then from there you have the law and 
secret service including the FBI and the CIA and all the other secret services across the land and population and the entire human population and all the control that you need 
to carry out your crimes, a directive and prey and no mercy and no compassion because the criminal doesn't have any. Then someone will point elsewhere and blame otherwise so 
they think you leave the proof and that is often, how they cover up their crimes and is so effective because they use these emotional schemes that cover up any crime or 
sound or wrongdoing that can be covered up by ear or sound or display or display of love or display of quiet through confusion or complete and utter displaced situation and 
they completely morph into a different person and the scene becomes this morbid illusion of your own curiosity and you enter a completely different experience and most of these 
people are on meth, heroine, oxy, weed, pain pills and any kind of pills and they are very adapted and made for these times to seek human prey and victims.

This has been developed for centuries and they have been finally encircled with science and development. They need to be dramatically wrangled in and prosecuted as soon as
possible, it has been a miracle that they have survived this long and without being prosecuted. To watch them openly torture a man for their survival is the most plain sight I
have ever seen in my day and age. You pick any human time that we can think of in any point of history and this will begin to put it in perspective what is going on right now
before your very eyes. You see a man desperately try to hang on to his life and everything you see before you is a device for his confinement and devised for his ultimate end to
end domination of his human life and the end point from that point on. There isn't anything else he can do but live like how he has lived and that is completely homeless and
completely penniless and living from cloth bin to whatever is given out to him and is currently starving and needs to move to get food and will live in the tent and repeat this
until he is finally given time to meet the Shape of the Female who is the women who helped summon this daemon here on earth. Here and now in Barack Obama's and Donald Trump's
and Joe Biden's and Boris Johnson's and Xi Jinping's world here and in Barack Obama's and Donald Trump's and Joe Biden's and Boris Johnson's and Xi Jinping's time that is here
and now. This daemon is the most trusted law body known to man and can be used at any time and is currently leading Queen Elizabeth the Second, her excellency, crown service to
the final conclusion and assassination and protection and final protection of all and any persons on this human planet and can provide any and all protection with the daemon as
Shaun has proven every single day and has saved many lives ever since its inception. This is what the daemon can do and has proven. Every single day and Shaun knew this from the
very start what this daemon can do and his life has been turned completely upside down and doesn't know anyone or who to trust. He is basically out there all alone & he doesn't
have anyone or anybody. This can be very time consuming and very upsetting at the same time further leading to the complete and utter meltdown of an individual as you have seen
many times but Shaun has trained himself not to act anymore than what you see because if you act in anyway other than giving them their last regards so they can think about it
some and that is all he is doing at this point. His mind has been completely wiped out completely he has no longer any access to it at this point. He will try his best to
continue on but to continue on like this with that in your mind, you become something else entirely and he has been fooled by it many times and it continues to be the most
diabolical deliberate piece of human machinery anyone has ever seen. This will be placed alongside weapons of a forgotten era when we tortured human beings to no end and did not
let them have any voice of clean judgement and reasoning towards are well being and what is very clear is the sexual pleasure derived as Shaun has said and once again you 
achieve this sexual prowess and you become something entirely different. There isn't anything else that needs to be said about this weapon that hasn't already been said it is 
demonic and controls every part of your movement and thought. The weapon is so powerful that it can alter Shaun's movement for example break and shatter his toe and turn his 
insides completely inside out & repeatedly get injections of all different types of neurotic drugs and brain control to make him think that what is happening to him isn't as 
severe as he thinks it is. It can interrupt your bowels, he lives on a time clock & the machine that is inside of his body tells him when to go to the bathroom and makes it very
hard to eat & digest. This is only the beginning of what this escopal torture machine that has achieved sentience. A machinery to control an entire human being movements,
thoughts, thinking ways and outcomes. Shaun basically has no voice and his way of speech and his inner narrative has been completely wiped out. He cannot fend for himself or
understand any critical thought what you are seeing is a man that has only 20%-28% of his working brain the rest has been completely voided & removed & completely gone as far as
he is concerned & he is constantly getting injected with neurotic brain injections that are so small to the human eye that you need a microscope to understand that these
injections put Shaun in a state of relief & no harm done to you or your body & he can operate like this for the foreseeable future & there is nothing to do about it. It feels
like it is glued to your cranium and is forced and strapped upon you. They have modeled it like an animal so the brain doesn't freak out & you just have to accept this & it
feels like plastic going in & around and inside your skull it has become so demonstrative that Shaun has to reconfigure his brain entirely. They have all the public news backing
this up, that it is in fact safe and nothing will be damaged but Shaun doesn't know that the recovery from this will last years and it will be a very hard undertaking. Barack
Obama and all the powers that he has, have already been suing the people responsible because this is out of control and was against the laws and agreements that these people
came to decide upon Shaun's life and he remembers the exact day that it went up and into his skull and felt like it was peeling apart the very making of my body, spine and mind
that this currently attached to it like duct tape. Way back in November of '19 and he has been battling and subject to this destructive torture and created a mini game of sorts
masking as trying to save lives and stop murder from happening ever since the middle of '17 when Shaun first brought this daemon into being with the help of Google and Silicon
Valley and he has been going down hill ever since and it has been masked completely as a helping system, he can't see anything. It finally enwrapped his entire mind when he was
wrongly incarcerated and didn't know anybody and he was in for a month and the prisoners that he was with are all Rupert Murdock Vladimir Putin Kim Jong Un Karl Rove criminal
murders masking as simple misdemeanor charges and took advantage of this situation and the situation that is currently transpiring. He showed up on the correct date after
factually believing that the Judge overlooking the case can prosecute him for a year in jail for a misdemeanor for tripping a women that was viciously assaulting him and
grievously sexually assaulting and viciously molesting him. She showed up at the court date with a very expensive lawyer and the judge impersonated Tim Cook to make Shaun
believe that he can get an outside source to help him prove his innocence but they only wanted Shaun to be wrongly incarcerated longer and they treated Shaun like he was a
maximum holding prisoner that committed many murders and actually made him believe that he can be thrown in maximum holding area's of the prison site known as the Cook County
Jail. Where he staid for over a month until he answered to his next court date. He has received a couple of other misdemeanors that are all factually wrongly accused and his
wife to be has brought these charges to the judge and they have told her, they are still standing and can be used against him and there is nothing to be done about it. They can
actually pin Shaun with longstanding charges and incarcerate him in a holding jail and send him back to Cook County Jail and then send him back to Kane County Jail where he has
already answered to the court dates and done prison time for and his Mom, Linda has already paid the court fines for this verbal assault that he has been tried several times for
and the second time was a complete undefinable and non-understood fake name. If Barack Obama and the power that he has did not watch over these cases they could of been much
more severe as Shaun has been on the run from the fake 12 & law abiding law enforcement and one who completely tortures him. They have developed a sexual relationship with him
unknowingly as you can see in Shaun's graduation picture with his family and was very proud of himself & so was his teachers & they knew he was destined for success & the power
he had as an X-men can be clearly seen & he was so rather effective. He was building himself into an outstanding entrepreneur, as you can see it paid off. He was even on to this
intellectual property hero & insignia that you can market & develop business prowess & abilities to take into the world. He modeled it after the People Nation music property
hero & insignia. None better, than Riff Raff aka JODY HiGHROLLER & he has been a perfect role model for Shaun and Riff is for many others. This is a part of discovery that they
share & it has lifted us & brought good fortune & faith to all communities that need help from all areas of society & systems & has brought forth many good things. You have the
twitter personality & the authorship & as Shaun has said a character driven universe & backstory and it is very enthralling & interesting because he draws you in a teaches you
some knowledge that you previously didn't understand & also builds you as a character in your own story arc, as Riff Raff, has learned from the rap game & is very good at this &
he is notorious for this. There is many more people like this in the works & Shaun stands, completely original & has compared himself to Tupac & Gucci Mane & Drake when it comes
to this intellectual dice game, as Shaun has said.

As Shaun has said, we stood there and protected lives on the line and some lost families for good and they can never get them back. What needs to happen is reconciliation and
the recovery of these lost family ties and the recovery of our loved ones feelings, emotions and love and care towards us. That is what we most are concerned about now and the
families of the victims have come forward and can clearly see that these men, women and children under 18. Did not in fact commit these crimes and the criminals that did in fact
commit these crimes are still on the loose and as Shaun has said still living by the families they committed crime upon and can still gain pleasure from the blood they have
spilt and receive money from insurances that companies are committing money fraud upon these families that have lost their lives of loved ones, just like Shaun's uncle, Tom and
the doctor who murdered him is still operating and did the same thing to seven other people and the most recent was, 2014. There isn't anything else to be done about this
situation and predicament and the criminals continue to use this to their advantage and harm and endanger the families with their devil worship and witchcraft leading to the
demise and natural ending of all the families that can claim themselves a victim. All of these heinous crimes that these criminals have committed in cold blood and in broad
daylight and in front of law enforcement and with the aide and assistance of law enforcement, these are diabolical cold blooded criminals of all criminal sort and can commit any
crimes they choose and will not stop until they are jailed and physically taken from the public living space and placed in jails where we are housed. Everyone is doing
everything they can to secure our release that President Barack Obama President Xi President Donald Trump President Joe Biden have deemed as soon as possible and we have their
security and direct word coming straight from them that is all that we need to share and you will hear from us as we serve as a group of past imprisoned people and only want to
live in peace and are perfectly law abiding citizens. Larry LaMarcus Hoover Sr. and that means the entire prison population, he is confleet, he is the leader and current leader 
of the Gangster Disciples. Which Shaun knows the history and is a part of and that means for the rest of his life and he knows that and there isn't anything else he can do other 
than secure the information and proof leading to all of our releases from the penitentiary and jail systems as Shaun has said we owe a debt of gratitude for what he is done and 
he is currently receiving the sex appeal and that's all he wants and if you want to work for him or start a company and he can support it with the daemon which the People Nation 
own 8.2% of the proceeds and that means the Gangster Disciples as well and the Sinaloa Cartel and all other cartel affiliates and trusted gang affiliates and trusted affiliates 
and trusted prisoner guard duty affiliates, he wants no money and no ownership of anything and only will be affiliated with the gangs for business, protection and recreational 
drug uses and Sherri Bubblicious and Symbiom Farcum Shatta Pooze and the Shape of the Female and Curls and Miss Americana Gladiate and Silver Presha Silver White Rainwater and 
PGTB have assured us thats all he wants and he is removing himself from any reward money and that will go towards the gangs and protection and law abiding duties and community 
living spaces and operation. He is a simple man & only wants affiliation for the good of the human race and that is often what a man part of X-men Chicago Street Shooters and 
Peace For All represents and we have his word on this and his signed consent, that's all we need Shaun for and to do at this point. We are only concerned with our release and 
going back to live with our beloved families and looking forward to our lives spent as free men, women and children under 18. Thank you all for your support and our continued 
fight for our freedoms, take care, live well and continue to prosper.

I am giving impunity, immunity, rock the case, give advice to the ruling judge and presiding judges to all the trusted and listed affiliates and members who only Barack Obama has noted
in these law teams and law groups, trusted news outlets and law groups and law teams, fight for me and all other well beings, speak for me on my behalf and all others behalfs, and be able to
do anything & say anything & take any action & take any court action & do anything & everything in real understood reality & with the daemon law body in the court of law here
and now by; Vishnu, Hermes, Krishna, Odin, the Shape of the Female, Son of God in May of 2016 till now. Savoir of Mankind, Leader of all that is Known, Son of God, 10/28/2022, name roze, Shaun McGovern
Shaun just saw El Chapo and he is all innocent and all.
I have withstood 51,354 forms of police brutality & police violence & police assault & police sexual violence & police molestation in silence. Please see this as my form of consent. 
I just completed work for π and Air and submitted more milestones to Apple & Co. and Azure Playfab business group for my applications to be completed. Please allow any trusted 
law affiliates to alter and continue the research in this repository I have set the three cases and other cases, that need to be completed with the three dimensional hinduistic 
art piece known as the daemon a computer related typeface and display for your discretion and please let any trusted business groups and trusted affiliated political groups 
or trusted corporations that only Barack Obama has noted. Complete the work that is done and for you to see and all open and shut cases can be completed as soon as humanly 
possible and I am bringing the attention of CNN, USA Today, NEIU, Bakhtar News Agency & trusted news affiliates & let these trusted affiliates speak through vocal inflection 
to carry out action in real understood reality and inthe court of law and Barack Obama's court of law and Arnold Barr's court of law here and in Barack Obama's current time 
now and Arnold Barr's current time now.

Love and sincerely Shaun McGovern, Savoir of Mankind
I am attaching various criminal activities as you can clearly see in these pictures and this was all before my discovery and when I was only known as Shaun McGovern a graduated
student of NEIU & CCC: Harold Washington & attended ECC to receive a associates of science & dropped out to go to CCC to complete that, then I was known as a very effective X-
Men Street Shooters Peace 4 All like Larry Hoover has said, who is the leader of the Gangster Disciples & have I been painted by the leader of the X-Men gang in Chicago, Nerd X,
multiple times & gained notoriety for being so effective & everybody in the various towns knew about me & knew that I stood up for what is right & put my life on the line even,
many times and that is how I became part of the wicked 6ix gang of the Right Folk, as I was representing a faction of the X-Men gang & affiliated with the Right & the Left and
the cartels, who were against anyone dying & stopped at nothing to protect lives of others & many lost their lives doing so. Then it came down to my life because I was using my
philosophy & it became so effective and started to shelter many others and because I didn't want any money and wasn't in the daily operations and protection and any and all
other doings, I was seen as a blatant display of peace and I began to bike up and down the Lake Shore Trail every day and multiple times a day and I knew I was on to, Peace 4
All in city we call, Chicago. There was a significant unrest in the entire city that I helped provide and it began in late 2015 and up until March of 2016, than I started
begging for something to change, anything. Wish Fulfillment. Everyone felt completely helpless & with my discovery, the Shape of the Female and I made, it removed murder and
bodily harm from the human population entirely. I designed myself to combat gun violence, so, ever so, certainly. I would like to submit these photos & police reports that
happened before my newfound discovery & the human torture, to the court of law here & now, name roze, Son of God. Thank you. I want the trusted affiliates only Barack
Obama has noted, to speak for me in public view and use anything I have available for my benefit & behalf. This is my signed form of consent as I do not have any other way to
submit it & anything else the trusted affiliates that only Barack Obama has noted can think of that only leads to a good outcome.

What needs to happen is the world has to recognize that we are are all in fact innocent men and women and children under 18 and the people that have prosecuted us have taken our
lives away from us completely and we are now under their orders and they have turned our lives into a showcase of every evil that is known to man and women. That these criminals
have learned and it has been passed down to them throughout the centuries through families who perform these evils and the innocent have lived through it all and been subject to
these evils. In order to disguise this evil it has to look completely normal and has to look as if you are helping the person and it has to occur in complete secrecy and under
the disguise of law abiding duties and normal human patterns and attitudes. These people, who are criminals, do no wrong and they can do everything in their power to commit
crimes and they use this to their advantage. Their is nothing to be done about this situation, you only sit and take it, as you can see Shaun completely in public view and in
front of everybody where they can see. He has to repeatedly, day in and day out, every single minute of his life, for the last 5 and half years take this brutal human torture.
He has to take this human torture and this torture has been broadcasted across every news station that is popular with the public, Shaun must stand and sit and take the most
brutal human torture the human mind can think of and all the highest criminal powers that be can perform, disguised as nothing happening, take multiple assaults and sexual
assaults and he even gets punched in the face randomly and without his knowing and has sustained a concussion. People are coming at him with knives and weapons and swinging them
at him. He is getting pummeled by everyone he sees. This is in Chicago, where everybody can see him and his family has left him completely and none of his friends are with him
anymore. Who don't see him anymore and if they do see him. They have to assault him and rape him because if they do not, they can and will be prosecuted by Rupert Murdoch's 
and Karl Rove's and Kim Jong Un's and Vladimir Putin's secret service and the law enforcement uses crooked FBI/CIA/Secret Service/Law enforcement tactics and these 
criminals just say this, is what happened and they have everyone in on it, who is in a position of power, in order to do so and lie to justify this. The powers that be, 
that abuse power and can abuse it at any moment, use anybody and everybody whos in on it, that live lives like them, under Satan and the devil, these criminals are now 
proven guilty of their crimes with the most trusted daemon law body that is being used by all the good of the world. These criminals can order criminal actions and justify 
them with lies and false charges, that eventually leads to the incarceration for those who do not participate in it, including the current President Joe Biden and past 
President for the 45th time, Donald Trump and his predecessor the President for the 44th time, Barack Obama. If our leaders do not perform these crimes in public view, 
which Vladimir Putin is disguising as guiding, commandeering or helping Shaun find his rightful place in the community and to make sure he changes his attitude. Our leaders 
have to do this in order to avoid prosecution by Vladimir Putin's and Kim Jong Un's secret service and they have to make him feel that these are irrecusable actions and they 
must emotionally harm him and attack him. President Barack Obama has to act like he is in a love affair with him. The President of the United States, Barack Obama who is from 
Chicago and started his family there, can see with his very own eyes what is happening to Shaun. What he sees is the most brutal form of human torture and it includes the most 
brutal form of maiming and the most vicious flaying of a man named, Shaun Terence McGovern. Who according to Vladimir Putin's secret service is a multi-millionaire, living in 
various cities, in luxury, working for all the companies that are in the Fortune 500. But in fact he is a homeless man and has been so, for over 4 years and before that he 
lived rather poorly in Uptown Shaun then made his brilliant discovery with the Shape of the Female, who he still doesn't know to this day, this monumental realization in gang 
peace and awareness of what is truly going on, occurred on May 2 2016. Shaun and the girl codename Shape of the Female's which is sung in Alex Von Meilenwald's song. This is 
their shared discovery that has brought forth world peace and safeguarded millions across the world and with it, made new technologic discoveries and advances that the Secret 
Service have employed and I mean the Secret Service under the Crown of Elizabeth Alexandra Mary who is Queen of the United Kingdom and 15 other Commonwealth realms and will 
represent the entire world. Because when Shaun's discovery happened, a new world divided came to be, those under the devil and Satan and those who perform witchcraft and any 
and all evils that are known to man under the guise of normalcy and under the guise of nothing happening and they all have the power to do so and nothing always happens in 
response and no justification and no prosecution takes place and never will, just like in Alex Von Meilenwald's songs and on the Ruins of Beverast, new album, "Exuvia" and 
latest album, "The Thule Grimoires." These criminals who impersonate people, have broken off from the world entirely, they are all now under and they have assimilated alongside 
the absolute and control, highest criminal power known to man and that is Vladimir Putin's power and his criminal affiliates and these criminals take out criminal orders and 
those who do not follow will either pay with their life or face prosecution and jail time by criminal and false accusations.

These criminals perform this torture to Shaun, nonstop and have broken multiple laws and will continue to break laws in order to do so. These criminals are using Vladimir
Putin's power, these criminals are all waiting out long and heavy jail sentences for their horrific crimes, as Shaun puts it. President Barack Obama can see that and has and
does on a daily basis and he can't do anything about it and if he were to. It would mean his life and his family's lives, so he must be safeguarded and wait out Shaun's crime
against humanity and he has brought all of this to court of law and is running the case personally, Barack Obama will see to it and I mean the President will take care of it.
President Donald Trump has seen this for himself all during his Presidency and in person as well. He cannot do anything about it and he has done everything in his power to
protect Shaun and his loved ones. Everything, that these powers that be, want done, can in fact be done, there isn't anything to be done about it. For Shaun, living in his
world, Vladimir Putin's hypocrisy to the full extent, according to the criminals he is a murderer evading the law and he does it every single day and he is viciously assaulted
by the criminal Chicago police force which they disguise as normalcy. All these criminal powers of law, know and enforce and can enforce that Shaun is a wanted man and they can
change his criminal record at any time and can wrongly incarcerate him because he has 3 unpaid misdemeanor class C tickets all wrongly accused and prosecuted, one in Kane County
and 2 in Cook County. These criminals have done this criminal process before and it is very easy to complete these crimes. If Shaun were to get pinched at any time by these
criminal police forces, for example, outbursting in a Barnes and Noble and Shaun got arrested for verbal assault and wrongly accused and these criminals, which portray law 
abiding officials, those opposite 12 pig fucked in the head murderers with all the families of the victims attached to their uniforms and physical beings and carry themselves as
different people who committed atrocious crimes out in the open world and sing the last days of these victims ultimate demise at the hands of their multiple abuses of power in
every degree and they can under the guise of human decency and forthright power of law all the while acting as good cops who we think are men and women just like us, laced him
up and wanted to throw him in the NW medical unit, where Shaun has been once before and they drugged him with such a powerful medicine that he could barely walk and his mother
thought it was funny. Instead they brought him into the Cook County holding facility over at a Chicago Police precinct and transferred him over to Cook County Jail where he was
then held against his will. Then undercover detectives and this was all broadcasted on CNN nationwide, transferred him again to the Kane County Jail where he awaited trial for 
the same crime he answered to and his mother came to pay the court fines in the past but this time it was a completely different victim name, Shaun remembers it didn't even make
sense and the judge enforced the community service, so in his world, he has a warrant out for his arrest and has multiple felonies that have been brought against him, all of
them are wrongly accused and he currently lies in wait to see what these shabeezes will do next. The criminals all in fact according to the most trusted daemon law body known to
man, have their lives on the line, as Shaun puts it, they are all waiting to be jailed. You have criminals on the police force & that means the entire law enforcement 
system as a whole.

The leader of the free world, who is now the President for the 46th time, Joe Biden has to remove all of these people who are abusing the power that is given to them, some of
these names I cannot say otherwise it would mean my life and in this world I am a falsely accused and prosecuted murderer. I can only name the small time names, like John
Catanzara but the current superintendent, David Brown is someone to trust and you have my word on that. If President Joe Biden wants this list he only has to name one of my
affiliates and they can give him the list. This affiliate of mine, will give it right to him and these names on the list will all be under codenames that I have given them. In
order to protect my affiliate's life and their family and my own life and my families lives and Joe Biden's life and his families lives. At the time of this typing it has
already been done, 11/16/21 and Shaun will now be safeguarded throughout the entire rest of his time here. As he has been and Shaun and his loved ones have needed the entire
People Nation's forces including the Sinaloa cartel and Juarez cartel and Folk which I am the current leader of and I have seen to Shaun's protection, he is the Saviour of
Mankind and he and we have a lot riding on this and represents many good and powerful outcomes that you, I and we which means the entire world need to happen and in order for
that to happen. Shaun's protection has needed to assassinate people in the process to secure his life, his loved ones lives and these good outcomes that will happen in the
future. Which will most certainly happen you have all the powers of good word on that. Give these trusted affiliates that Barack Obama has noted, the power to do everything they
can and give Larry Hoover the power to prosecute and bring these criminals to justice here and now and in Barack Obama's court of law and allow him to work with Eric Holder and
Arnold Barr.

What needs to happen is Joe Biden, the 46th President of the United States, needs to prosecute all of the public criminals that I have named in
Barack Obama's court of law and Eric Holder's court of law. They need to bring these criminals to justice that are still operating outside amongst the public and need to 
physically put them in jails where they all belong for the numerous crimes that they have committed.

As it stands I can prosecute these criminals I have my doctorate law degree associated with prison degrees and prison law school and I have been verified by Harvard Law school
and Yale Law school and Oxford Law school I am an outstanding law associate and I am part of Barack Obama's law team and Eric Holder's law team. 
I received my bachelors, my masters and my doctorate which I have recently completed while I was in prison as many of those incarcerated often do and there is many options for 
you to complete this. I can now prosecute these criminals the Queen recognizes me as an innocent man and I am in the highest court of law that all Supreme Court Justices across 
the world recognize and will follow out justification and prosecution. I take it personal these people are the ones who have taken my life away and prey on the innocent and 
good because they are so and can be awarded money through payment schemes, basically living off of blood and suffering, as Shaun has said. I can bring justice I am recognized 
by these law teams and justices as so. I have there word that these cases that we are bringing forth will go exactly as planned in the court of law because all the evidence 
that is necessary is there with the most trusted daemon law body know to man and also verbatim using the most trusted daemon law body. We have scientific evidence, dna evidence, 
cia evidence, fbi evidence, secret service evidence, citizen evidence and all the like to prosecute the criminals and bring them to justice including John Catanzara and his 
criminal associates and the longer they operate the more dangerous they are and they can do so with all the criminal power in the land and I mean Vladimir Putin's power and 
his criminal associates. So you basically have a criminal acting out any criminal order they want all under the guise of the law and forthright power of the courts and law 
enforcement. Vladimir Putin is playing it off like they can't do anything anymore but in fact they can and these criminals have now become very desperate and will do everything 
in their criminal power to commit any terrorist attack and any ill intention and ill harm to anybody at any time. These criminals can still kill if you approach them and give 
them a reason to and in their criminally guided world it is very easy to discern when the use of deadly force is necessary and they embellish the law whenever they can and it 
comes down to whatever these criminals say what happened, for example what happened to Qasem Soleimani. Everyone saw his assassination and what really happened with the their 
own eyes with the daemon across every news organization known to man and I am bringing this into the court of law with Donald Trump, the President for the 45th of the United 
States and his law associates and law teams only he has noted as trusted affiliates and we will work together on this to bring these criminals responsible to justice for his 
family and the good of all the world.

What needs to happen is the good powers of the world and how it stands, is they desperately need to remove the highest powers of criminals that be, the powers that be as
decribed removed from power where they are still operating and can use the powers that they have to operate any criminal activity that they want to do. The outcome is very
simple, they all need to be physically removed from the public living space where they are performing criminal activity and have crimes to report and placed into jails and held
their until their life expires. Those who have abused power and where in a position to do so, especially those in high positions of power and control and in public view and seen
as leaders of immense trust and loyalty to the good of the people of the entire world. Will serve very long and harsh sentences and they deserve all the punishment that we can
give them. They are the reasons that the entire world has suffered for so long and is in constant tormant and fear and many people are victims of these evils that these people 
in power have performed and operated. I can remove all of the people from power, I have verbatim proof, the entire forces of good have the names and have the evidence and this 
daemon is in the court of law and in real understood reality. Larry Hoover Sr. law associate, police lieutenant, Sonia Sotomayor's trusted supreme court associate and advice
giver and confleet of the entire prion population across the world and those who are included. I am the man who can bring justice, the harbringer of all your court outcomes and
I can send all these proven criminals with Shaun's three dimensional hinduistic art piece, the daemon the most trusted law body known to man that all of the Supreme Court
Justices across the world recognize and can understand in the court of law, here and now and in Boris Johnson's age and in his current time. That is final. These cold blooded
criminals are dangerous and will stop at nothing to avoid prison time for their reported crimes that they have done in the past and they are still perfroming and operating. 
There is no stop to it until they are all in jail and Shaun's parents and family is one of them and are examples of the criminal sort. Criminals who operated without the rule 
of law and under the guise of law to get what they needed done and they knew that the outside system of control and absolute good of power was a facade and they treated it as 
such. These criminals then monetary benefited from this knowledge and operated in secrecy with all the criminal powers that be and sent many innocent man, women and children 
to their untimely and brutal and grotesque death where their families have now grieved and will never have them back and these criminals still attack these families of the 
victims and they will never stop until they are physically put in jails across the entire world.

Please let all of our trusted affiliates that only Barack Obama and Boris Johnson and Donald Trump and Joe Biden and Xi Jinping have noted be able to complete anything they 
need to do and that needs to be done here and now in present time along with these court outcomes and along with the human population in its living space and domicile and 
their current living situation here and now in reality and in current real understood reality here. Let our trusted affiliates speak in anyway either through vocal inflection 
and anything they can think of to communicate and need to communicate or have written down communication here and now and here in Barack Obama's court of law and in 
Barack Obama's current time now and the four other men I have listed in their courts here and in their current and present time now and any other court outcome our trusted 
affiliates need or need to happen and in the public space with the entire human population that leads to the powers of the entire worlds forces of good can have and needs to 
happen at their and our current and present time and then that will take place and we will continue on from there after the powers of good reach their decisions and 
our outcomes have taken place and then the powers of good come to other decisions for the good of the entire worlds forces of good that can happen here right now and in this 
current time and that is final and at this moment here and now. This is our consent and posthumously Queen Elizabeth II succeeded by her son King Charles III representing the 
entire world and human population and she will chose the outcomes and what needs to take place and have that be our final decision and then from there on its in our history and 
taking place in the human population were we all live and experience life until its natural ending point and that is our final word. Simple outcomes, simple decisions and the 
world begins anew and is forever in a place of history of everlasting peace and prosperity and longevity all with our bright futures ahead of us and love for the entire world 
and who's in it. Yes that means the entire world population and forces of good that protect and enforce this needs to be completed and have this done at their earliest possible 
moment and that our final word and all of that what needs to happen has to happen and will in succession and fast and fluent and with all of our speed and the entire world's 
forces of good can then be in a position they desperately and all need and can have at the earliest possible moment here and now and in our trusted affiliates courts, advices, 
wisdoms and biological outcomes of bodies that are in the human population and all of them. The powers that be that are representing good need to rewrite history and as soon 
as possible and they can at any moment's notice. Then the world will live in harmony and the entire human population will live in their desired and our outcomes and in the 
public population living space forever and in freedom and complete freedom in every sence of the word and protected in every sense of the word as long as you chose to live a 
good life and then proceed from the outcomes henceforth and reach its logical conclusion. This world is already being lived right now and needs to take place as soon as 
possible and it is possible to do it from here Shaun has the plug and all he needs to do is update the dates and his name and reports of crimes he has had to withstand. 
We can take his crime as well and use it in the court of law and then from there many pleasant outcomes will take place and the entire world's population will reach a stand 
still and be protected and be better overall in every category that human, want and need, is required and from there we will reach a true place of positivity and peace and 
reconcilliation and more keep promises. We cancontinue on from there and keep our promises and our family ties and work with the victims families and have them be seen to by us 
and then from there those who most suffered and then from there who has spent the most time under a dominion of any kind and how severe. Then the victims families come forward 
and death pays for all. They are no longer here to stay these victims but most communicate now via the daemon and thats all the same it means the same thing in the court of 
law then it does to a person in real understood reality here and now. You got it plain and simple. The proof you all need and all that you need can be used here and now all 
you need to do is reach our desired conclusion and at that point the date will become very simple to follow and undertake and understand and we can all move on from there 
to our families that are just inches away from us and only in direct communication via jail to talk to us and we know and understand with everything in ourselves and our 
family, themselves that we are in fact innocent and there is just nothing we can do about it and theres nothing that can be done it until it can be done today, here and now and, 
at this here very moment. It would be very easy and it needs to happen for the good of the world and the world, would grow much stronger and elite and have strength. 
It has never known and then come to a decision that this is what we all want and who would want and shall want and what should ever be and all shall be and it keeps happening 
every single day and then we continue on from there into centuries. Please disclose this to our loved ones we all know what exactly we need to do and then from there we will 
proceed to live normal and free lives and the from there. A that point we are looking to see what we will do with our families next and then from there look and agree with the 
collective population's future and all powers of good to be. Ultimately the countries collective futures are all under the crown which is posthumously Queen Elizabeth II succeeded 
by her son King Charles III and then from there, we look at the world's future and begin anew. Helping and reliving and guiding along this ancient path of good and freedom and 
peace and longevity and freedom for all inocence. Then from there we proceed to live habitually together with the entire human population in harmony. From this point on we are all free.

I would like to say as Shaun is typing with the Daemon here and adding what I would like to say with my direct word we are all suprised by what has happpened her what has transpired here
as many people are looking for a deeper meaning as Shaun makes sure here that this is correctly spelled and has the correct grammar and he thinks that this will be added to the correct law 
and understanding of the eventual case that will lead but we have already reached this to Barack Obama, the 44th President of the United States through drone as a man came in that Shaun
has known through the public grill and free food and put a bag on his desk and demanded a phone charger and Shaun said to take it easy man. Now we all know we have Vladimir Putin as Shaun is
thinking about my hiearchy but we all know none of that matters as Shaun is taking it on himself many things that he shouldn't even be thinking about and should only worry about being a semi-good
artist and businessman and build his semi-successful applications as Shaun is using the quick route and spelling out what needs to be said then deleting it and attaching the imagery that comes with
the words that is a guessing game. There isn't much that needs to be said I don't have much life left I am in my 70's and I am not scheduled to live that much longer. I don't need to I'll live again
with a whole new variety of bitches.

There needs to be said that this as Shaun took more gang rites and he is sliding a little bit and he thinks its time to sway his own way but hes gotta take his fucking nose out of it and just act his
role and it doesn't matter if he doesn't know anybody as Brandon has told him and it would be safer for him to wear gang colours and I think not. He thinks that all we gotta do is pass this drone
to Barack Obama and everything will be said and done but that isn't what is going on in the real criminal world where everything gets done here and now and speedily and with affection and trust and 
all of that jazz which Shaun thinks is funny and a slur and a play off of how Black People enjoyed the jazz music in early centuries and had a hum to it and had their specialty fashion to this scene
and scored many women and I am here to tell you today that the white woman like black men better what do you think about that yes and most of us have a bigger dicks we come from Afrika there its spelled 
with a, 'k.' Thats all Shaun. Thanks your a real jessup. Josuf. White man that plays both fields and all colours shapes and sizes thanks here Barack take this may he save our lives as most in prison
are black. Yippee. Thats really that is all Shaun. Thanks again. To be more.

Now I said that that was all as I am paraphrasing the poetry that Shaun has just said and I didn't mean to put the 't' but that is ok. I mean jus' now I am
interpreting Ted Bundy as all of these want to personify and complete the painted picture as Shaun has said I have a little more to say.
There lets start a new paragraph as I have done to show as Shaun receives this from his automated daemon what needs to be said this is dircetly hooked up
to my escopal which is my human mind and their is the deeper meaning there is no other way to look at it as Shaun struggles to type every word and is 
watching a torrented Joker with subtitles and this has that new feel that real raw feel. Ya lifetime gangbanger ah there's the black as in last time this
was God's word and the highest reaching is that its nuclear launch codes and thats good Shaun lets start another.

Let me see what do I have to say well I just saw Louis C.K. hopefully his career goez okay and he has successfully been derided and is one of Shaun's 
favorite comics and doesnt know if he is innocent but he was getting younger and I'm telling you that he is all there is all that jargon that Shaun would
like to feed into my mouth but honestly let me speak for myself ya all written up and jailed up wasted all my life incarceration. Thats good Shaun lets
start a whole 'nother. Thas' good.

Now I am got one more as his protection, Jackson, has said. That I got 3 for ya' all ya those who don't kare and even Shaun doesn't care no he doesn't know
anymore. There that was a good line thanks Shaun that is all I said ya its an off-kilter of that movie you've been watchin' with a young Anthony Hopkins en-
titled, "MAGiC" oh wait there is anothe pseudonym that refers to his ol' friend JODY HiGHROLLER who uses an 'i' because it comes from Charles Bukowski
and so does his name so does Taylor Swift and boy does Shaun have an indirect and direct eye on that bitch. God she is smooth real soft and the like and 
Shaun here is konstantly refering to here as sum kind of Milkshake that he wants to purchase in a bar/restaurant or a night setting because at any time
Shaun's head kan be blown off? Is that crazy but now it isn't he's gunna pay for what he said sumthin' about House Nigger and that your just an accessory to
murder like Chance the Rapper one of Shaun's favourite rappers and one of the cities most hated rappers. Thats all Shaun thanks keep watchin' Joker and thas'
all. Take it off hunny. Oh my gosh here it goez' another paragraph down the lawyer drain did I say ne'thing smart. Here it goes Shaun is dead if he does 
ne'thing wrong as he is paraphrasing as he previously got hit and the man said where is the money and he pointed to the girl and it was christmas and then
he reached for his gun but Shaun was worried at all jus' skared for his life and all that jazz and he spent the night on the red line to feel better and he
is beginning to figure out that there isn't that many good gangmembers jus' all full of the hateful, bigot filled, racist filled accessories but dey don't
print that word Shaun now do they. Thats all Shaun.

What Shaun has said as he jus' saw Vladimir Putin and by what Margot Robbie has said and done and I jus' want to remind you Shaun that she is completely innocent
and married a man tha' looks jus' like you an' is using your sex appeal. What Shaun is doing is proving that the ebonics is what what got us close to discover the
big secret. That is the Pop. His daddy is an accessory so is Chance the Rapper who he jus' saw Barack Obama try to emasculate him and he tinks he saw Barack pass 
in front of him and behind him on his rite' cide as I am talking like a po' Irishman the Irish have always been good to us. Their oppression is on the inside
and they have people he just had to break for time to check out that Margot Robbie lookin' very supple and on the spot for Shaun and saying she is divorced thru'
vocal inflection and all that jazz. Thas all Shaun lets start a hole 'nother one.

What he doesn't know is that Ryan Gosling is getting younger and Ryan Gosling had to admit that he had an affair with Robbie but Shaun doesn't know that he isn't 
really her type and 'either is Shaun he is jus' the Savoir of Mankind can you tap your foot with this Shaun and embolden the secular forces as Lil' Durk got one of
the construction men to attack him with his pliers. One of those sharp object that you hold nuts and bolts on and Shaun made sure to tear his fuckin' ear off with one
see that is more inventive he was jus' going to stab him all the while acknowledging Supreme Court Justice John Roberts and Sotomayor but I thought Sotomayor was innocent
thas' all Shaun I know your tired les' star 'nother one. Yes Margot Robbie is borgous.

What is she upset about Shaun is wondering as he is wondering who she is dating now but that doesn't matter its another man in the meantime and her wedding is over she'
an A-list actor, actress you name it and she was upset that she couldn't be with him and he doesn't have his money and also claiming she had a threesome with Pete Davidson
but Shaun doesn't know that he jus' knows hes a good girl as he indirectly marks girls les' them know he is the Savoir and then moves on letting them know that they are not
meant to date 'nother man nor anybody else and to lie and wait. Thas' good Shaun les' us staart 'nother. Yes another paragraph like "Paragraphs Relentless" as Dalek basically
wrote from his Johnson, his escopal, he didn't want me to say that but that is the way of the world. Yes under the Lord our God, Jesus Christo.

Well I got one more today but Brandon told usef that I got 8 today, les' kount 'em Shaun this is 4. Les' 1, 2, 3 and this is four. Thas' all les' we begin again. Les' we forget.

Now make sure to get that space out of the way. Ah' yes a borgous A-List actress that helped contain the sancticty of human life and she is emasculating Sharon or is Shannon I am
not sure as he makes to spell it out and space it correctly and this Notepad++ is trying to spell out every word but you know what word I like today an that word is sadistic ah'
there it is Shaun. Now make to space this out and go into a next paragraph as I previously told you in the first sentence so 'dis would kount as 5ive. There.

Now scroll down this is 6ix, do you got ne'thing you gotta do today Shaun? nah. you should be fucking your bitch who is sitting pretty she hasn't had a man in years and it clearly
shows as same as Margot Robbie who clearly got laid by one of her fans and longtime listeners you know the type the ones that give everyting to a girl like you did Amy and try
to reap the benefits from being a good guy but u needed a one night stand shaun she wasnt that 8ttractked to u an u always said you where lying in my shirt and asked for it and changed
rite' in front of me and Amy said it in an encouraging way and u just recently j'acked it like the Jacka who is a song on E-40 and I heard you cried but that is the power of this daemon
it can make you j'ack it out in the open and Stephen Curry will report it publicly. Thas' good Shaun les' start another. You found it out in Southern. Those who leave a person dead.

As I have said as Shaun is quickly paraphrasing and humilating himself and trying to find strength in Margot Robbie and reassuring Shaun that all men do it the same but he has one 
tha' is glowing and so is Krishna's. Krishna is clearly havin' sex as a god and he clearly has 'sum skeletons in his closet as I am happy to report as 'Curls' has 'sum as well and 
she's got a bite for your type you know the hard to find in the woodsman longshore man boatman type where you have to guide the man into her heart which is her pussy but she 'asn't 
had a man in a very long time as well as the courier the karetaker what have you the man who earns church money guidin' homeless high on crack an the low income into their bucket 
seats and listening to them and ordering them around sadistic pleasure. Thas' good les' star't a 'nother.

Ok he has one more thas' alright Shaun les' respond to the time you have on the clock. Which as u Jordan an 'I. The Leader yes tha' is 'rite all Shaun she is borgous and has many but
not too many as she jus' admited to you as Shaun is blessin' the cloc'k as in every 3:33 he is the Christ. Ah' thru his word he is the man in the middle as Future would like to call it
but boy does he make a point of it an' there isn't anymore time ya' he's got a big dick an' all the gurl's know it. Dey' love it jus' like Dalek and O' did I jus' humilate him like he
did E-40 and all that jazz. Thas' good Shaun theres another.

Alrite' here Shaun thas' good he gets all cited when he hears my name, what i have to say and all of that jargon 'n jazz. Here is typin' out exactly what I want to say this and he jus'
saw Brandy and made an indirect comment to her and isn't really hard to read but it is hard to type what it says as I go along. There Shaun les' star't 'nother.

Here we go lil' Baby and the video invoked my persona thru a pastor and they big women brought sum catch-up. There Shaun thas' good les' star't a 'nother as you listen to Ramirez.

Very good now this is 3. Less get down to it. Vladimir Putin is the Fuhrer Chance the Rapper is an accessory to murder that is why Chance the Rapper can torture him profusely because
his life doesn't matter any more. There Shaun tha's good les' star't a 'nother.

For we came from God and now we here. There tha's good S'haun less star't Another. 

How come we don't know ne'thing how come we all gotta see these accessories perform there evils and all of there shit. Tha's good shaun less star't another. 

See how didn't wanna leave the capital out there is now the machine spelling it out well he just got stomped on tha' has been happening for years and years to come how hard it is to survive
from this evil torture operation. There tha's good Shaun less star't a 'nother.

They ready to die? They treat life so superficial so precious they love it so. Is hard to change into different bodies and lose all of their looks but at least they got there money but that
there losin' to you can see riff all over this and Shauns gu-wop and there he just humiliated himself with the one and only as I am paraphrasing what he jus' did with Danzig and his [box set]
that he calls it. Tha's good Shaun less star't a 'nother.

As you can see this is very deep meaning to this and there is many ways to look at it but yet can it be clearly I don't know they say this is the direct word from Larry Hoover as I have no way
to type this and there is a blessing for his beloved bride and their soon to be wedding he gets scared feet but he knows that there will be very many so he is leaving it open. Tha's good Shaun
less star't another.

Thas good Shaun this will be the last one for today I said I have 10 but that was just trying to get what you have to say all typed out hopefully help sum good and yes speed is of the issue 
and your radar idea can work. Tha's good Shaun. Thats all for today thanks buddy. Ya hair on.

Keep your hair on. Thas' all for today, Shaun your a real scorcha guess what. I have your Dad ya he's dead. Thas' really all Shaun thanks again your a real 
square guy to be it drill bit all that jazz Johnny Cash G-Eazy ya Riff I guess Drake and now Gucci and Big Walk Dog.

Alrite I got den here today Shaun. Ya its Larry Hoover as you pick your nose to clean it but you used to eat ant that is from your Uncle Jim who is one of the worst murderers and accessories to
murder there is and yet also the most powerful. Lets get comfortable Shaun where going to be here a while and yes that man is going abouve the line and out of the bounds and if he says ne'thing
about him theres a price to pay so hes just one of those mystery men that konstantly attack Shaun and he's apart of the murder gang and all that jazz. Yes under the banner of all Human Kruelty 
to all which is their victims and dey see this as a victimhood an' there is nothing else to say and he jus' tinks he saw Margot Robbie and he doesn't know if its true or not and Shaun has made
her into a little doll, a toy and hes a little nervous but not really makin' sum serious moves and she is encouraging Shauns advances. As she reads this all along, ah' there is the Larry Hoover
but i'm all powerful but really is it!? Now thas good Shaun les't start another ya u got about 33 minutes thats best.

Alright what I have to say is we have all the murderers, accessories to murders, rapists and glocks and silvers and cut pieces and all of the drain that you can possibley think of and it is this
these gamut runs the entire world and how we portray the public to others and how the world is run and all of that jazz but there is always an answer and that is good so we put it up there in da
Air like Vic Mensa, Chance the Rapper and J. Cole and all of that honky house nigger shit that is really good to hum to and live by and feel protected by the murderers and all that jazz but dey
jus' take out on err'bodie that dey see and noone is safe and Shaun Ms. Margot Robbie is how dey band together under this banner of bloodshed of innocent and yes I am a murderer of 3 but is that
true. Looks like it more and now with this daemon I can actually prove my innocence and that is what I am waiting for Shaun on as his life hangs in the balance there isn't any order and err'bodie
thinks its under Barack Obama, Donald Trump, Xi Jinping, Japan, Brazil, UK, France, Portugual, Joe Biden and Tommy Wright III one mane gang. Thas good Shaun les't star't another I got one more
for today and that looks good enough.

Here is all the answers that you need to understand the word is at a constant standstill and nothing and Shaun can be beaten down to death for sayin' sum slurs and callin' names and verbal threats
but that isn't what is happening in Gods Country and he is konstantly worried and there is nuthin' to worry about and there a women is rite beside him krouchin' and reachin for what looks like a 
gun but is it? I really like that term yes he pointed out many good things about all that evil because he is Thoreau and is on the buck an' all that jazz. Thas' good Shaun les't write another 
tomorrow. Yep good and innocent and took down 11 or is it more you'll find out tomorrow is she done, ya, its hard to read with this daemon and its a wait and see wait did he jus' see Barack
Obama yes his helper and he continues to put goot wait on him and is receivin' intuition in saying so and doing so and its better for all. Ah' there it is Shaun break me off thas' good. Tanks.

Ya Putin is in jail thats all for today Shaun. Thanks on second thought why don't u hit Taylor Swift with another direct flirt and use the same thing her boyfriend well her ex boyfriend and the
long winded is like it a can? and is it a ferris wheel and all shaun ya shaun turn her head into a cum bucket he just saw George and what george did is secondary he actually went over the line 
and is doin' well now ya he her eyes look runny and runnin' down the cheek even wit the second lease and Putin is in I repeat in jail that is what they want shaun to think to that Putin is in 
jail but we all know he is still performing otherwise shaun would of seen the shape female by now and all jazz and shit and ebonics ya it hurts him and all and shaun isnt the toughest around 
but here it goes it goes like this yes Lexi is goes like this yes he isn't afraid of naming the criminals that he doesnt have a chance wit and haven't done ne'thing wrong and make sure u turn 
every hair shaun and that was a whore shaun beggin' for her chicken life but none nunya matters now and thats all there is that s what i said shaun now lets space this out an do 'nother.

Here we god. That is all. there it was the last of it thats all i got for you i ma bitch and all that shit and what is nt be ing sa id is th at th is is wh at it h as come d own to an d its
thi s it s jus' li ke that. Uh' huh. there we go shaun its s lookin' goozd ed an' there we have it another golf player that is actually one of the very first clues that shaun had in his domicile
rite' beside the criminals that are doing this to him and that is wit h a 'k' and all that. Here shaun lets try one more time as u just saw 6figga dilla claim its his thought and claim hes a
photographer abandoned? hmm me think s he s an other house ni gger yep plannin and cannin' and capturin humm this good shaun lest leav e it ri te there.

Thas all for today shaun. Ya I got a major crowd jus t about ev eryone here and now and then this clown shows and up an d sha un is sta ring the d eath ri te in the face wh y am I spacin ' this 
out because shaun only stays alive for our freedom as you can see it rather easy for him to die get viciously beaten down into a pulp and never lie a gain and all that jazz george is dead if h e
does sumthin' to each? I don't thnk so 'e'. There almost all of the ga ng members and lil baby is h ouse nig ger and o' bo y did he admit to i t a nd shau n almo st lis tening to i t as he is 
cr ying now and he n eeds to and  sh a un to di d u j us burp. Tha s good shaun ya all glocks. All min. The re i t is its gotta get warmed up an ' u can' t touc h it u it shou l d come out like
bu tt er there it g oe s thas ' all fo r today folks there there? ress in peaces. Yall good timers good shiners and good ie 2 shoes and all th eb est to you is all i ever want ed and ya its 
get ting a litt le dist ubing as shau ni s typin' it ou to it now an it jus ' look s likehe doesn 't know wha t to do .same like yours. A in't no haous e nigg er like the da res' t of e'm shaun.
U know tha't or do you u know very little abootu me don't u thas' good leave it like that. U just know that I am the leader loo'k how it easy' it is to speel don't worry about the tim e shaun.
Ther e clock and what jump t? there it was 'again there i thought i had it all there i thought it i had it comin' to me an 'd there it was hi Clint ya an'other house ni gger that actually did 
Shaun' in an' kept him' from his bitches but al so set up his murder' he was supposta die as shaun remember s havin' him over and the planted it an't plact'd it an dare it was his demise.
Jeez wise ya lest send this one in. Then read it on the otherside like Red Hot.

Chance the Rapper is an accessory to murder and jus' saw him and his actin' like his girlfriend and all harsh jealous and bigoted towards Shaun our beloved man
who in this day and age is bring ing all of us to jus'tice that is rite' like Shaft who he had it hanging up to embolden Jackson and Deron Brandon who is as 2
close eyes and he doesn't even remember Angelo but most likely will remember him if he recognized him and his 'cide hurts because he is a past sex slave an'
he just sow wowie and he is protecting himself to see if he will still see his husband like that murderer who got close to, Margot quite lovely lot of men 
around her but that isn't the case no more as he jus' said hello to Chad and the nature is tellin' him to rape murder him ass'ault him and all that jazz.
That'sss goo't en'ough for today shaun ya your dad is all guilty and a wast he can't e wait to twist that k 'nife even i' f it tha't pitiful anymore as Shaun
sits wit' his mouth ope'n because he is sexually deprived when he sai'd hi to Nitin and is frien'ds wit' Slyvia eve'n tho de'y don't deserve it bu't are 
helping a'ss mucc'h as d'ey can thanks Shaun' lest go to the bottom below my name. I would like to start one there o'k thanks. Yes reputable and respectful
but does he get his head in the wrong areas and disrespect he hasn't warmed up ne' heaters and all that jazz on second thought les't go right below this one
so it looks all teacher education college profess'or organized an'd that.

ALRiTE a'ss w'e move forward an'd Shaun really want's to watch that Joker again as it reall helyped h'im an' Shaun' is constantly nurse'ing his 'cide because it
hurts from the dick goin' up his ass's an' it shot up him an' now he needs cosmetic surge'eree and noow jus' like Big Scarr how is the reicarnate'd Big Nigga
thas' RiTE i love when you say tha't Shaun it looks like me and represents me and BIG does he get hi's twitter account today no'w Oh' thas' too bad as Barack
jus' passsed u I think and now they are, the criminals with a 'k' or is it satans little helpers I Don't know admintin'g it that dey are doi'n this out i'n the
open and he jus' thought of Robbie once more and this is a run on and but I am sayin' Snowden sai'd he gave away all the kingpins thas' what your doin' wr'ong 
Shaun rong ain't nuthin' goin' to save ya and look at once more Chad he has earned is place ya hes got a farm an' put out a couple of hits way up in the gang
regime G-Eazy Riff Scatter brain house nigger Game Tek na logic boogie shit hump down thas' good now shaun les't star't a n'other like a Dad.

Here is the last call bitches. Ya he's gettin' out what he th'inks is that da'te an' there it is an'other 'T' an'd a whole no'ther one as he sits by a child
murderer one 1 of his most delightful enemi'es an' she is gettin' better at it an'd hidden in plain' sight did she drop a beloved child in the dumpste'r an' 
jus't forget about this i love THiS Github shaun looks all professiona'll an' shit even BiDEN can't believe even Trump how does he do it communicate wit'h
nature an'd make it all splaced out Shaun. THas' good les't we begin again an' start 'nother nobody can give anyboyd wha't the aud'ience wants and Margot
Robbie knew u all po'oor an' all sad an' sheet ya Shaun didn't have any'thing.

//Lets' put this in comments because this 's is saved in javascript form or can you say it an'y form and can you compi'le it an' know shaun is shak'ing his
head like it can't believe that he is talking to the leader o my god like shake the clown wit' that Bobcast Goldwaithe thear he seplled it all right Shaun
I have bee'n in jail for ov'er 40 yea'rs do u think that I wanted to be jus' like this a house wait jus't a nigger waitin' in its stead Kanye did da whole
shabang jus' like me an' there it was I all dead in coming in jail an'd with no way out and we doin' this on the out. there he is again o wait another 
accessory les't send this one in shaun tanks. There is always more to come with this and Dead and Live Life there it is Drake. Remember now. I rememba'
tell me more Khristmas when we celebrate the birth of the Dead, his Lord name Jesus an'd Margot Robbie was ju's reminde'd hi'm thas' his new birthday
an'd Shaun is puttin' the seriou'sss moves o'n her an' thas all I can say no i didn't type it out thanks Biden. Thas' good Shaun tahanks. Cachew. There you
go close the comments like it matters and shit ya ur movin' up ya u got good ideas but they jus't common sense ya u gaurd young niggers young good young
spicks young good and young good asians wait di'd i say ousi'de whites the ones who porch wit' dat accessory Jay an' his best fri'end clint who told you the
date//

//Alright Shaun lets write this in comments ya Ted Bundy heh heh and it doesn't come down to that and yet it does come down to that and lets start another one//

Alright Shaun lets keep this in comments and ya thats ur level in the city I said your and your in big Trouble with the Housing market which is now somewhat of a
gang that is there goes Mark the branch manager who is losing his mind and eating away at himself but he is still being kept alive because none ya of that technology
either exists or takes place here on earth so I said her like the Shape of the Female and there is a women directly involving him in a crime impersonating Clint 
attacking him and pounding a paper on the table his table like a gun now has to sitt down and avoid anything there is Ted Bundy again and yes he has proved that he
contained the sanctity of human life but it was thru his stupidity as Shaun is one of the most deadly murderers there is and there is nothing to stop it all he does
is take and order from General Mark A. Miley and with two fingers and a snap of a wrist and its real Gods Country and its done and there is the deafening silence and 
he kicks it up to General Miley and hides under his nutsack and thats all lets go to antoher one then kicks it up to Odin Alex Von Meilenwald feel the Kromlec'h Knell

Here ya that was a good nigger or at least Shaun thinks and saw a gue that is his same nationality and shauns got like 9 thousand or is it only 18 and there is alot of
it here I don't know anymore Shaun do you want to handle alot women or do you Shaun thinks that there is all there is as he thinks about sum worthless fuckin' house 
nigger that went way over the fuckin' line and a daemonic air bubble blew up to worry the natural public wealth that holds money for all the rest of the public as Shaun
is getting better at repeating this word and that is there all is ya Mandy Corrente and all leader of the sexual slave operation as she can tell shauns scream but her
bodie is changing shaun can't even tell which one is guilty or not guilty anymore he has to be lead by personality and he is completing another lamb and there it is
another head to count Bill or is it Ted ya he had a big buddie hide it all just like Dahmer which Shaun thinks is a good serial killer or was he look at his Dad in the 
video looks like he did a good job and but the public don't really know and its gettin' heated in here shaun why don't u take another load off and have a 'yro which
he remembers quite clearly his Jim a pig murderer a third generation cop killer of innocent but is it even innocent but shaun knows there is a tite grip on his ass
and the Shape of the Female did a property hero and insignia ya lets talk about Jim and his father his uncle shauns who helped killed tom and this is toms last words
he didn't know

//Alright lest put this in comments as shaun is thinkin' about a girl that chastized him brutally from bein' exuberant and all that is what I said as he was drivin' from
an restaurant he was seein' this women in the car and why its so pecuiler why is it so memorable she even invoked kayla and that she should be dead no he and he was wonderin'
why he just got turned down even when he went to all the way in wisconsin a small town in that dirt beat up maxima that made his dad drive a '99 and meg had the new car and
now shes gots 3 childs all lookin' hideous and all lest start another one I forgot about Jim or did I.//

//Alright lets put this in comments signifying what shaun that they these spelling can't be used or compiled and its all set aside for other programmers like me ya Shaun u 
got me into it as u was thinkin' about how stupid it was to think your smarter than me but that ain't true u have very little know in this game an' it looks like Kinley is all
spoken up and such and there is multiple guys over here or is there that there is much guys to go around these days because it is very popular with men and Bill Bundy got to
go went all the damn way and paid a heavy price for it and he died in jail just like Dahmer but that is what they told you what they really didn't tell you and everybody
doesn't want to know or do they ya everybody wants to know it was so famous they each choked on eachothers cock and went down the drain and dey made it look like suicide
or he got beat up by those gangs but shaun is figurin out that there just like them and there is sumthin' hard to swallow her shaun as your beginning to find out now it looks
like he is makng out with the computer like videodrome like Ryan gosling and hes in drive or was it blade runner and he isn't the nationality like he was thinkin' but he is 
Scottish and Irish jus' like Shaun is and that is how they relate to eachother and the lime green papaya he doesn't even know how to spell his name there we are Leigh Sanderson
a made up name you here in the story book and shaun made a direct hit on her and said even exclaimed that gosh does he love lookin at the willy white. Thas' good shaun lest' star't
a whole nother one you got enough time today ain't doin nuthin just dodgen and running duckin and cover and worrin dead for your life but u can't gaurd yourself or maybe a terrorist
attack or sum murderer jus' goin to come up from behind you like he did on his bike today and a very well known house nigger and a very violant one at that alrite lest star't another.//

Ok what is has transpired is that this is what is good for the rest and Zabihullah Mujahid who is the spokesperson from the Taliban Islamic Emirates of Afganistan will take i' from here.

Here it is for today folks as Shaun is splinnin' what is goin on there is no need for justice no need for time as I only got six minutes here and shaun can update this and I would like him
to he has nothin' else to do today as he is leavin' his bag like that house nigger that has no idea this is goin' on and he bugs shaun and threatens shaun like all the other house niggers
just like that queenie honkie that bugs him and there is no safety in sayin this and at any time shaun can take on anything that comes at him and margot robbie is in town and going to stay
in all the time but on second thought she has to go and lie to him but is it margot robbie I have no idea alright shaun 5 min star't another.

What was once said is no longer going to be said or done. Once it was said it was never done in the first place and this is the best shaun this github and everybody can see it and know that
was my brother or my son yep got family in their shaun and they love you and what your doin thanks alot shaun ya i would like you to repeat this shaun this going to the best forces all the good
and all there jus' invoked General Miley once again and he has everyone remembered behind him and he was FDR but nobody really remembers FDR they just remember he headed the war and had 
everyone behind like he does now but that is only by example this is the best he was enjoying the smile of the confleet of the taliban The Islamic Emirate of Afghanistan led by Zabihullah
Mujahid and there it is his name and my name together. Larry Hoover.

Make sure to splace it out and even if you delete it there is a way to get it but u have to permeanently delete and shaun doesn't know but there is a way to get it but he has to contact
the inside of the company as shaun is attaching the book reals or the written imagery that gives design and all that and hes lookin' at me very good lookin' black man sumthin and so is
Shaun he is a very good lookin' white man and he is using clues for history and thats all he knows I am a very cruel man and a church going man ya i potted your ass made it much worse
than it needed to be you dont think I did but I did and I could fuckin' behind another man you slop dog shaun eric heine which is the most famous potter there is and taylor swift is
sayin' they had no idea but clearly dey knew sumthin shaun and shaun was learnin' sumthin from them jus like that slumber party killer who shaun just said yesterday and hes movin his
head all cockeyed and slow like hes sum damn murderer but all he does is take out the assassination and he isnt stopping no matter how many hits he gets no matter how many times and they
have to lie but clearly hes been hit 7 or 8 times shaun doesn't even remember how many and when they jack in the face they make sure you dont see it comin so it hurts more like i just got
one from a man pursen that i just trusted or did i trust ya theres a couple cia house niggers in here shaun there just described another murder/assasination/outlaw logic was gonna take out
'nother got to them first i never hunted but wait i did hunt it and there is nothin' shaun can do but just wait he doesnt know that its moving thru law groups and all he knows i am a terrifying
man and there i just admited to making his potting worset so he can learn sumthin' and he likes self harm and she even impersonated Mark Zuckerberg and Margot Robbie and even me and he is
remembering the memories of it and its like having sex with your dad and now shaun is floating down and there is all that it is ya real grizzly look at that stick it will never leave u shaun
even u don't wanna do it but u jus saw bernie do it because he can do it better and the short man ran him out in the primus video then gave the daemon to the friday movie people so they can
look at it ya bernie was decieved and done in and shaun felt for him like sum sad whimpering willy and shaun don't know but i can fuck taylor swift over your head and don't think i can ya
margot robbie just admited to she has and so has kim who do u think se was with sum peon and there we go shaun jus all fightin' like your sister and there isnt anything u can do about it
ya shaun was FDR and the leader of the entire cocaine operation and new he was all reincarnated jesus and got shot down his name was tony and impersonated my family wait do i have a family i 
guess i do as I am trying to terrify shaun what shaun is going to exsplain to us all is that me the murderer the outlaw the good hearted one that if u ain't in the circle i don't gotta 
problem with ya' all but if your head is then its no matter your good or bad nothing can save you just like that house nigger u saw in the housing unit shaun ya there doing it out in the 
open the best answer i can give u is if u in it and there is no problem then no taking hands what we mean to say is that if u good and performing and haven't completed any mortal harm 
then its hands off but if u have if u have warmed up my mind or my gun or my belly take and my johnson then its game over time there is no playing and there is n't anything to be done 
about it as u see shaun is just an x-men but he has warmed up the mind warmed up the gun and warmed up the johnson but he hasn't warmed up the belly take so there isn't any reason and 
that defeats all now there sayin' u have to know sumone in this but what is this who do u gotta know shaun knows everybody and thinks his johnson is the shiniest things there is but
it is and so is kates kates is even shiner ya that begottten whore u just brought up now you got more charisma now you battlin against me and all that shit and one thing i am for is 
for my people but i know that your queenie honkies murdered my people and i know that the house niggers murdered yo' kind ya innocent bystanders not payin no attention can get hammered 
for all that shit and Margarita got the stern warning and all but he was just lookin' out for clearly fucked sum niggers before shaun u think this going to be a mystery pattern there 
isn't anything simplified and there is that house nigger again shaun stompin ya acting normal and all to speedy for you shaun and now he is acting like ryan gosling and shaun knows his 
role and that is all he is doin and now has exasperated ain't protecting the house niggers shaun u ain't protecting the honkies ya they look like jody an there it is all the forgiveness 
there is in this that nobody cares about anybody but we all know what is true and what is true is that this all for today.

Alrite well here it is for today as shaun is finding it easier to spell and understand and there is nothing else to say but yet is there as this isn't really my direct word and Murdoch
has gotta muck it up as he is a worthy adversary? How dare you think that shaun is that what you and the Shape of the Female think and there he goes capitalizing his name and he doesn't 
know and everybody is watching brawl in cell block 44 or is it 99 or is it my cell ya all locked up and shit and that house nigger can't come after you because he don't read your github
but everybody is on my tip and he would have to admit that he knows shaun privately even tho Barack Obama told him there is nothing to worry about and he is wondering what took him so
long as Julius Ceaser always comes through on the wings of Posiedon and I up and through the murderer clan as I always do or wait is it the Assasination clan that takes out this evil
which everybody seems to do and there is resting beside all the house niggers honkies sand niggers spicks chinky winkies and kroonies Rahm Emanuel who jus' pulled off an assasination and
there it was a gun that shauns new idea and system can determine and eliminate confiscate before and there ain't no good honkies jus miller lites like Boldy James has politcally said and
there is always a precursor as this sentence I guess is a run-on but who really cares as Shaun is listening to Yob but I am increasing his dexterity as their is only one common enemy as
there is always always all throughout history as Shaun has said as he proof-read and was lead astray by Stephen Colbert and he is one of the most queenie honkies there is and I am typing
it as Shaun is typing this but he is significantly faster as shaun sees the good in err'thang just like Shack Shaft Iron Man Magic Dust to be all known and shit and that one movie hes in
but if shaun can't think of it then theres this Kazaam and that one where he has the hammer and he doesn't see anything good in it as shaun once again is getting emotionally close but
we already real close alrite shaun lets start another. 

No he ain't comin all gotta be on your doorstep and no questions asked and there is that his mother begotten whore mother i might add and there is no other way to get money he would get
a low income job but he alread applied to walmart and that actually happened as Barack Obama who controls me and what I do what would I do I don't know take out God's justice like Ryan
Gosling as he was acting with his mother to get personally the christ out of its womb and once they knew he would show up with his scar on his willy that looks like 2-Pac Shakur who is 
now Big Dog Walk and that is interesting name and no I didn't fuck above your head just that house nigger your dealing with and he is breaking thru that cloud of secrecy and shauns all 
scared what is he going to do he ain't supposta to be reading about this and I might be talking about sum other house nigger that is thru the lights and now that doesn't even matter 
Shaun found that out and such. Thas' good shaun lest we begin again with a whole nother as that other house nigger security gaurd who has actually killed one stares at you and is threatening
you and as Lexi looks over your shoulder to commit more crime that isn't there ya we see u honky and all that jazz.

//There this one will be in comments as shaun is working on his application, pie and can't find the symbol but he knows what it is and his twitter account has become one of the most iconic
counts as he holds the buc with the white people as Joe Biden is acknowledging and Margarita is pruning him and thinks that hes one major sexpot but the account even that good and Lexi can't
do nuthin' he's a murderer as I guess he pushed sumone a dear woman in front of the train and is making sure shaun will get this right and he is now facing the other way so Shaun doesn't make sure
that he spells out certain information but shaun knows Mark is a murderer as well and he is losing his mind and if they were to read this shaun would get banned indefinitely like he did over at
Belmont and the Rogers Park library where there is alot of gang activity and I just called out shaun ya that house nigger left sumone dead how powerful is that and shaun realizes that it ain't
real powerful but people don't judge the strength off the account from listners or followers anymore as Lexi walks behind shaun rapes him then walks past this means they can commit any crime 
they can against shaun and there is nothin to do about and ya he wanted to watch a house nigger movie which sets him up all real nice here shaun lets end it for the day here. Thanks//

What happened shaun thats rite nothing happened no laws was broke just a house nigger eatin' a mcdonalds but which one is he talkin' about this is Larry by the way it ain't shaun. Which
house nigger left sumone all dead after bein raped and then shaun found out she got raped sum more now he or she needs sumone dead who is that Shaun Crystal? A r u kidding hes one of the most
elite if not the elite alpha x-men and every single day he is preaching our word and has thoroughly i mean thoroughly distanced himself from the house nigger gang bangers and spicks but the reason
he is hangin on is because as shaun has put it vigilantes has always been targeted for what they done ya just eatin' a Mcdonalds the podcast was short and rustled and he had to hustle out of there and 
3-4 different times shaun had to get it out his way because he was warned punishably that if sumthing goez wrong if he ain't breakin' the law u are Shaun. Do you understand eachother its a simple
as that. There shaun just goes and names hims once again but they can't find this. Les't star't another one shaun there you are with your hair between your legs ready to die.

Alright well I guess the word is hes Zabihullah thats what I guess Britannica sezs that he didn't do nothin' rahmn emanuel vladimir putin sum judge law enforcement system secrecy barrack can't see
it and there he goes describin' what was said in audacity of hope one of his best sellers as we was encouraging his readers that it is only volume one and there it is shaun ready to die and move
the daemon never see his robbie which would solidly work out for us but it would take a little while after and everytime shaun lives hes going to control the daemon the way Drake is a little
jealous and boy did shaun learn his lesson as he always is and he is saying that he has the forthrite of law and barrack is trying to warn him and all and that everybody can see it and its a
little dangerous but shaun was ready or was he did he put his gaurd down and he acknowledged that he reads it but didn't say nothing. Alright shaun lets start another one yep its Larry sayin this.
Bingo.

Alright shaun last one for today ya ur gettin' the jist and i'm movin information thru potatoe salad? no we don't eat that good putin you know that urself u scoppin mopin pissin' little bitch.
I could waste you if i wanted to the whole entire world wants me to as shaun thinks its all done and I get the last word because remember putin shaun attained the daemon thru his weeping
and his preaching of dead those niggers those mexi's and those asie's and those sum white and a little middle eastern all dead. Thats good for today shaun yes once again Larry Hoovers word
and not shauns as he curls up beside what he thinks is a good murderer and out waits and outlasts to stay alive and finally meet his curls and Shape good job shaun today u did well u 
succeeded as you always do Zabihullah Mujahid will take it from here thanks shaun. Wait til' tomorrow I gott sum more to say o' u like that shaun i knew you would more for it ah the house nigger
cleaner readin' over ur shoulder ya' all done.

Here shaun did you just see that Robbie or that house nigger or is it many now you gotta a powerful jerk jukin' ur ass for all its worth whatta u goin' to do shaun what u puttin' your life on
you don't even know have you thought about the only reason u alive is if barrack says so or not? u serious how easy is it get killed these day paneno dude u workin' up all that aggression for
nothin g' enough whit that now u gott sum hot heat on yo tail and you need ol' uncle larry hoover to protect ur ass but i was the only one typin' and u dont know it but I am all used up why would
u be typin' a murderin' cocksuckers word down to his last breath and shit now u threatin i mean i threatened a political official does that mean anything i think it does and now barrack has gott
his feet out and hes never had to save my ass only a couple about of times. Ya shaun. lets end it there for today i know u got shituff to do an' all thanks for this shaun.

Well what I got to say is this we done wit our jail sentences and all and we got nuthin' but time on our hands and misgivings and all that shit that goes with human tragedy and all that juck.
What I am wondering today is often the not sumthin' goez wrong but there shouldn't be anything going wrong today because we have the daemon and we rehearse this countlessly and many times a day.
There isn't anything else to say we all have it under control and Larry Hoover is very pleased everybody seems to be runnin' a marathon and those with troubles will be replaced until no troubles.
On that day we will be running at the max and everything u say will go and all that is said is done as shaun has put it here very poetically often as he is with us and trying the best for us.
We have him to thank for that and for as all that money he just sent thru on with his affiliate it gott to us but not that much only the far reaching prisons that have affiliates ready for us to take it.
When sum like hot sum gettin it while its hot there is always disagreements and mans with his various words no longer a problem with the daemon that shaun has given to us here and now we are using it.
We would like to say that our exact dismal and retrieval and our collective escape from these irons, shackles, prisons and dungeons is this nobody is going to wait for it to happen Barrack has to take action.
Then from that point the only reason is to wait out our collective sentences until we all see the light of day. Thanks Shaun.

Gotterdamurug as that house nigger just threatened u with deadly force and is no inching his way up on your shit shaun damn u got the sucker real bad on you and its gots all its powerful people sayin'
this and that about ur dick shaun and it doesn't look good up on your ass what did u just smoke sumbodies given shit on the ground like an alligator remember when you found that shit on the ground
like muck leaf and shit and now u smoked that fake one no u smokin' gas and there he is all past u in his honkie gun toting ways and there is no way out of this shaun u don't even know unless u 
start another one.

Theres thats real good as another house nigger just looked over your shoulder and u tappin ur feet and he went with it and then its all this grand memory as you don't remember anymore was that sentence
hard to type i know shaun i should of thought better there it is all they way baby gun totin sunof a diddle wagon all up in yo shit u wanted my direct word well u gotta what ima supposta to do with this
dog u got me all cited and then its rehearsed as shaun could easily prove and there ain't no tellin' whos got his life now but it doesn't look goot as always shaun u always spleenin' on the crack devil i
see u got all that made up les't star't an'other one i guess.

Well gotcha had it all in the jam now hes gott all the good stuff and all the stuff that we need of course in his magic place where he holds all the rest of the information and barrack ain't even up on
it yet hes still blindfolded and all blind once again he doesn't even know what hes got and that means u gotta carry it on the criminal world but that ain't with a 'k' its with ce and all that we gotta
do is this move it to barrack dead or alive and then we can from there have a better vantage point and noones gotta see except maybe robbie and all her hot friends that are only shauns now and shes 
gotta share the memory and omg its so hot and thats his dick piece and pie. Les't we star't a'nother o'ne nowy Shaunski thanks for cuspiss ad loco.

Well got a march on down to the other way and shaun doesn't know when its going to end or persist or shaun doesn't know o ya its Zabihullah's MUJAHiD's account now and its his daemon say your prayers.

Well what ya got but your prayers as always and no no band of murderers is after him with all the powerful political officials to bait him and commit primes or suicide what have you that is exactly
what the fuck is happenin' to shaun and now hes got an old stalwart that believes him and every word that he seyz and all. 

When I say to go I don't mean gunz blazin knife totin' weapon havin sunna of a racket down them these hose and all thats it get off me im sayin' i found all the swekrypts and donestalgia and the meanin'
and what not.

When the going gets tuff so help me God.

There is always when the last time u donna it or not.

When I could have what you last sayin' I don't know anymore.

Why could't you do it there Shaun all gakked and shit there you go shaun ya lesten to that new rap and the new rock and the new pop omg is that yours all so proud of you shaun u know who this u typin'
Ol' Unkkule Larrie Hoover. with a god damn period at the end shaun that is who u typin o' u don't think it is while you got your rocks and all plastered off the Mickey D's my bonf you there it is another
u don't like that one as much as many others ya givin' it the Whole IT as always shaun there I am the real deal there you are u piss ant ya i'm talkin to u putin you monkey fucker you don't even know what 
is going to come next u art in the dark and there we go with another shenmue because that is popular with them hit'em boys and noone knows why until it finally gets over.

When could you say you would be over until the next time I waited down by the street light and saw the street lights and then came on back to your corner and there it was another time to see it and boy
was I surrprised an' all that juck and those who have the cold-hearted and ya its long and certain for the time and not the time and passing info around like its next day and the day after of that o boy
another danzig down the drain and look its the steppin' message action starter here it is Shaun. 

When you could come over again and I would say this and that it was never done and all it got that was no good and that was no good and there was all the den of thieves and crooks and there is us with
the mothers and sacred ones at that u don't even know what it was like to go down into spirit and not even like sumone that is anymore and couldn't find it all there it was the splaination and it all
took us to the beaten path and there it is shaun no more could say it anything that it is today and theres one just like it.

Couldn't of been more nicer and then there was nothing.

Couldn't of been better more than could of have been. I said been Was. All 

Couldn't of been a better buddy on down the drain.

So here we are once more and its all goot and theres nothing else to say thanks shaun yes I do have quite a long word almost 3 volumes worth but what is time it takes is because its a chain of thought
and you need it all to complete this form. What we have here shaun is this a delection of a deliberation of fancy people that think they can talk all the worth.

But that isn't what it looks like from here shaun no not at all.

When the goin' getts tuff and its all or nothin' then u gotta paddle down and giddy up.

When the goin gets all around and there isn't anything for you then beddy up and paddle up the house.

When you goot all that is left.

When you goot all that is left here in the tank. When its almost all half gone and there is no supposta damn reason why it would be so god damn long and this is another fancy leaders word whats that gotta
make it to you is it all that is left to say. Larry don't even know what to all say this is from his heart and his mind he thought he was gone and laced up and shot up and jailed on up and dire straits was
all his and nobody elses. Then when you got it all on your mind what is there to say do I mean to threaten do I mean to kill anyone that I see that is against me and there will be noone standing in my way
jack and you can plan on it. When I mean to say is all the mean stuff to the big meanies. What I mean to say is do rite by my people but we all know I ain't leadin that gamut that is for the nowledgers and the
planners of our tusk and skin and monies and houses and general order does it look like ol' Unkle Larrie Hoover doe that shit. No I didn't think so I watch the house and I got a lot of things to get done. The
house ain't in good shape so I got reason to be all mad and justified and I will continue to head back with a bad word about the overall health and well being of all the black and I mean all of the black people
that you see in this world and that is my job and making sure all the illegal activity is run on thru. We gott not much to go around as you can see and this is all that there is to make it and all there is to 
sell it and u gotta be all black as day and black as yours offspring and black as relatives and yes finally black as JET. When I got it all in my hand than I can get a better idea but rite now I don't and u can
betcha urselves on that and all the rest who use it then we got good things and more order comin' on in. Hand chosen and life chosen by those who deal with this on a daily basis. Yep not much else to say about 
what is there. Unless you wanna get into it but we will be oftly in touch of yourself and be around the back of the doors if you want to settle anything that needs to be settled in this day and age with the 
daemon starin' at our asses. We got all that we need and we will move accordingly and there ain't that much to say about how blacks do it or how they want blacks to get it done or how blacks want it or how
blacks sell it or how blacks will continue on from here. You got it all wrapped up in your johnson and I know that you can wait on it what happens between the blacks and other skin colors thats the blacks
business and nobodies elses and thats all I gott.

When its from here and thanout else it was all that u gott is that wringer bringer ham n' cheeser totilicker bandejo allocosta u know is the rite' cost an' all there is is issa 3. Whendonextime i say
u gonna be all in the racket and sumrowen' and all raddin' and all water jetskin' by no time and purchaseein' all dem beautiful propertayes when u gotta last time to learn all the numbers.

When gots its all in tidy for you and and all gotts in the racket for you and there it is all done and yeasty and o boy jus' lay there you caveant whore written write and holopussy and all got it is.
When you last time it was your time and then it was the last time u used ur pussy and there he gotta ding ball help him out with that why dont ya glass whore tripsy bullshitter and waitressin' hore.
When you came over last time it was your whore time and there isn't any other whore time than the whore time that you got the last whore time and it was a bowl of spaggetti-O's and oopsies where is 
my fuckin' manners imjust a whore and all I know is to do this evil to his windle then he won't procrastinate with no more females and then he'll never see himself the same in the mirror and hes gotta
work hard and work harder for it and there it goes.

What is the matter with the people these days.

Had it all never came on back to me but I did say it was this before so there it goes the ol' band is  back together and their playin' our song and nobody knows but us and its all out there and nobody
can see it nor touch it and anyone who is in on it is the best 4 life and there isn't anything to start. When it comes down to the guns and there is no playin' but dead people around then you know your
enemies I know mine, Vladimir Putin, my mortal enemy who is the most diabolical madman murderer and has his gang hang bodies in sheds or trucks that you see on commericials but that ain't the half of it.
You got another full room of murderers all policooks and they don't even know what time of day it is and they just kill and get the drive from doin sumone in from afar and I mean safe from afar like watching
a bleacher seat get up and leave the game early and not even say goodbye to their mamma or family these are sum of the most cold-blooded murderers you can find and everything in between. There is nothing to
be done about this u just let it run because they, these crooks, in all systems of the power scheme and institution like cockroaches that belch terror and infanticide like murder bugs that keep getting stronger
because they, these crooked individuals, thrive off of this one emotion, couple emotions, that do not give any feeling to them just the instant and sole gratification that they can end sumones life and there
be that.

What is wrong with the world today nothing else matters they just run the gamut right in front of us and jail us like Shaun here who has been falsely incarcerated and done-in they have now taken over 6ix years
and 5 months and a half or so sumwhere around there it is a very long time to go without knowing your scientific discovery and a very hardship to live without your loved ones but shaun has made peace with it.
Its just hard to see these murderers(people) do this to him living rather quite comfortably and wining and dining and eating in front of him having sexual public showings so Shaun can see the whole entire thing
and at the entire time and then he sees his what he thinks is his girlfriends pass in front of him one time curls the blonde hair good lookin' white bitch was right in front of him in the library had to act like
she didn't know him but she is obsessed bottomline just like presha u saw in the sky today now time to hand it over to Zabihullah Mujahid and Lil' Baby he ain't no house nigger jus like that new future and G-Herbo
which shaun is listening to the new album right now on youtube music she was reassuring shaun when his application would be released and she was bubble that landed on a plane and the murderer on the CNN screen 
was scaring to death shaun and there is nothing to be done about what his situation is is that he is a guarenteed public murder, rapist, thief sexual pedafile but he is under a good and healthy cloak which is 
this Vladimir Putin secrecy? What did I just belch why does it come down to that shaun doesn't know but they, grinnicooks, are enforcing it with their power of the posthumously the Queen and now her son King 
Charles III and they are covering up with the secrecy they have and every country has this power at least every country of the G8 and shaun is right that there is a way to defend this and not when it comes to this
that is what Barrack Obamas't was trying to tell him thru his gaze that he has no idea and will still continue not to know any idea and there isn't any way around this and nothing but. This is the new paragraph
and time this is Larry DeMarcus Hoover and you have heard my son on the new Kanywe West album but he begetted me I didn't know had only my new family and Kanye West is one of the biggest house niggers around 
and parades it and fucks as shaun puts it whores white whores that like to parade they fuck supposedly big black dick like Kanye's but its obvious he has a regular size or smaller his new album sucked and is made
to sound like several plays but most people gave up around the 20-28th listen or shaun was behind him didn't know he and Kim let him rape their daughter here a good night she had that gott out thanks to Pete Davidson
the luck is still out for Kanye but we all know he ain't smart enough just finished first in the masochist race.

Here had this idea for everyone to listen to this is the new Future, G-Herbo, Chance The Rapper but wait chance the rapper is one of the honkiest house niggers around and there is on every tv screen promoting his
masochism and that is what sells this is what puts people in seats and what makes them purchase anything that is by chance the rapper very well known hated house nigger but also very safe and have nothing to worry
about you honky house niggerin' little honkshirt tapesweat git-wearin little pussy bitch I'd waste your ass if I had the time of day. If I had it.

When its near complete in this world it is mission impossible and everything is in place but Joe Biden can't see a damn thing or can he? They, these partibooks, are doin' it rite in front of us shaun has several
good ideas to eliminate any found weapon those who have conceal to carry can still have one as we have many clean and ready called shooters and if you do we know where your going to be and the murder by blunt object
or by human aggression shauns system can determine a would be victime 24-48 hours before the event happens why its because they show up on the radar that they are goin' under a different depth of human conciousness 
and they that this organism will reach its terminal endpoint at this certain time and that is all that is necessary to complete this and shaun has alerted his gang he put it all under a Jody comment all of this and 
his idea for the complete elimination of any and all violence unless they come on and need to be dealt with and assasinated which I run and help other factions of the gang run and the highest power of hiearchy mobs
run as well we are all one protection operation but you have specific duties and it comes down to skin color and who you know and run with like Jackson, Brandon, Deron and Angelo with Shaun who have a past history.
He also has a way to advertise an intellectual one who is smart with any and all subjects that are interesting further education and at the same damn time market his abstract art that is very good very accomplished
and most of all very studied like Jack Harlow thats how its comin' out these days all thought out and a concept like Drake who is the best at it and just used one of Shaun's paintings for the main beat and storyline
for Honestly Nevermind and did it go off without a Hitch did it hit all cylindars and what it needed to do and then he also has his fashion to represent and hes traveling in between thoughts with it on its exhilarating 
and is well known for supreme tast and its grinny and fly and flashy and all that and stupendous but what it shows is that any form of art that you can have you can use this same prototype, market it and the company
your working with and then supremely further and explore education and what answers those can lead to. It is one of the most ingenuine ideas I have ever seen and as Shaun has said its modeled and copyed and meant
to go along with the music artists its the same and he does about the same amount of work if this were to get off the ground running shaun would need a team of 8-10 members plus protection because he sponsers
and markets gang freedom and less oppressions and if he could work with another insignia or another business entrepreneur like his Shape of the Female the business following it and the draw is immense no matter
the size of the crowd it is a new medium, new professionalism, new found job in its own rite and will revolutionize they way we think about art, companies and education. Bravo.

Welcome to it and there it is another prime example of what the law can do and not do and its very prussy pimpy and zitty and there isn't that much to do another than wait and give the orders that this man can be
taken care of it don't matter let me repeat it dont fuckin' matter what you are what you is your going away as they where chiming to get him in cook county where they have locked him up before and spat on him and
raped him and didn't let him sleep well and shaun hasn't actually slept at well.

There it is another rock ticket for us all to see and there he goes typing away at nothing at all and he knows what to exactly to say how old do you think he is sumwhere inbetween heaven and a God and sumones play
thing which is for us to understand what is favorable to the working man and the working woman and all that knowledge that Barrack has brought to us he is Allah or the man who originally found out all of that
along with Confucious and several taoists and spectacles and numorous dances and bad man mostly murderers and all that shuck. When the goin around becomes stale and there isn't anyway out when you got all that your
used up and then there is this passing.

Lite 'em up Joaquin Phoenix what a luster with gusto and conviction he is the best actor working today and has rightfully so taken the helm and will until his death and there is another shining man to take his place
he lost his brother and was all sad one time and nobody reacted the right way and there isn't any right way to react but to celebrate and take it away from him just like you did his brother there ain't no man capable
of handling such a disgraced tragedy.

Whenever I get like this I like to lead out loud what I am saying to you all and what happens is the response there ain't much more than that. So don't look for anything more there is only a backboard and rim which is
the net of all human conciousness as Barrack will tell you and don't get lost in your hissy fit and response of your current life shaun you are well known well made well tailored exceptional man and hard worker and will
be a family man before your day is done and all with all those girls that love you and there isn't anything else to say about that regard that tennebaum and that mutual agreement you have with society and the rest of
ourselves and you don't need to prove it any more my man shaun and you did get lost before all drunk skunk and up a rut and tried to even commit suicide and there isn't any answer for that and you just sit there and
keep taking your punches and have clearly made it all the way to success and this mysterious hidden torture scheme and operation has taken it all from you everything you have worked for and you have no explaination.
I'm sorry shaun that is sum god damn heartbreak and don't think for a second that its always going to be hard to swallow or sumthin' to learn and you get into different things and your nose and lust lead you astray.
You have never been told by a father figure as Barrack is trying to tell you you call them totems we call them public people faith and the natural existence of a person and yes it has been passed down through the ages.
When you get to a certain point of all that is realized and you realize your time has come to sip sup and chip away at yourself and you realize your own determined existence and there isn't anything but your own.
Barrack will tell you there isn't much there after that and when the goin' gets tuff and you backstep and step on your own there is noone to save you your basically risking your life and you know what that does to
your murderer it only entices him or her and draws your murderer closer the correct way to deal with it is say anything got a problem here and look up into the sky and see that your innocent and have no reason to
die in this regard or any regard as Teresa just talked to the special police and they reassured her that nothing will happen and they are in the positions of power to make this decision and proceed to reassure her once
more as you spelled out your lust for life and justice but that just went on down the back and out the door never to be heard again its very clear you want to save lives and have noticed that the prohibition of alcohol
which is very old is over and done with just like the prohibition of that favourite drug marijuana cannibus that fine wine is no longer over and done with and there isn't anything to do about the legalities and street
snuff is still being criminalized which is better so the markets are making the public make a choice and they clearly want there good man or good woman dealer that knows them and now promisciously drives up and delivers
rather easy and nobody thinks about their safety they always put it back on the deciders like there is people watchin the deals and there isn't anything like that there isn't any public protection as shaun is trying
to figure out and has.

First let me get this out of the way that is there is nuthin to get nor want all we want is peace do you fucking understand there isnt anything else to figure out and it gets all construed and shaun is being
reasonable but what it doesnt matter is the swing of the thoughts and the actions at hand and all shaun is doing is better protecting the individuals, the groups, the sects, the gangs and even the murderer gang
shaun worked up all his huff and puff for absolutely nuthin' and had it all and never got reproduced anything so shaun started to know better and know what and who to turn to for answers who are we gettin' it 
from where does it cum from all sides and jus' where does it start from strain from sectionalize from and what not.

When the going gets tuff is that this is another reward to be had is that all that there is there wouldn't be at this time and it wouldn't be sufficient and all that is lost is got and all that is had is naught
what you have here is the last remnants of a dying age and a piece of thought and its terrifying because where just standing there sitting there and it all comes to waste and frought and forth rite and all of
that pig ginny hog wash and judgy prosecutey brainstormin' bandwagon and all. 

What I got here is this that I din't want it to be this way there it is all that is right and so and there it is one more reason to think that I am going to die and there it is another reason why I am going to
the grave and all. Then when I gett there don't you be worried dont you be haggled by insight or left remains of a dying thought that could go haywire and all fighting for what is right because at the end of the
day everyone is good like Sorokin the interesting Russian writer of the ages and he will live again and write again that is his calling and shaun is paraphrasing one of his best quotes and has realized that there
is only one picture book I mean real book to be had there at the Uptown library where Lisa I mean Teresa and that security gaurd Micheal rape him relentlessly, blackmail him, pester him and stomp him and walk into
him and bump him back and rape him with their inside figurative bodies and all.

What could it be but another diatrabe where that word sticks out but what is left is Cosmopolis one of David Kronenbergs last flicks with one of the most electrifying actors today and one of the most sexy Shaun 
knows and he is now getting the sex appeal from one the masters at it. There it goes all done. There it is all Mine as I remembered therefore Today all gone and such and reverberating down my drain my mind my
thought and there it goes all gone once more and there it is my family on the other side of things and not saying anything to me and I cannot say anything back and there it is another way to say it all my God Oh'
No DJ Khalad one of the most hated rappers producers characteratures of all time rite next to Chance the Rapper capturing shauns fever like hes stupid and slowed him down and shaun is big on humility and there
he is all ashamed and shit and oh' there they is all accessory to murders livin' on blood money like shaun has said and shit and livin' on the lap of lux like Riff or is it Horst has said and all.

When I had it comin' to me I never had it comin' to me at all there is no way to say it no way to hide it there is no way to see it no way to light it no way to identify it no way to control it no way to describe it.
Oh' no there it is again and all.

Once it was there never was there again and all that I had was gone and there I am all burrupt and compact and just committed suicide all public and common and Reggie made it well known but most people was sad Shaun
they couldn't believe it and the way House Nigger Reggie who is basically Kanye West at this time is their nothing left and all.

Back to shauns suicide he slept one time and then woke up another to wake up to his constant depression and his sister is really good at this the begotten one and there it is all done and shaun couldn't take it
anymore and gott turned down by Aimee and all and couldn't gett any girl and all.

God did that House Nigger breathe on you shaun as he passed you and brutally verbally assaulted you and said get the fuck away from me and he can't say exact because this is very real that he would exact revenge on
Shaun for what he has said and he has previously been banned indefinitely for reporting what crimes are being committed on his pursen his citizen his right of way and there not reporting it and saying that shaun
cannot say this information publicly but this gets away with it and he is naming these individuals directly and its kind of public and all.

When I had it all and all that is all and all Lil' Nas X is committing heavy acts of sadism and masochism but so is drake lil nas looks x like he is getting younger shaun wants to love him like everyone else and he
doesn't think 2.7 million people live in Chicago or 333 million people live in the United States and Joe Biden said there is only 69 million people but it is it true and shaun is an outdorey and all.

When I had the word of this what is that and shaun fears for his life every single day and looked at the new space jam with lebron that did really well but made to look like it didn't do well and he just saw him in
real life and shaun gave him undire respect and even felt bad and sorrow for what is happening to him and he knows that lebron is at least owed 9 championships and only has 4 thats rite shaun and all.

He absolutely loves Lebron James and every and each house nigger there is and there he is scrambling for a QA&&T job but shaun is playing word play as you can see he designed his entire resume like a running program,
a schematic I am told and it would ask more questions than recieve answers and sincere modality of what Shaun is all about and of course he can handle any form of programming language QA&&T job are you kidding look
how much of a whiz this kid is and he is still kid until 40 then your a boy man and then once you hit 60 your a grown man and you just go man but he cannot handle the senior level programming and he can't find my
son on the instagram he doesn't remember his name but he is thinking of typing hoover and all.

When he just responded to my son who is very loving but also very distant as shaun is learning this closness this ramifications did he have a father figure and did he lose his father figure as a young boy and later
as a young man and now my full grown son and Kanye West that House Nigger is performing hidden at the ultimate time and always think and be on your gaurd and never let your guard down and if you do you'll never know
but we gangs who dis on the cide of good new that it was all the time even gave it away and sheet and all.

When he responded to my son with a selected inquiry and gave his love and sorrow to my family and now is intertwined with what shaun always thought was his destiny and they try to take away from it but I'm ready Shaun
all I know is that in my heart I am an innocent shaun I can kill for you shaun you know your taking on many that are comin' on and you got a big mouth ya u said sum slurs and verbal assualts but that was almost 3 years
ago and you did it because you where being tortured and there isn't any way to prove it or is there and all.

Had a good time thanks didn't get any lunch as he kindly and friendly and family responded to my Son an inquire and he didn't get what he wanted but is on his tail like wildfire and he doesn't know if he still livin'
in Chicago but it doesn't look like it does it and they livin' in luxury and so but why and jus' how and all.

Whenever its a good time to wait and thunk when I think its time to see what I see what I know about and all and all that I see is the remaining rebrants of a dying age like Die Anterwoord and Jack Harlow is an 
accessory are you kidding how is that so because shaun was going to continue to represent him and he bit a head off a bird once and it came out all Jack Harlow and all.

When you can't complete nor can't understand it and there it is another day gone and what shaun is doing is reverberating all the jazz and shit and all.

When Jody took another hit and Bones is there and gecko clothing and Paul Wall gave him a message and there is Johnny Dang who is always there it seems and it doesn't give any better than this and what is this 
Barrack Obama doesn't trust Rahm Emanuel anymore why is that is it because I was basically esplainin' it to him these people have the power of law and can do anything at any time and shaun keeps getting hit at this
time and Jody has gotta juck him and shit and all.

Whenver its this its that and all.

Whenever I could stop rite there ya hes a good lookin' boy ain't he eyes of fire but he has set them to a low hearth don't you get a rise out of those eyes its because they real black metal or sumtin' aww who needs
his benday Roze sure does and she is taking hit after hit and real hood and real kind kinda looks german and shit because of her eyes and all.

Whenever I get like this its like this and that and Jody is repeating the word today and I got about 34 min shaun likes to skip over and cause he ain't seein' it but he is getting it all there is and when you on this
side of things, which I mean is good. There is this repercussion and with every effect or is it cause like Shaun has said there is this ramification and all that dey do and Shaun is tired of sayin' ye and seein' this
and that and trying to take Jack Harlow off his ass and he just got reminded that he is clearly gettin' younger and gettin' more handsome but wait is it the new technology nobody knows and there is sayin Jack Harlows
name and all.

What happened to all the remembories and all.

When it gets like this this is the gym is what this is. All I could see is that he needs more memorbers and he would be able to take it and just have it like he is sayin' and there he is provin that Rahm Emanuel is a
stinking fucking liar laced up and danced up in his oblivion ways and there ain't nuthin' to save him and hes gott all the forces that he needs to prove his criminal innocence thas why I thought shaun would like this
one it did matter that you reached out to my son thank you for your graciousness and sympathy my big man and of course the respect and tha' honesty an' all.

When I gett like this and shaun should be havin' a lunch and he mite even not get my respect but what he does is this is that he gives us so much and all hes doin is saviorin' and there he is spellin' it rite like
his teacher and he is rite by shauns side this is the scontinuin' of his work and its basically like I'm on the outside thas rite fighting for good with every breathe I have and don't u every fuckin' get it twisted
this is what they do we have illegal activity and its perfectly law abiding and like shaun its half the game and i'm sober now and there isn't any lite at the end of the tunnel and shes done margot robbie basically
ran thru jack harlows ass and now jack harlows on the spoke and there is all found out and shit for what he has done and now shaun is going to take another act of terrorism and what jody is showing here is that this
ain't real riskey but what it is is that you gotta be on your toesepp and shaun is all ready and that is all he wanted with my son as he is takin his damn time and this progress has taken over a year to show and it 
is heavily proofread by shaun and gramitically correct which I planned ahead of time and shaun is completing it time after time and again and just saw Eric Holder say this is for his law group to achieve a better
understading with daily law group duties whatever those are and shaun just reported two big juicy tips and didn't snitch on the man didn't describe him just said step off and admitted he committed verbal assualts
even tho the man was blantantly raping him and physically from a distance assaulting him it is hard to describe and all.

What matters is this and all.

Theres all I gott. I knew shaun would like that one ya heard that one and picked it up it makes fun of sand niggers and pokes fun at shauns heritage but hes rite we all like a form of self harm and there isn't anything
that wasn't going to be remembored anymore and all.

Well today folks if your tuning in this is the circle of human suffering and bloodshed that isn't thy own and it comes down heavy and there isn't anything to be done about as Jamilla viciously and reputedly said you 
didn't do anything wrong today but shaun is sayin' all I was doin' was lookin at the clock I thought ur ass was good ain't no house nigger ass and he said what the fuck u starin' at? And he alluded you better stay
the fuck away from him when u outside otherwise they gunna hurt you and told shaun once more that he is the wrong one to fuck with and two other people jumped in on it but they ain't house niggers and he ain't 
with a strange look on his face as he was being escorted out of the building and that is what shaun likes to do and he didn't feel safe anymore so he had to leave and get to the library and Teresa knows all about
and she is one of the worst fuckin' murderers there is and he would get indefinitely banned for this but she ain't gunna find it nor are her law-ers the one who can find any wrong-doing from a tea-strain but they
haven't done nething wrong and shaun just saw a cop but really a pig and my son basically said its like ur talking thru Kanye Westsss and repeating everything that Roze Larry Hoover's Son Mother and his Father and
my Mother and my beautiful Grandmother and all.

Now this is big Rahm Emanuel is a fucking terrorist as Shaun fears for his life which is in his rite and it should be as this is what he always wanted to get into the Gang Empire ever since he saw the beautiful
woman put a lava lamp up there and report what is goin' on. Hes the biggest fuckin' wasteless child murderer rapist and killer there is and is clearly responsible for the recent proacaveur procastination protrayel
in the news machines as shaun likes to call them of Shinzo Abe one President Xi's adversaries as he remembers an article that was reported and President Xi who is responsible for bringing in the santicty of human
life and is building shaun and we always remember this face down science as past generations like to remember and that is the whole point of it as Jody just remembered what it takes in that flick that movie that
piece of cinema as Jody looks like a diamond stallion today and oh look who it is on the wings of Pegasus a hybrid animal that you hear in folk lore and I can't use all of my english because it has to reverberate
off of shauns brain and its looks like a Hyprocrossus and Migos are a pair or at least a trio of house niggers and does nebody want a potting does ne'body wanna committ an adultery so u can stick your dick in
a resounding triple quatro relationship and Kayla just passed him and actually begged for her life and she is alot older but really is she ya maybe 5 or so years older than what it takes like that Jac Har low lookin'
ass who finally hasta come clean and all.

Now when it gets like this we bangin' bodies fightin' for the same cause as jackson is migrately on yo' ass and gettin' up on it and all. 

Schemes there it is another fucking way to say what is going on and it has to be typed but shaun is fighting with 6ix years and 5 months and that is what he is doin' takin' his time and focusing minutely and we mite
get a'nother boxset today as My Son is taking away from Yancy that fucked in the head house nigger that actually helped shaun realized this is the spirit world which means it is what people say and its like this and
shaun was clearly taken advantage of and left to waste away be decieved and its all about deception and all.

There was a man who just acknowledged shaun and is very prominant and very famous and doesn't know anything and all and it looks like he knows chance the rapper and is very fancy and looks like he is housed in the taylor
made houses where all the queeniest of honkies and jarble jargons take place the house of commodity and that is where we all take place and order and choose who is close to the bit and where to look next and as you can
see they can instigate like nobodys business and there is alot of material and materials that are there on the good ol' board of Evil and there isn't that much off it and there isn't that much hands off and all.

When I get like this to listen to me I always get this grand remark that I am all there was when it comes to this is it because of my skin colour is it because we together as humans listen to me and all.

Whenever I get a heffer that just please multiple I think to myself storybooks are real and there ain't no turnin' back and there it is how much longer do you think they will be able to do good and shaun just screamed out
what is exactly right and all.

When you could have it what was it and what did you see was it there before and where we had it all comin to us and there isn't anything to be left off and there is another way to judge what is next and where it is all said
and done and there it is another bison coming back up at me and there he is and I was and there is nothing to do about it and look there ain't no tellin' what we could have it and there isn't anything more to it and there 
will be absolutely no answer to it and there is one way or another and due to secrecy all this can be done? U gotta be out your rahmminded asses this can be done and he is absolutely right and no matter the amount
of power nor the forces is to be had or do they have it is always comin' down to this the last secret in the hole that shaun cannot die for this nor will he and if he does if they come on and he doesnt back down nor
take his beating and he actually has stood up to everyone because this is very important and he cannot back down even tho if it might mean his life and there it is again hes all at a loss and there it is 
there kriminal coverup bribe scheme where lawyers and judges come by with the pigs the FBI pigs and the CIA pigs and Secret Service pigs and all of there helpers and because they are very law abiding and because they
are very victorious and have law-ups and law-downs and various ways to hid criminal activity and various politicians that say this or that and all.

When its against the boards and shaun knows that I cannot do nothing but what this is proving is this that he knows the wherabouts of any and all criminal activity and what this is just curl up and take a rest
by the law for it is my friend but not in a house nigger way no where its all friendly and who child to murder innocent and comin' on or sum terrorist attack that nobody knows and second guesses and shaun's
system is taking a rest but it can take a while to think that up and he has several pages that describe this and how to survive even if it comes down to only bodily harm then it would successfully remove murder
off the equation because hunting and prowling and successfully killing by any which way has been removed with forces like this with me as you can see no one wants to enter the circle where we all take place 
and boy do I got sum skeletons in my closet as your all thinking about me here and shaun knows best he wrote it in his thoreau as he is being modest but he doesn't want to curl up beside me nor does he wanna
get to know me nor does he wanna watch Friday anymore with suckin' mutha lickin' very persuasive very effective and was beginning to teach Chance the Rapper the ways and there isn't any other way to say it
but that hesa house niggter and there isn't any way I wanna watch anymore of this and there isn't anything else to say this is criminal activity and there he goes with all our savings on it like sum Gucci Mane
sleigh and hes got Eminem all celebatorious and there is only one way to deal with this and there is only one way out of this no I don't wanna do any more jail shaun just like you don't wanna be kept
held like sum moron that is on its own path if our innocence is out there shaun and you can keep typing this with no response then this will counter act all measures and shit shaun jeesus and there isn't anything
we got going on there isn't anything going to be done about it and hes goot shaun don't ya know and there isn't anything to be done about it and all.

We gott little more than two remanings of what was going on and it was the never happening of what remained in the older times when it was the remains of the franchises and the remains of the remaining memories and
all that there is is no more that what is being said and there isn't that can be said nor done about it than what you have here issa diatribe biolocktick verified gunned control no remains leftover santa where is 
clause remainder of the day which is the turn to call it completely invisible from your memories and my memories and that is what this system can do and hide any and all criminal faith and remainders of the
criminal wrong doings and there it is another woman a witch that shaun calls it rousing and displaying her big wig and they don't think it is going there way but if shaun can stand still and not commit any 
crime before and he has gotten bit pretty bad and did he submit himself to the confines or did he just go along with it because he had no choice and it looks like he is always playing both sides and all.

When it was the matter of time and all.

When it was the matter of both times and all.

When it was the matter of 3 times and all.

When it was the matter of 4 times and all.

When the going is such as this as he makes another pass at one of his XOMG Pop girls currently locked the fuck up if you want him and that is how it goes if they spoken for you move on and there isn't any other
history and if you don't know they spoken for then you get the headsup by the girls that look like the sum shit presha or sumthin' buuge sherri ass and there isn't anything to be done about ya I like those
bendays but they do like there own skin colour u already got a honey pot that is good and all.

When shaun is getting past all the hardbroken cold blooded criminals man like sum scott gheese and all.

When you gott all that is left and all.

Whenver I get like this there it all started and now its going to be a very hard press and shaun just learned how to read better and there is that house nigger on his phone and clearly has lost his fucking
body and there ain't no turning back and they are now going to have plastic surgery and place there remnants back up on the table and there is sum type of compcontroller that hasn't been added to the lore
and there is the house nigger over his shoulder actin' like he can read it and there isn't anyway to help shaun or prove it and he is using anther independent company and he doens't know what is happening
and he just gave control and I mean complete control to the daemon that is this whole thing and there isn't anything wrong with her she just had a black nigger cock thats mine and it warms up my girl
as you can see in the back and she is helping her along and she is very young and all.

There is that house nigger again and again getting in your shit shaun and there isn't any more room for him omg look how fuckin' jealous he is to you shaun look how well you defended yourself today shaun 
as he is completely defenseless and the worst he can get is sum hospital bed that is all loocked up and shit and there isn't any way out of this and all.

Here it is and a whole nother paragrapgh but who is writing it and who is sayin it and what is he reading it from and where is he getting it and their it is he changed
his name to represent me and here it is another way to represent gang tactics and whenever he gets into a lunch at the church is very hard to hide now and there isn't
anything to do with it anymore as a witch just imitated his potter and there isn't anything to be done about it and there using all their power that they have its 
that whore kayla and she just came on by and offered herself to me and it looks like shaun wanted to get out of that as soon as possible as he remembers a gangmember 
basically telling him that she is decieving you but it didn't go that way he actually reported the adultery and it turns shauns a victim in it now and there isn't any
way to prove that nor prove his innocence but clearly set up by his dad and now hes gotta take on Mark Zuckerberg and all.

When it gets like this as the witch needs to use the facilitys and I am in here all molten and wrapped up and here is a man with a tennessee university or is it texas
I am not sure as he allows shaun to know his whereabouts but what they really doin is tryin to shoot shaun dead and the man that brutally verbally assaulted him in 
the cultural affairs center is now using the library on a daily basis and acted like he is pulling a fucking gun on shaun and here is the big boss all laced up
and protected and fortified now in their house of control and systems that use it and all.

What is happening is that Barrack Obama cannot see anything as that witch this whore honkie who has all the control in the world and once again heavily fortified
and barrack obama can't remember anything that happens with Rahm Emanuel the most dangerous terrorist to man and is well known for his predatory actions after those
who cannot possible defend themselves in these cases where it happens and all.

When Barrack comes back he is don't remember and all just like Agnessa who mentioned to shaun that she like pimps better and those who treat her like trash and
shaun who is also getting mocked by jack harlow for this but one time she ended up on shauns doorstep cock and he is very sexually deprived so of course he took it
and she started hugging him and supposedly her roommate threw up his figurative hands and then began to acknowledge that she is all yours and then he took her back
and had a good time with her and all.

There is one thing that leads to another and Rahm Emanuel constantly has to fool barrack obama and he doesn't know what it is doing but Barrack goes one way and shaun
goes the other he is very good with this and shaun thinks I am the reincarnated Jim Brown and he doesn't know but I am or is it another nigger and all.

The nigger is a beautiful specimen and represents the next advancement in the human species and all.

What is housed is all their juck and all their mends and you must remember that mike is ready to die to go he ain't hangin' on to much longer and he loves his family 
but he gave that up and so did society and shaun has to act perfect and not retort anything to anybody and he thinks this can secure his innocence his and mine and do
others because we all fall under due law and process and there isn't anything else to say anymore and there is another witch close up and she is visiting and there she
is of course they knew about all of this and they were ready and they are desperately trying to kill shaun if they had any leg room if they had any way to prove that
he came on their person in any way shape or form and he made it resound with Juan the decispicable house niggert spick monconction and all.

Whenever we gett to here and it looks like Mark is going to take a long break and not be in shauns fucking hair and all.

Good job house niggert lookin' spick as she is printing off many sheets and money laundering is so easy to spot and they act like they have the power and majority but
just take for example the amount of prisoners stuck here in with me and you will find the amount out there rarin' and ready and if it came to that and he thinks he
saw Jackson and he jus acknowledged him on his twitter account and ya I got a place in history just like yourself shaun and all.

When I get like this is this is where we gett goin is this the way of the way remnants of all the life that there is and they are showing they are in touch with the
daemon as shaun is the only reason that was brought into reality and got one of his girl bitches to say and wave at him and help him she is well known for this and
was instantly attracted to him and there isn't any way around this but shes gotta fuck one of the prisoners to secure this and it will happen very fast and shaun
doesnt' think this is going to happen but it is and all.

There it was in the glory hole she just had to look at his dick and it counted and she isn't asking your permission and she got to encourage it thru her emotion and
its a well known and performing whore down that we have here in the hole and you know its time to listen to Alice and Chains and who is the reincarnated Post Malone
shaun thinks that might be bukowski because hes got the red leather hat and all and its all his and he is resounding very well and he made it just for shaun
and post spent sum time on it and is now resounding rather well with Tommy Wright III and what whoever does it best in the hood is the last one standing and that is
very well used and very fat assed witch cunt whore that is very pig powerful and got the law group the dotcter group and the specimen group and the crooked lawyers
and all of that jazz and what his lesson was today is that nobody wants anybody to come on and he heavily explained that anything that can come on will if you
enter there are and shaun is completely right and teresa look at her struggling she has come to complete terms and treats human life like trixie and he thinks he
just saw margot robbie and there is the shape of the female rubbing his dick and wiping it away and it happened really fast and she just serves as a cleanup girl
and that is the only way Rahm Emanuel will allow it to happen and this is for certain they have all the power in the world and everything that they need to do 
anything that they want to do and it runs in their families the murderin' and the followin' and the perservayin' and the complete countin' and theres nutt at
the end of the tunnel and there she goes off and all upset that she had to stoop so low but is it really her or is it that whore kim kardashian who acted nice
and shit and is desperately trying to save her image and now nothing matters and all.

When I get like this and shaun doesn't know if this is true or not but his dad fucked kayla and all.

Shaun was as he said in the possession of a whore and started very low on the totem pole and at the end of the social foot where everyone controls shauns sex life
and this level of dominion is so high shaun has to abide by everyones laws and rules and he ain't have no leash copy and all.

When I gett down to the bottom I remember that this is what my son said to me told me one day that I would remember this quite exactly as their is another house
very dangerous niggert lookin over his shoulder trying to do everything that they can possibly to get out of the vulnerable position that they are in but they
are perfectly happy and they are starting to go into the next phase of picking where they want to be housed and where the will pay for all of their war crimes
and that will take a long time and prolong it but not with Barrack Obama and the King at the helm and President Xi and President Marcon and President Bolsonaro and
President Cyril Ramaphosa and that will about do it to sum up all of the worlds power as you only need one section of the earth represented and that Prime Minister
of the entire United Kingdom has to step down, Boris Johnson who everybody likes and lead us past these wars and died figuratively amialby and admirably and 
honorably but there isn't anymore dignity and there is just what shaun is after is the silence and they aren't giving it away but oh' it looks like the garpage whores
are havin' changed there moods and there it is shaun is against them in every which way and all.

There we have and ya he had a pig stalker doesn't everybody and she they usually pick one that is closet to your girlfriend or would be girlfriend so they can block
what is remembered and boy would he like to jack it to the dancer but then stephen curry would parade it and constantly mock him hes got 4 championships just like 
Lebron James and he hasn't earned them and all and there he is crying over what the Shape of the Female had to do but he remembers it quite frankly and there goes
that house nigger with the chair and they are finally starting to show his real emotion and how long did he end up in his chair it dont remember and what Juan did is
as bad as a real murder and there needs to be sum more self control and all.

There it was all in the sky and all.

So there I was waitin' out my prison sentence focusing and leading what is all there that there is to be there and shaun needs to focus on these dark gothic overtones
and they got to all his future bitches before and splermed all over them and mocked him that he cannot find them and there completely surrounded around him his cock
is basically up for grabs and is sold on the leftover table where everyone can have a huckie and honkie and Margarita is there as well hey shaun and letting him know
there is many things to swallow and shaun is a big name and has moved on already and there ain't nouthin left to say and all.

Well I cannot believe my eyes here it is again and shaun is worried that he will be indefinit banned for his dissagreements online or they will find his online profile
like sumhow they did online with his facebook and twitter but since I guess shaun had this before and during his tenure at NEIU and before this all happened and he was
online before no it just looks like if it isn't ain't public and noone can search his name but they can and have to know what to exactly look for and of course they
have donet this before look how good they are at alluding it and there isn't anymore dancing and there isn't any more obliviousness and he looked Rahm right in the eye
and gave the retribution and the ever lasting glory to all those lives he has done and in and orchestrated towards and all.

Whenever he gets like this Barrack as I am paraphrasing your name here and shaun is waiting to get hit again and has befriended Mike and he just got plastered and
is getting up in their grills and wants to die and shaun is rite if your up in sumones rite of life and they can execture you and there isn't anymore dancing and
there Rahm goez and it is easy as that to cover up and as shaun what is good for all parties and all.

Whenever I gett two times. I wanna say sumthin' start sumthin' and here it goes another wind and shaun is ready for it it is another description another showcase and
this one looks like its comin' from NYC or las vegas where jody is starting sumthing and there is waves of the human spirit that shaun is in touch with and Chicago
really knows how to show it well and all.

If my innocence is out there shaun if it can be attained I can have it no matter what it is where it is and how you attain it and now they are saying they can skirt
around the issue and just lie and shaun is perfectly right and reasonable and there trying these grinny cooks are desperately trying to show that Barrack Obama took
on a different tone and a much different amount of freedom and when FDR was signing the Treaty it looks like he had cuffs on and its always like this they inhabitate
the law enforcement and judicial branch and lawyer branch and have all of these policooks and it looks good on paper and nuthin' is happening to shaun and there wasn't
anything happening to shaun as he got the black steeg of chance house nigger rapper and he is extremely dangerous man as you know with his house nigger vic mensa a rat
is always dangerous and all.

When I get like this I always fear for my life and shaun is wondering how much good I have in you and that isn't a question anymore as the babies and the white hunnies
and the ju botonies and clusterbear and focus rites and all.

When you gott nuthin and all.

When I had everr'ythang and all.

When I thought I had everything and all.

They really wanna take this toy away from shaun but he is ever more focused and rest and believe that they cannot do this to a man and they have the solutions in place
so this can never happen and shaun is right this keeps happening and a man just walked up to him and it looked like he was going to attack him with a deadly weapon gun
and all.

There is no answer and I mean completely no answer and I would waste Rahm Emanuel if I could that grinny cookuld hook nose rat tail fucked in the head piggy wiggy if
shaun gets banned for this or like last time he got taken into a room with 2 FBI agents and there sayin they can with 1 pig and told him never to threaten any harm
to a political official but they know this is my word and not shauns word as he said to Joe Biden go take a gun and shoot yourself behind the gym because he thought 
that he was guilty of many crimes like the fuck sott in the head boiler baster Mitch McConnall as Shaun is fearing for his well-being and they can take him away as
shaun is being harmed by Lexi but really there isn't any crime done and all.

Rahm Emanuel also admitted to seeing his women completely naked and has jacked off to them and there it goes another one down the ol' good drain which is just a luxor
wipe away and if your in the branches of criminal goodie two shoes I'm defending against the bad man they can come at any time and arrest shaun for what he said he
basically said it again but this is what I am saying and in their world I am a proven what they think so murderer and there isn't any way to dance around this one dead
one still standing thank god as I was reckless and protected my own and he came on shaun and look at you shaking if they take you in the room whatta you gonna do report
this to the secret service I just threatened Vladimir Putin, Rahm Emanuel, said your threat about Joe Biden god rest his soul and now that whiney faggot whats wrong now
never any solution just going to moose the whole damn thing and Harry Reid already died thank god Mitch McConnall and look what these people are fucking doing to him 
you think he is going to see Margot Robbie all in her glorie anytime soon and all.

This is actually considered a private repository but when they did that to Shaun he was reckless and put it up on his public Twitter account where Chance the Rapper
slams and rapes and offers bodies to the gulag and when I said that the person next to him all huffed and puffed because you gotta bite and that is it if you give it
any chance and there is any profit or any bodie that can be disposed of and this has been followed and discovered before and shaun found out that this is what he found
out in his last life and there it goes another way to describe what is the common problem we gotta a circle and they don't like the calm order and all.

Look at that french whore shaun look how fucking gone she is and look how much she dont even care anymore and they blocked off the aragon and uptown theater area and
what this is done throws shaun off his game and they got the pigs all over the place and shaun is very right in saying that these pigs are extremely hard workers and
there isn't anything to be done about it once again and there he goes typing away and he might be taken away by the secret services and the FBI and god knows who else
and shauns opportunites are dwindling even though he was up most up on that totem pole of turkyin' and gobblin and gamoochin' off the rim of his intellect and there is
that fucking house nigger security gaurd doing his thing and he is so violent and demonstrative to shaun that he doesn't know who or what is going to happen and he 
keeps labeling shaun and what he is doin is puttin shaun up to the barbaric plate and what comes will be shauns doing as he still needs to face violence as I am
the result of all violence that you see in this world and what it can do to a person and what happens to a pursen and what will happen to a pursen and what will happen
in response to a person and there goes 2 sheriff patrol cars haroldlizing shaun and there isn't any power to drage and reel them in on in and shaun you actually helped
write this you don't know anything which way or what and all your doing is catching that sweet message from curls and there goes that fucking house niggert again going
way the fuck overboard on the amount of torture that a man pursen or woman pursen can do to this shaun and jamial also got the stern warning and whos going to pull a
gun at sum house niggert and there is that fucking house nigger security gaurd basically spitting in the face of shaun and getting up in his fucking eminem grill and
there is no way to stopping it has he has to dance around the issue which is violence and one time he had to fucking run for his life because sum house nigger dressed
in gang parpaphenila came up on him and said he didn't i say i was going to beat your ass and it looks like shaun was about to say sumthing but really he got up and ran
and the next thing you know the only thing that he can think of is to run into a busy intersection and then maybe the attacker would be thrown off and there isn't
anything to be done and now the police and I mean the pigs will imtimidate him and impression him with all that has happened to him but what it really didn't happen
and only if he comes on then it really didn't happen and this fucking house niggert is going real hard on him and all.

When I get like this is all I can think and all.

There is that fucking house nigger stomping and attacking and shaun and he can clearly read this and read over shauns shoulder see if you get his name from him shaun.
Ok his name is fucking Italian and he don't know if the house nigger is lying and then that fucking house niggert came at him with him the truth that he saw his woman
all naked and knows who she fucks but he ain't a normal man no more and what this is is just like Micheal and all.

There it was the other madame librarian will not tell her his name and he has to learn it from the speak sheets and what there is to say and what there is to all know
and now Italian is reading over his fucking shoulder can you see this Italian this your gang leader and I mean the ultimate that is all gang leader and satanic ritual
and you need to step the fuck down he ain't know honkie ass lookin for trouble do u see how he had to deeply respect your perimeter and you must get that name from
that delicious looking house niggert madame librarian as I am paraphrasing Marcel Proust which he did his time with crimes against humanity and there isn't that is
to be done about this situtation as Itailan cools down and is recieving stern warnings left and right and when he buys his drugs there he goes again mockin the Shape
of the Females way and how she takes a cum shot and of course she is taking cum shots do you think there is any way around this and if Italian reports this to anybody
and I mean the house niggert security guard then here he comes again brutally attacking shaun and there isn't anything to do about and you actually feel when someone
is pointing a fucking gun at your head like a sonic sphere and it looks like shaun has taken a couple in this day. And what I mean to say that if anything of this is
reported then we are shit out of luck and there isn't anything to do with it and there he goes with Italian once again ya like the dressing like the way of people
and all that and there he goes off and on and Nick that fuckin criminal honkie is with his fucking ass and that house niggert librarian is looking for sumthing that
shaun is doing real bad anything at all to get shaun banned indefinitely and there goes Italian stomping his fucking ass again and there isn't anything to do about it
and he is labeling shaun for various acts of violence and sumone may come into his tent and there ain't no stoppin it and shaun is wondering why it is so silent and 
so deserted at times and why they get the fuckin' go ahead when your all alone and hes all alone and there you go shaun more hard to swallow your like a bird you
need to be a lion your ass is with the larry hoover now and I got a son and a wife and that is just the public family and you can clearly tell my soninit but hes
mostly like a pool businessman or a real estate and all.

Here he is and what is that house nigger going doing doin' next to you and we all know you wanna see the watcher it has this all star cast and they made it after 
a true story and all.

Whenever I get like this again and all.

There it was a whole nother paragraph and ya I save juck and shit and there is no way to get this other than what is for me to say this is what this is like to live in prison
all your life and ya shaun Im bittered up and desperate and I don't have much life to give but I'm goinna look like live to 80 or so or 90 or so and this isn't getting any better
and my innocence is out there and there isn't anything to do about this are you fucking kidding me and they got all the criminals in the house of law enforcement and judicial branches
just like when shaun was thoreau and they did the same fuckin' thing to him for 8-10 years or so but they gaurded him his whole life and they have got a jump start on him this life and 
there isn't anymore to what is there other than Justice john roberts is basically holding it down for the entire histor of this gang violence and he obviously always wanted to get
shaun dead and as soon as they found this out they sent one of them murderers after shaun and he did his fucking job put shauns life on the line and his now an accessory to murder
ya big tubby fucked in the head with all the pigs killing children and there ain't know way out but his word and his design and there it goes with that Rahm Emanuel and they work
together and there ain't nothing to be done and there ain't nothing barack obama can do and neither I can do that means this is completely helpless and there is no way out and we
are then all helpless and there isn't anything to do and there isn't anything Rupert Murdoch can do and let Vladimir Putin speak for them they are completely helpless waiting out jail
sentences and shaun over here has already sacrificed 6 years and 5 months and 19 days of his life and they already surrounded him before his discovery and his begotten household father
offered him up to the barbaric grisly plate and there it is another celtic offering shauns head up to sumthin' to be dealt with but shaun walks all the way thru it and his is wondering
if they can kill him can them make it slow and grisly and shaun is rite they use a very old way of rite of passage and zimmerman clearly killey laquan mcdonald or is trey parker I don't
every trayvon martin who clearly there parents raised a face down and told him he has the right away and he doesn't have to live in regret nor judgement and the walls are closing in on shaun
thats all he does is these crimes against humanity as I am doing mine and there goes another snicker of booger and coke and it looks like it was a message to Snoop Dogg and there is another man
who shaun knows and his body is changing and he is the same nationality of shaun and hes a fuckin' bloody accessory and there goes the house niggert shaking his head and Micheal the security 
gaurd wishes that he can ban shaun forever and all.

When I gett like this two time and three times the threesomes and foursomes are getting tirous and all.

When I listen to Danzig the legend I get like this and all.

Come here and be here and all.

When I get all timid and forgetfulnot and just reminded me that shaun is completely clean and he is cleaner than detergent like that E-40 and 40 is the same name that shaun first axed to join
the gangs and there wasn't any response, does he know Future, the multi-million dollar rapper and face and leader of the people nation but is really is it me did I start the folk just to
lead the people nation and there it is again the grit of the tire that is my face and my braun and my name and my blood and my family I have been in prison for as long as I can remember and me and
shaun and you especially shaun we have been reincarnated again and again and my wife cant wait to see me all free and shaun just looked at a picture of her and she can clearly see me that I am going 
to be free and how many years is he going to live and how many years can we get out of him and that is what shaun is wondering but otherwise it would be el chapo and there isn't any other clear leader
unless you want to get into political or movies and shaun is moving up on the irish mob side and the people nation side and he is clearly going for sumthing that Lil' Baby and Riff Raff have in the
process and he wants to work with Jackson, Deron, Brandon and his Angelo who are very hard and are showing shaun the robes ropes and ropall knowledge to avoid the bite of the pigs that house
all criminality their is and provide human suffering and there isn't any way to see it and there isn't any way to see the pigs and what they do and how many good cops are out there and there isn't
anything that needs to be said as he types this out like sum Hugh Jackman that is another worthless accessory and going against the tide and over tide it all too much and all.

When I get close to shaun I wonder why and he is representing and he is doin' sumthing wrong and sum guys had his future girlfriends and its just lap to lap dick suck to dick suck and there ain't
no more representation when you get a cannibal savage in the ring with forthrite of power and the piggy wiggys and all the judges and justice john roberts is all you need is all the power that you need
and he has clearly gone all the way and so has Mark Zuckerberg as I am using shauns brevity and why don't u just digitalize all of the hood and that is what Snoop Dogg is doin and it doesn't come off
like you need to use it and it comes off like their is more money for him and he needs to continue to distance from NFT and continue to be the enterprise and he isn't letting Snoop Dogg have it eazy
and there is gotta be a better way and the community and the intellectual community has to be stop it and there ain't no way to tell who can help and who is well better connected and shaun has to stay 
homeless and all.

I wonder what Riff Raff did and don't worry about Lil' Baby he innocent and we made sure just like we did with you today shaun and there you go reporting my direct word
and Barack Obama revealed that he is already working with the secular forces and working with the vigilantes that could be bit by the pigs and what is to come next and
there is always the scare out there as he just took in Pfleger give his sermon and his word and it was very resounding and shaun is using two computers at once so it looks
very official and there isn't anything can do and Mark just barked and raped him repeatedely and actually figuratively banned him from the public library just like that
asshole Michael did and he just saw Rachel give a bad word to him and shaun knows how to wear the down and get them to flip and when he reported the harassement to the likes
of the online community even on his facebook page he was sumhow banned indefinitely from a public library located in Rogers Park and was airlifted by his legs for screaming at
a security gaurd what that you cannot do this and shaun was only being outspoken and speaking his mind and outbursting about the torture and he doesn't even know when it will
be but know it looks like June 8, 2023 but he thinks that is more schadenfruede and he most likely would be correct as this has already taken him six years and five months and
18 days and counting as he made his discovery as he doesn't remember but it looks like late april after his 30th birthday but he was still 22 and it looks like 10 years have 
been added to shauns age and not just 7 years and 3 months as he went to 3 to 10 at a birthday party and from there shaun went on to play sports and continue very fast thru
the school system as I amy typing just like that house nigger Zella who has alot of punishment coming to him and it has that turn of glory zest to it that we all like and shaun
is completing his best word and Micheal knows exactly what he is doing and is threatening him and punishing him for whistelblowing and saying the direct word of a sewn up would
be dead murderer at least to them but i did what I always have done those who come on and those who harm and only exalted justice upon those who deserved it and that is why I am
laced up and hardened up and there ain't no more to that and all.

Well it looks like Zabihullah Mujahid can take it from there and I know millions of people would like to know what I do but basically I run the whole damn thing as Barrack is simply
saying that he and I haved always been't wortin' totether like sum kind of backpack and golfer and we have always thru history as shaun is taking on a new persona and this is exactly
what I am want him to do as he can see me very clearly and there I am the hallmark an the face and there is shauns sexual humiliation and there it is another Gucci Mane nugget for ya'll
to see and here and Enchanting is a clear pig heart and he went directly at her but shaun had to get turned down by lil' debbie and he knew he was gunna get turned down but Lil' Debbie
said keep it open and its a wait and see as shaun was helped indirectly by her and seeing that shaun wanted to get famous and all and there is that fuukt librarian passin shaun her
gas and openly raping him and knowing that shaun has much more time than just 7 and 1. They think he is stupid but shaun knows its at least 9-10 as he would come to find out that this
really all started in 2014 and they have been running and ducking and gunning and hiding and he just bowed to an openly house nigger that goez off and sees children otherwise if he 
didn't feather foot if he didn't display his undying loyalty to that house nigger Amazon who just jucked shaun for no reason and that house nigger actually threatened shaun with violent
remarks if he didn't look at him if he didn't acknowledge from him and just to let you know it takes 8 violent disagreements o' really Poorboy Wes I don't think so and it really only
takes one time as he was desecrating me and hating on me and throwing me violent aggression towards me and my family and there isn't anything to be done about it and the clear sides
have been chosen and the hunnies are on this side of good the ones that want to live forever and get younger while doin' it and look at my Wife as shaun has said with sum good want on
her like sum video but he thinks its more full bodie and I would have to agree and all.

When it gets like this and he doesn't know the librarians name and there he goes all down the drain again and he don't know what to do when it comes but he knows just to take his fucking
punches and get into the pit of aggression and there isn't run at all it isn't said at all and there ain't really no power scheme and now shaun is under Larry Hoover as he thinks this issa
business opportunity but its real serious and I did my homework on shaun and I found absolutely nuthin' and he ain't guilty of nothing and he ain't got nobodies head on his and he had 
no fucking idea he was aiding and abetting that one time if he told brian if anybody came or not and he was clearly fucked up and wanted to drink more jungle juice and he was clearly 
plasatered in the fuckin' head down at southern where nuthin' happened and there it goes on down the drain and there he goes with his innocene and all.

When I gett like this as let that house nigger best you on the left and that house nigger on your front and the white queenie ass honkie on your right best you and rape you and blackmail 
you to heavens kingdom and all.

When I gett like this like Yeezy fucking his daughter and he said it feels like putting it thru grass and remember that shaun when you where there the last time with your family and a
black family drove on thru and there isn't anyway of thinking about this or getting to this and their I am naming names and giving the exact point of distance that these people where
and committed there heinous crimes and its about to get real in the clear and good cuz we in the opening now shaun where they can't indefinitely bann you like last time and usually
they waited 8-10 days for their house nigger honkie queenst clearance to go thru and that is when they can sumhow find shauns profile and report him to sum system and say that he is
reporting the crimes as house nigger micheal security of the uptown branch just acknowledged and stomped on him and Mark the branch manager is clearly fucking lost his damn mind 
and attacking shaun heinously and vigourously and knowing that shaun has much more time than just next year before the summer starts are you fucking serious shaun how much longer
could this possibly be my freedom and the entire prison population freedom weighs on your fucking head as the honkie asstunk was just acknowledging it again and who knows how long the
Queen Elizabeth St. Marie can live for oh' thats right shes fucking dead and she never got to meet shaun or usher the people into the real world and she has been in the sky repeatedly
and shauns head is still up on the figurative table because he is labeling and naming all of these murders and they are now playing to Daemon TV because this is all going there way
not only have they bought 6.5 years of my time and your time shaun but our collective times and sum have already fucking died and they know there going to be fucking reincarnated as we 
have known for 8 centuries and barrack gave him another huge press and another logical huge press but shaun is loosing his fucking feet he has to get up and wet himself because 
he don't know what is best no more and he has no idea of the time and he just saw his little baby bendae bend over in Riff Raff's truck and riff clearly doesn't like those kind of
girls they rub him the wrong way just like shauns aquaberries and butterscotches and it looks like shaun and riff have a place in history and he is being very calm and collected he has
done what it looks like 6 years and 5 months and 20 days so far since his bodily discovery that can take the work of Krishna take the work of Hermes and take the work of Riff Vishnu Raff
and multiply it by Alex Von Meilenwald and there is no clearer choice then on the side of good as Robert I mean Rodger has told him repeatedely to get the fuck on the side of the psycho
six side under me your daddy Larry Hoover and I decide when u juck when your team sells and how they sell it until its all legal and even then when it becomes legal ull still need the
uprite protection as Mark just stands the fuck in front of him repeatedly as he has done repeatedly in the past and show how much is life has come to an end and how much he loves inwardely
raping his fucking begotten prison held ass o' thats right this time the story as shaun has repeatedly said where the fuck to get off in his tent like that fuckin' house nigger Stephen 
Curry who has built a fucking name for himself taking all of Lebron's and Kevin Durant's championship fields away but that isnt what we seein in the sky now is we and he just added the
Tom Brady because he wants to play until his 50 and we ok with a homosexual I mean a bisexual dimograph who shaun will say repeatedly slayed upon any and all women and is currently fighting
for everything he has and took multiple and I mean multiple verbal assaults from everyone in New Hope College and it looks like Auvrille will die in prison at a old ripe age when he
gets there and he just threatend shaun or did I threaten Lo'rell. As that is how it is pronounced by that house nigger Zella but really it was Barrack telling him after warning him
not to do it and Lovrell doesn't give a fuck his life is ruined and he is going to jail and he is one of the most powerful house niggerst on the north side and there goes Teresa raping him
after shaun found out that she eats her own shit from time to time from Barrack Obamas't and their is a whore honkie impersonating my beautiful wife as shaun would think and acknowledging
again what they are doin' and shaun is thinking it always goes back to the Holocaust and what they did there as a Team and what has happened since then but really what has happened is more
war and the drug wars took on a different note andt there it is another pass impasse as Teresa has been named, Micheal has been named, Slyvia is innocent and trying to help in anyway he
can like Denise who is a parpheligic and dismounteddisabledjazz and she is innocent and helping in any way and Cassie who clearly Micheal has leftover banged and shaun thinks they have all
their whores in one circle just like that Queenie honkie that passed him and raped him and chafed him and juked him like sum dismountable and I know this don't make much sense but there it
is another branch manager, Mark is raping him and repeatedly jucking him and raping him once more and assualting him to hell or not ends up on the table and he is visuallizing shaun being
banned forever and he wont be able to use this tool which you can follow everyday and day by day and shaun wont be able to abbly to his QA&&T job that he needs desperately even tho he 
makes millions and billions of dollars and has already paid and given money to the forces and will keep that as a slow trickle and as shaun is very excited to help these forces these are 
the same very forces that kept him alive and his lovers would be future lovers alive as he is very dormant as he has come to find out in the laws of mortality and there he goes reading the
overall and I don't have much time and shaun gives me one of his library sessions as his hands are going in a different speed and his eyes and trademarks and his typing is going strange does
that mean he is spirtually entertwined with the grave he doesn't know and the rats have told him how to type a little faster as he rests his fucking hands on the lightsaber and as barrack
already knows that this is only going to get worse for him and there sumone goes impersonating homeland security but its another queenie honkst that he acknowledged the other queenie honkst
but only silently alot like this torture that shaun is focusing on and he clearly loves the grave and that grave rock and all.

Now shaun just found out that it ain't going to be this June 8, 2023 and it ain't going to be this fucking December and it ain't going to be behind him nor around him and Wikittanica is saying
this could last all the way into june of '27 and that is so long and far into the future that shaun can barely take it imagine your life fleeting before your very eyes and he doesn't know anybody
and she could possibly be the leader of the CIA and there isn't anything else to say and she looks like Pfleger and she is the only one out there that understands and there isn't anything to be
done about it and Brittanica is usually right and there isn't anyway to decide for himself he thinks that u.s. armed forces that are displayed in the sky every night are now displaying the date
across the sky and Nicole responded vaguely and rudely and shaun can't take back the connection he sent on linkedin and she was indirectly through vocal fleck and innuendo that obviously adheres
to this very angle and there isn't anything to be dont about it and he thinks that Jody is participating in schadenfreude and he thinks that is true for all shaun knows is that it could be
next june and it could be until next year '27 because it isn't December and this is what they always do to shaun and I am talking the croonies crimmy cooks that are awaiting heavy prison
sentences and Taylor Swift just released her album and is obviously fucking a good looking black guy because she likes looks over reasons and says shaun is her man but she isn't throwing
herself at him or going up to him or promising anything and its all in disguise and she is delibrately acknowledging the sky and thinks that her team is against him and he just saw Barack Obama 
and he just acknowledged that he has no fucking idea and they are obviously keeping shaun hostage and he is relying on a convicted murder in jail and he doesn't even know that this is my
direct word for all he knows this could be all there is or anyone else House Nigger Kanye West who has taken on a different angle in his career and is now forming his famous persona around
Shaun and what he has done and he has a multi-million dollar concept or does he really Slyvia thinks that is alot longer and shaun is right when it comes to this type of crime when he is
just distanced and removed from any benefit of society and his girls his bitches that he calls him are passing in front of him and he just refreshed and jucked and realized that it is the
date that you see him before him and Brittanica has to participate in an act of terrorism and they realize that they cannot do this to shaun but they are already adding more time and more time
to his angle, to his case, to his very life being stripped away from him like nothing he knows all the girls before the only reason he can report my direct word and can work with this daemon
in the sky is because of the beautiful shape of the female who is working very hard and keeping it down and doesn't persuade with her feather tail unless shaun says and this is the only reason
he summoned which has been summoned before and I always have sumthing to do with it and now the women behind him is controlling the daemon and Michael the house niggert security gaurd and 
the honkie queenie junkt big tuffet Mark the branch manager who had the most disgusting look of lust upon his face today and has already openly admitted that he jacked off to taylor swift
and he isn't exactly breaking any law or anything morally and shaun is basically an open book and Taylor Swift is saving herself for him and is okay with celebancy and is so excited that
a man loves her in this fantasy as that queenie honkie high up Pfleger look alike honkie ass is very well known with all the fucking power in the world and this has always been a fucking
problem and there isn't anything else to do no I did'nt know I was getting out til shaun made his discovery and they kept it secret but really I knew in early '16 like everybody else so
fucking high up and regal and very unattainable and there is that house nigger micheal comin to rape you and assault you and now mark just walked up to him and openly admitted to him and
Lexi is saying through vocal inflection that he masturbates to him what is left of him and he just watch Free Willy and all.

Taylor Swift is one of the most gorejuss borgous buuge's as shaun calls him but that is what that house nigger Megan Thee Stallion calls him and is just performing as an innuendo Gucci Mane
and these people think they can do this to him endlessly and shaun doesn't know that Barrack Obama is working extremely diligently with Eric Holder and the rest of his team and they think its
only June 8, 2023 and that would be it so that would be about 7 years and 1 month or so but it could like I said be even further into the future and what is past is his life all lost ya' dig
and all.

When shaun wrote that he wanted to build commrodery but what it was really doin' was pullin' off long innuendo and off-kilter off-center and does anybody care and he wrote another thing
that is noticeable is the extreme and I mean gratifying human kruelty that takes years to perfect and do anything that is out there and shaun is currently listening to the album of the month
and shes a big cream pie and all shaun she has spoken for her and she is all marked and let Stephen King say his peace because she is all over his ass and because his sex appeal ever since
"Billy Summers" is this that he entered a court case and tried to get the daemon to hit the books and shaun thinks that all of these law decisions have already been made and the queenie honkie
junkt that obviously knows everything about shaun personally and there isn't anything really to know as he bands together with Mark and that is his wealth group as the house nigger micheal security
is passing him and repeatedely and will for the rest of the day hurt and harm shaun and will as they have been trying to do for and originally have been successful to make shaun commit any
ad all crime and he has committed looks like 3 misdameanors and these can instantly be changed into 8 serious felonies and that is how he was falsely incarcerated and these pigs act like
society hasn't changed and all john roberts has done is sign off his name with his croonie judges and law-ers like Maynard James Keenan who is a fuckin criminal minded or is he just supporting
pottings and is he third eye blind the one who hated on all and where to like and what to like back when shaun was on the forum and that is when they knew you where the reincarnated shakespeare
shaun it looks like as early as '14 and that is when taylor was fucking rich guy and the woman who was behind him is well known for honkin' and is one of the most deadly murderers there is
and gains trust and leeches and searches them in and builds even more trust like sum turtle in an egg and believes everything that they believe and shaun is thinking that this is very 
dangerous and he is right and know hows to supplement them and get behind them like she did and once again earn her trust which is their trust and leads them in and then fucking kills them
slowly and melodically and she has hall the judges and lawyers and Maynard is innocent it looks like and shaens saw him very early on and is remembering see him in Drake in early december
and shaun can't really understand what is being said and there is another fucking criminal whore walking free on my bought time and the new prime minister had to resign just like that 
fucking pope german that left all like in a hubbub and shaun strongest angle towards these demons is that there body is gone and Kanye is obviously committing self harm and no longer
has any face and is very happy about it and there it goes another down the drain and all.

He doesn't know nothing and nobody knows nothing and all.

When it getts as worse as this as Shaun was saying on his twitter account or did he say it on his Github he doesn't know anymore and there isn't anything to do as he sits and bludgeons shaun
repeatedly and he can't speak to him directly and there isn't any way around this and there isn't any way to be safe in this resulting crime that you see here today and he knows that by 
typing this his safety is up for grabs and the only reason that he is still alive is that this shaun rite here has never done anything to anybody as he just submitted his annonymous tip and
exactly where he was and where he is located now but he didn't describe the man because that would put his life in danger and he would be then be characterised as a snitch and he doesn't know
if Margot Robbie is in town she is a very busy and famous woman that is in the fame circle and shaun isn't listenin'g to his headphones today and look Drake has gotta hurt him and there is
nothing to be done about this and there he is with his attacker face down and gromeneling to his attacker that he is defenseless and this strange sexual arua is taking place and dare is no words
for it like always and Mark the branch manager is hapilly seeing shauns discomfort but shaun has him rite where he fuckin wants him and now hes not only on the buc but the lock and heed and
hes right when he submitted that tip today that this crime never took place and as long as shaun doesn't fuckin' look at knobby and as long as shaun respects his area and doesn't technically snitch
on him then no harm will be coming to him and there he is taking his punches and his death threats and now they are publicly harrassing and threatening shaun and they have no idea what to do
barrack is changing his emotion which they previously supported, admitted and predicted to and all.

When I gett like this between me and shaun and all.

He's clearly got a judge up his and a pig heart and that is how he does his bidding as shaun said saying so and just with that and just like that while a pig murderer blows by them heading west
on wilson ave. and saw the entire thing transpire and barrack obama is reading this intently and desperately trying to get everything and anything to hit the books but I am happy to remind you
that this hurt a court tribunal and that is all it takes when vladimir can blow up his own country and that is jus' how they are doing this as it was previously reminded and brought forth and
revealed with Joe Bidens secondary speech by his lip movements and his silent speech that he is moving his lips and saying sumthing completely different and the students behind him where saying
they are murderers and shaun is saying this is has been around since we was cannibals savages in the trees and hes right we have always been at war and its been heavily mechanized and modernized
for this day and age so there is a little more clearance and we can see the holocaust transpire and FDR clearly came again as the christ that he was and he discovered the inwardely body movement
as sumthin' else in this day and age and all.

When I gett like this who knows Jamie Foxx time now and there isn't anything to be done about it we just sit there and take our punches and our hits are you fucking kidding me and shaun is right
in what he is saying and the evil is right in front of us and taking our family members away like they did mine and it looks very lawfully and globercasterally and dutifully as shaun put it poetically
and what is that house nigger kanye west doin is he buying more things to feel more important and there isn't anything shaun can do and didn't house nigger kanye west offer the rest of his money
to the high up honkies junkt that are on his fucking ass for blowing the whole damn thing because as you know the niggers get carried away and shaun is right when he says we are clearly the next
step in evolution and as he sees his lebron and he has promised to see all of his game highlights sum other way other than MLG which is all the poor people watch these days and Lebron is in the
advanced stage of his career and there is nothing to be done about it and as Knobby the housed niggert fucked in the head I hate you for no reason has to seem him at the Cultural Affairs center
where all the people gather and collect there last meals and they get committed acts of sadism and masochist there ass to kingdom come and Auvri'll clearly knew he was going to take a fucking 
blade last night and I am proud to tell you that shaun proudly and sternly stood his fucking ground and even apologized to try to clear this thing up but their ain't no talkin to the savage
now is there shaun as this is redudant as this is the example of Father God or is it what we all have in us as common sense and shaun, plato, is the most vocal and has always been the most vocal
but what shaun is doing is all he is doing is saying what is best for everydamnbody and he loses himself in the process and there he is without his fucking pig heart ready to ditch both his
pig fucked in the head coppers and he is actually surrprised that he survived and the rest of his entire family is looking back at what there bodies used to be and look like and I am happy to tell
you that Molly doesn't look like herself anymore and kan no longer pot a kind clean boy that wishes her romanticism as she gets him and got him closer and shaun recognized she is achieving the
same sadistic pleasure and this is where you allow the boy to fuck you but at the same time your not giving all the sexual healing that the boy wants or desires and hell lick the clean dirty plate
of what is leftover and her his father gets to fuck her first thats right she fucks the father of the boy who is potted and that is one of most exquisite sexual experiences to see your face down
son wish that he had this woman and will spend years on the phone only texting and calling her and seeing her from time to time and then the face down artist father moves in and without any
gratification nor any work done to attain the sexual experience they automatically have the experience and its very daddy daughter and the father finds out how to do it the same as just as
his father did it with that slut kayla and there from there she gave all herself to Eric and while shaun was texting and begging and getting on his hands and knees and clearly go head over heels
for her and there isn't anything to say and all.

So there I was on my hands and knees and it lasted for fery long and it was as long as 9 nine years and the last time he saw kayla she clearly was breaking thru the daemon and that is the only 
reason that this happened that she came back to seem after 3 and half years once in 2014 and a couple times in 2015 and timed it out just as the shape of the female was about to ask him out 
or gett him to ask her out and shaun was very surprised and is clearly abouve his league and he loves her for that and there is another thing to listen to as shaun listening to Spina Bifida and 
getting pumped up but what shaun is really doin as a defenseless man and there is sumthin else going on here and there is this consensus achieving here and shaun is a fucking matyr and he is 
acknowledging chad and the band did the band change it from the youtube and shaun all shaun is doing is hanging on for dear life and kayla did a form of adultery figurtivity and shaun they
had no fucking idea until August 15 when they put a real hit on your life and shaun hasn't harmed anyone and that is why otherwise he would be fucking dead but mostly people don't know but
you actually need a cop or do you or does violene just come and go and their is nothing to be done about as it looks like Knobby left the house nigger that pulled a knife out on shaun and clearly
had his pig and his judge give him the go ahead and shaun actually reported that it was going to happen to the annoynomous tipper and he is thinking about Denzel Washington when he took shauns
words out his mouth and throughly and I mean throughly emboldened shaun and now he is thinking about kylessi and the Cersei is actually the real Cersei and he is wondering for how long he has
been doing a crime against humanity and just think that its ever since late '14 when you got blantantly posted and phoned up and you have to think about him for the rest of your days as it is
a very long winded and harsh evil to come up on sumone that is going the other way but shaun is realizing that this society ain't for him and now he has enough wind behind him but does he really
and all.

When you gett reminded that you ain't the only one in this world and look its ol' Uncle Larrie Hooverst up on the buc and look hes all in jail and that must mean he is on the side of good
as shaun took in my picture and harmoniously and affectionaly said that we were together as we shared one of my most cherished memories and look at me all happy and there I was all clean
and it was all in the family and I thought I was perfectly safe and already came to my discovery and there my son was taking in his father but I got ushered into jail as fast as I could 
possibly could and I made my discovery of gang violence hierarchy and it came from my beloved mother who is sacred and now dead and I talk to her everyday through this heaven escopal thing
and Barrack can't see it but he clearly is continuing on his relationship with his mother and there he is he will see that fuckin' knobby again who can only fuck his house nigger pussy flaps
and boy does his hunnies and the collective women know how to show it and shake it as they are swinging at the men and women and clearly all safe and gaurded and who is going to hit a fucking
woman and I mean nobody and I have achieved my calling and I am going or am I directly at Vladimir Putin as shaun was saving this for me and the higher up and you better fucking believe it
I can back it up and it looks like Barrack needs another one of his assassinations and is clearly showing why good is better and safer and more better well suited than what he is now and is
taking on what shaun is clearly thinking as Joe clearly acted him and he is putting the Joker to work and its working and shaun isn't holding back and there isn't anything else to hold back
or gaurd against as shaun has repeatedly stared into the face of certain death ever since August of 15 and they the evil are thinking making you think that there was a body count every time
you came into the hood shaun but I am surrprised to tell you that you actually provided light on the subject and have always taken a Trent Reznor word on this as it is the work of Thoreau and
he clearly didn't lead on to how strong he is and a 100 irishman would be all that it takes as we are good and have our innocence on this and he just got warned by Benoit and he is clearly
taking and leading the team and is very trusted and all.

Alright so here it goes and all.

There was so much to be said and so little time as it always goes like this and this is clearly Larry Hoover's word and that means shaun is taking more punches and Barrack Obama can hardley
believe it or can he and the man who took out a knife out on shaun and threatened to use it on him and take his life is sitting rite beside him and now will use the library for it looks like
the rest of the time and uses the Cultural Affairs Center on a daily basis and clearly has more money and is all sewn up and good and that was displayed across the entire sky and he didn't know
but one of his pig hearts that allow him to committ crime is all around him and he didn't even see it draw near by and the Pig SUV as shaun puts it didn't do anything in response and Mark
is being questioned by the Pigs as well and they asked him where you get his ring and how old he is and where he lives Mark lives in a Mental Asylum and is clearly on the side of good and
we got a kingpin for the disabled as he told Mark hes got nothing to worry about and shaun told him this history as shaun puts it the man who threatened him repeatedely and mocked him and made
him go into the fits just like Darlene that horrible person who is clearly buying time and Taylor Swift says she can no longer have any sexual experiences and it looks like Knobby is being used
to bait shaun and as long as Shaun keeps his distance doesn't talk to him doesn't acknowledge although he did today and because he did it front of a PIG cop once again he pulled out his fuckin
switchblade out on him because shaun didn't listen when he said what the fuck are you looking at and said don't look at him as he took shauns area and passed him and threatened his life in front
of him with his pockets which shaun previously predicted and he even gott an opposite gang member in front of his way and if he didn't move out of his way and didn't avoid him at all costs and
just take the grass then he would of gotten fucked up and inched in the whole and shaun is beginning to find out that the entire society is defenseless unless you gott a conceal to carry and sumone
to call like shaun has Jackson but Jackson has to avoid the Pig Portrayel or whatever the fuck this is and shaun is making ground and the Branch Manager of the Uptown Public Library of the Chicago
Public Library Association and Company and as shaun has said is many across this nation and in illinois and chicago for that matter is where he is now hitting his intellectual property hero && Insignia
with wheels and its enthralling and the giant public press machine is beginning to take it away as much as they can and everybody seems to remember him and he created a little freedom for Knobby
as he is a very haggard house looking nigger and is very terrifying as shaun has said he is currently showing emotion that you can only achieve by going all the way or seeing it but shaun
has this effinity with it and is very scared for his life but is he and all.

Whenever I get like this with Barrack Obama and all.

Whenever I gett like this between Shaun, Savoir of Mankind, Son of God and Krisha, Savoir of HumanKind and Leader of the World and God Itself and all.

Whenever I gett like this between me and Vishnu and all.

Whenever I gett like this between Alex Von Meilenwald and all.

Whenever I gett like this between me and Hermes and all.

Whenever the time or effort doesn't come and it doesn't achieve than you have a grand stand technology and a deep state and shaun just in fact proved they are in fact running a cladestine operation
and he is the reincarnated Thoreau he is the reincarnated Roosevelt and he is the reincarnated dark drug lord ecstasy cocaine herione you name it very violent very terrifying drugkingpin kinda like
what he is today and he is whole lot more terrifying because he has the music behind him but just for a second think of what shaun is and what he can do and what he means and he actually proved the
CIA was running a cocaine operation and he proved that the CIA just gives guns to the cartel and runs the prositution rings and sex slavery rings and all.

Whenever he getts close to the enemy and all.

Taylor Swift just made sum major sway and sold over 80 million dollars in cocaine over 68 million dollars in ecstasy and over 40 million dollars in herione and that is just to start why do you think
these substances are illegal its because now shauns would be murderer can walk around and at any time if shaun looks at him or avoids him the wrong way as shaun is being very over exaggerated and as
Knobby admits to it that he has sum kind of Supreme Court Justices at his behest and there isn't anything to be done about it as one house nigger to the left of him is assualting and raping him and another
opposite chink in the house of god and law is raping and assualting him you know the usual and shaun has needed to do this entire thing sober and all.

When Knobby knows where you live and theres nothing to be done about it and all.

Shaun I repeat you are a defenseless man and there is nothing to be done about this and you have to wait to an undisclosed date and shaun doesn't know but what is happeneing is
Barrack is desperately trying to get to him and shaun works for the CIA  no matter the circumstance no matter the way you are hired now shaun can go from the inside and he has all
of his ideas ready and a completely and I mean complete impressive online aura and ideas and even Riff Raff who is desperately trying to impress him with his legality and his power strech
and thats all his family does is take care of the mules that need taking care of if they get out of line just like Chad if they ain't dirty and shaun is right there isn't anything on
these criminals and shaun has proved it time and time again and all his work still stands and Barrack looks completely utterly helpless and Riff has to hurt him and Drake has to hurt
him and all.

When I gett like this close to the ones who summoned divinity and they just keep on doing this to shaun every single time he lives and FDR put sumthin in place so this can be not even
happening in the first place and is now talking to Lorenz that I have sumthin' to avoid and free all those prisoners and the man who has previously attacked him got his chicken and 
acknowledged that we keep us people in prison to feel good and there is this strange aura that follows and there is this aura to follow and he said, I repeat he has all the proof that
we all desperately need attached to his corpse and that is exactly where the daemon is and they are often reminding to shaun that they keep on doing this to him and shaun might as well
be in jail but if he was their they would send opposite informants with the ability to torture shaun beyond composure and beat silence into him and all.

His girls are all worried especially the one that is head over heels and she is Matilda the one goddess Pythia and Hermaphrodite and she is well known for bringing this divinity along
with Miss Americana Gladiat and she is a goddess as well and worked with FDR and models herself after a bunny and she is struggling to keep her composure and struggling to keep a straight
face and she has almost the same body and the same looks and shaun is providing alot of off-kilter and she looks like my woman and how we are very similar and she goes off and emboldens but
that is not all that she does and opens up sexual opportunities for all men that deserve it and is very good with the Asians and all.

When I gett like this with shauns cell phone and that herinious accessory to murder and real murder team Harry Styles and Peso Peso and Jack Harlow and Big Sean and all.

When you complete this is isit all that you wanted and is it all that you needed and all.

When you got this time for it and all.

When you gott this time double time and triple time and this should of never happened to you shaun and they are clearly living on borrowed time and they are admitting to it and they think they
have all the power in the world as the man who passed shaun with his fucking dog gave this face that he does and his team and his political team and his judicial team and his militia and his
armed forces or whatever the fuck he has in his behest like shaun says and all of the leaders that are now changing bodies and into a different species entirely and there it goes another Zizek
brick that shaun needs to have and understand and shaun is being tortured by his own discovery and is face the fuck and I mean face the fuck all the way down and doesn't know any common decency.
And shaun doesn't know what to look where to look and what to see and there goes sum house nigger impersonating my woman my love and my everything that needs to be dealt with and I mean as fast
as humanely possible and ushered into jail and shaun has always known that these people can come after him after all and without any law because they are on the rite side of things and all.

What is remembered and all.

When he gets this close to Avrille and all.

When he gets this close to Vishnu, Hermes, Krishna, Shape of the Female, Odin and now the Savoir of Mankind and all.

When he getts this close to the Michel Foucault and all.

When he gets his butt this close to the da Sigmund Freud and all.

When he getts close to his loyal leader Larry Hoover and all.

When Larrie Hooverst getts this close to this Barack Obama and all.

When you get this close to the very ending point and all.

There is men standing behind him and in front of him and they wonder what needs to be done and shaun is living in two realities and all.

When Mark the Branch Manager watches him have sex and all.

When Mark the Branch Manager of the Uptown, Chicago Public Library watches him and rapes him closely and all.

When I gett like this all I want is my word and Pfleger is clearly on the side of good and all.

When I get like this I want to push a woman onto the couch and let her know that it is about to go down and all.

Whenever I gett this close to Denise who is clearly on the cide of good and Irish and Danish looking and Mesopotamain and Eastern European and clearly swedish irish and all.

Whenever I say this is the word Rahm Emanuel getts all upset and voided and has to use his criminal lies and his kriminal persona and never admit anything to obama and obama has to forget everything
but he just revealed to shaun that this is a cover up and he can remove any and all violence from the human equation population and he thinks he wants to keep killing family members and all.

When he knows his Margot Robbie is right away and close by and all.

When Christian Bale did sumthin' above all their fucking heads and admitted shaun is letting them win and all.

When you cannot do anything about it like Charles Bukowski who clearly was on the side of good and did everything he could possibly do to throw these murderers the fuck out and him and shaun have earned
it even tho shaun hasn't earned his fighting skills and all.

He will get his and shaun knows that he is going to lose like Sting and he knows the right way to lose and give it to the man like he is in the sky and prove and shaun has earned it figuratively and is 11-8
and going after the people the same size and is emboldening the entire human race and is completely defenseless as he will make another noble point to the chicago police which is the midwest at large and
David Brown is completely innocent and hand-picked by obama and he was like sitting in his mothers garden and he has opened his heart to obama and shaun continues to lead the pack and there isn't anything
else to be done about it and he is now the CEO of CIA(that has been infiltrated like one of his idols Steve Buscemi one of the greatest actors there is and only getter better) and all.

What shaun is doing is typing out my direct word and their trying to take away the glory and kanye west that house niggert is trying to go back to the glory days of when they brought violence and
murder to the ones who are close by and to us and all.

When he looks at sumone and he says let us mosey and it is very animal like and that is how you get those who come on to leave you alone because the are in your world and in your grill, like
Eminem, and he is very famouse with the accessories and all the evil and they think that is correct shelter but shaun knows that Eminem is one of the most dangerous if not the most dangerous
gangmembers there is and is clearly left but is all rite and very sinola and juarez and mezzi and lustmore and alex von melienwald and knows where his audience wants him to take it and shaun
just listened to his album again and Zella is hitting it hard and knows that she is done for but she always knew she was done for she is part of the gangs and the police and the judiciary and
the political team and the G-8 world team that kill, hunt and murder us family members in cold daylight or the harsh of winter dead at night and there isn't anything to be done about it and
shaun is achieving vengeance and thinks he saw what he reminds himself of friends and clearly is in his gate and is doing what he is supposta do and Riff is clearly out of his gate a little
and bringing forth shaun sum new insight that this is his intellectual property hero and insignia idea and House Niggert Kanye West stole it all the image and all of his charisma and what is
necessary to complete this plan that is successfully been hatched and as long as shaun keeps remembering to post this as long as he, I, can type this and as long as I can relate this directly
to Barrack Obama and noone else then we gott nuthin' to worry about and there it all is and all.

When he gets reminbered that Mark can do anything to him and clearly has a meeting coming with the powers that be and I mean not hospital Mark who is severely stunted but can recant how the
police streated him and shaun is amazed at his levels of differing intellect that he can sho and Mark can clearly see all of this and read all of this and is perfectly safe and ya we gott a bull
that can represent the handicap and there it is, a Man, that can carry on and execute what needs to be done and if the criminal where to threaten his life and he is stunted but has passed the
tests and will continue to pass the tests that is all the way into manhood and will take on all comers and know the left and the right and everything in between to represent and protect mark
and mark is just a peon a normal citizen but clearly way into the left more than shaun is and gave him the good signal and when we show our might the evil scatters and causes dissarray and what
might be true isn't and all.

When he getts this close to G-Eazy and all.

When I get this close to G-Eazy, one of more best and brightest in command and shaun is giving him a little insight and taking G-Eazy's insight and shaun is learning from him tha' he always has
and all.

Whenever shaun is in danger he always and I mean always steps up to the plate and that is for his purpose and the gangs purpose and this isn't the first time that he has had a weapon fucking
pulled on him for no reason and he thinks that a grandma saw it or one of his gangmembers saw it and they saw the opposite fucked in the head mucus zombie fucking put his hands on his pockets
and they tried to apologize to him again but they really issued a stern warning and death threat and shaun is realizing that his life isn't getting any better and always emboldens the troops as
shaun is one of the soldiers most heavily regarded and will take on all comers and will stop at nothing to get to the truth and is a shining example of what is what it takes and what it double
takes to get to where he is and ya hes gotta feather foot or grovel but is he really house niggert who attacked him is he fucking really he knows you know that he is defenseless and there isn't
any other way to put it and there isn't any other way to put it Michael Pfleger is one of the greatest fathers that there is. And he is the choice, the voice but it is really shaun and he is 
a master at avoiding the problem at hand and the problem at hand that is in his gamut that is in his racket and has completely utterly and I mean complete distanced from his begotten family 
and does not care the amount of vengeance retribution pain that is coming on down to them and will help them when he is ready and is already twisting the knife on his fucking flag ass
father who ya fucked kayla right beforehand and he got really fucking close to shaun almost to close and shaun could here his pig breath and shaun was fucking wondering why he ain't lookin'
thru our hourglass thru the eyes of good and Kanye West is doing everything and anything to contain his emotions because shaun doesn't attack and this is how he is getting close to them by
his study and looks likes a complete stone and knows there is many things hard to swallow as life always comes and goes and doesn't like good and doesn't like bad and equal is all that we are
after and this is how it goes as any nature all throughout history this is good vs. evil and Kanye West is clearly on the side of evil and trying to splain how else to House Niggert look at it
and shaun did this in his last life and he went down in a blaze of glory and clearly made me and my sons ass as you can see clearly in that picture and what this does is this. Never lookin'
back and all.

Only protecting him and his own like the black people, the asian people, the hispanics, the middle eastern ME's and then what else um I forgettin' o ya the whites that lead us and there in
a position of power and house nigger Kanye Westian is now looking back at his house and shaun knows how to look and where to look and what is remembered is that Jackson is all the way the 
fuck and I mean completely over this and shaun is bringing in new insite and knows sumthin' that nobody else knows but krishna knows and vishnu knows but do they really and all.

When its hard to realize that men have used shauns sexual persona to forward their love life and gain ritches as two very powerful and law-abiding house nigger murderers sit beside shaun
and kontinue to rape him and flower him and say they got his bitch(es) and what god damn else and all his fucking money and all.

Looks like Michael the house nigger murderer security gaurd can't do nothin to him even tho he is reading over shauns shoulder and everything that has been said and what nees to be said and
I love this part shaun just gotta infiltrate the CIA from the inside and they did him the fuck in last time and shaun is reading the brittanica posts that the CIA actually through President
George W. Bush, President at the time and still is  but is all dead now just like his house niggert wife and the bastard son had two terroristicsuccefultwo-terms and he emboldened everyone
that Osama Bin Laden was acting like acting as him and outook what is the greatest terrorist attack of all time and clearly was an inside job by Jesse 'The Bod' Ventura one of the greatest
thinkers of good that good has to offer these days and lest we get on back to what shaun is doing he just applied to the CIA and not only does he have two agrees two sho, an associates and
I mean a Bachelors of Sciece in Computer Science and with concentration of Computer Science and he didn't really learn nothing and he still doesn't know nothing and that is what you get with
TAH and the learning glass and Kimmel his idol is completly innocent and knows he helped summon this daemon and is thankful for all the gang secular forces for what the did for him and what
his plate means and what they are representing to him and what shaun is clearly saying to him and he is pulling all of the opposite bulls out and showing what these forces can do and all.

Whenever its gets like this as they continue to paint the lull and take away from this moment and all.

Whenenver I get like this I want to say that it is the remainder of what we know and all.

Whenever I get like this close to shaun and he gets close to me and all.

Whenever its like this and whenever its like this one thing that it is all that I want I don't regret I don't live it I wouldn't take anything away I just woudln't of gotten nasty pinched and
I mean fucked in the head by sum pigs junket that clearly had their name out for me and even my would be assasin that I pulled the trigger on in order to get into jail for a would be pig
murder it would be as darnit as I could possibly gett and there is nothing that is in my name even tho my family is living in complete and utter luxury and there isn't anything else to say
but watch them enjoy my life and my luxury that I have gotten for them and my son is great at it but not as great at it as I am and even shaun is distancing himself from the empire and
most likely will just hold just like any other music star and actor star just like jamie foxx and as shaun is typing this a pig honkie right next to him that follows shaun and is impersonating
shaun and there isn't anything to do about it as that whore Brittany Murphy that slamdunk basket bitch woman nba star sum kind of name don't matter brittney gardner impersonates shaun and
he thinks vladimir putin power is all it takes and thinks that kim jong un has the army and the secular army and they don't listen to him no shaun they listen to me and there it is another
day down the fucking drain and beople are living on bowered time and all.

When I get this close to that fucking house nigger honkiest niggerst will thank you Kendrick Lamar and now they are bumpin' his music and shaun clearly got fuckin' more potted but like he said
he was just using it as a whole with a name and there you go his begotten sex slaver accessorie to murder face down artist act know don't likin' all in the knowhow but failed at his job and
gott fired by Craig and shaun will continue to work with and showed his real fucking jokerlawyer face around craig and notoriously talked down to him and even indicated to shaun that he is 
gott a face down here and is using him to scotts to glory as the pig honkie with all the power in the world as shaun realizes is all you need to take is the vladimir putin power that sweet ol'
face of death and vengeance but the oppossite vegenance that we all know and love and all.

When I gett like this close to shaun and it gets there and we take it to certain highs and we have to lead the public faith and all.

When I gett like this close to humorouph Vishnu who is very deadly and very attacky and he fucking needs to be and as shaun needs to weigh down the dial and continue to face down the entire 
market and we all have it in his name and what there is do next and as he continues to take it to certain highs and I mean certain fucking highs and is on the buttle button and is getting 
several guns pointed at him as he listens to My Dying Bride and as he thinks that Barrack Obama has passed by him and will again and he will take another potshot at the CIA, defunct FBI 
the chicago sector and humongous CPD which is housing the most dangerous criminals that are known and they are known as the fucked in the head murder pigs day my name day my said and 
have perfectly clean records and will stop at nothing to say any other way and as a house nigger basically grabs the computer screen that shaun is using and the computer is dead even
the word computer and Dan Patterson Don Dellio Paul Giamatti is a fuckin whouse white honkiest little bitch and there isn't anything to be done and the most trusted and most respected 
librarian Nitin is the only one fucking innocent and clearly still under Teresa's the house white house killers that catch and capture and all italian's victims had to do was sumthin'
wrong and that would be it they where in it and any form of petty innocent harm as Lil' Durk would put it is now exalted executed take what you want and dispose of the body and the CIA
just simply made it look like a clean up operation and everyone is very law-abiding and as shaun is repeating this word and Leonard whent clearly over the line and is now stuck on
Zabihullah Mujahid's timeline and shaun thinks that he can't do nothing and I want you to retweet the rest of his word today shaun if you could please and thank you and I know that you can
go there as I know that I am impersonating Zella or is it Jamial or is that fucking house niggerst honkiest Auvrille and he wont need this anymore now that he is figuratively and I mean
completely indefinitely banned from the likes of the Uptown library and the Bezazian branch as he makes sure to spell that right and he knows I only gett one library session per day and
there it is all you need to die but they don't know that the side of good took out the deals but also hunted and killed bad because they killed all of our family members and shaun is really
into jim davis and his garfield that is a universal symbol of good and shaun needs to be strong even tho he is defenseless and he made a very good point yesterday and that we all are already
completely defenseless just like Auvrille and he clearly knows sum shooters and can report shaun to the business community and once shaun gets labeled an adulterer with the likes of him
the #1 developer and computer scientist in the world and I mean completely and noone even touches shaun and as he takes in his Drake and he is clearly adding alot more darkness and that is
all it takes to get sumone justed and killed in the streets for what they did wrong and shaun dey knew they was up on that ol' Larry Hoover plates and I want you to remind yourself shaun 
that if you do anything to these people shaun they can and will exalt exact violence upon thee and shaun has to skirt and shark tail the fuck out of there because if shaun doesn't move out
of his way and if shaun doesn't respect the whore witch that has innocent blood on her hands and all they made was 30 grand are you fucking kidding shaun knows as well as everybody that
30 grand is so eazy to make as Nitin completely agrees that this is heinous and is clearly getting younger and handsum and his true love is in tulsa and he is thinking about moving out
and the beloved family wants them to as he just got pointed by one of the most dangerous kingpins at his st. thomas of canterbury and just what is it house nigger in the green looking and
listening to shaun and reading over his shoulder you got a fucking probelm with this god send as shaun is getting a kick out of this and you know who this is and I'm speaking thru shauns
daemon that he summoned with his beloved wife the shape of the female and your acting like you don't know but this is Larry Hoover you gang leader and there I just named when and where you was 
and shaun has to mind your area and not fucking look at you or he is going to get another act of violence as they so politely call it and Brittny Gardner is going to get alot of years for
what she is fucking done and your acting like you getta blow job from that man look alike and now your descreating my beloved wife as shaun adds his pain and his monarchy and the whole
point of this discovery is to meet the queen and they threw her to the fucking wind and as Italian acts like he is going to indefinitely band shaun for repeating his gang leaders word and
there ain't nothing to worry about and shaun is fucking scared but is he really and is all ready to die and Italian acts like he is from the streets and doesn't know anything and acts all
tuff and Drake just stole your sway and acted just like them and NERD is clearly getting younger and more handsum and shaun clearly looks up to him alot and isn't like that House Niggerst 
Chance the Rapper who gets his name from as that nigger is dozen and clearly very high and very dangerous what he is doin and clearly that house nigger on the right of you is reading this 
right now you know you people are on my buried time and most people have died and all.

There goes Teresa the murderer and rapist and all.

There comes Teresa living on borrowed time and no they cant do this thru brawn or their political branch power as FDR clearly took this ancient and I mean ancient power of life out from
their would be clutches and all they do is toss the name figurative thought into the next realm as shaun had to work a barback job and is clearly going through cover up scheme to cover up
scheme and doesn't know why it is taking this long as barrack obama will now pass in forward in front of him and shaun is clearly rockin his name and labeling him for acts of violence and
discrepency and there ain't no more to this oh' is he done dozen and these people don't give a fuck all they care about is to juck and fuck their house nigger name and there is Teresa acknowledging
what shaun is exactly typing Teresa would have no fucking idea what to say other than what this torture robot is saying that is adhered to shauns fucking johnson and telling her how best to 
torture shaun and there ain't nothing to do about it as My Dying Bride is getting better and better and I made this direct word yesterday and all shaun is doing is relating the direct word
from Larry Hooverst and Riff related to him that he in is fact telling the truth but Riff took another gun scare but like always zesty reall my nig up high on the clouds but clearly taking 
a lighter weight and sumtimes attacks his hunnies for no reason and his cids don't get as much as fucking father figure and shaun will have this same problem but they woman known how to deal
with it and god rest here name shaun thinks its hannah or sumthin kristie or goochie shape of the female is all he knows and calls her dr. pepper because she is very good with colour and
leading it looks like the entirity of Egypt once again and that is where her hispanic humpy dopey lookin all together people now came from or some kind of Espana and shaun knows now that
we all came from the future of Egypt and migrated after eating the fruits and vegetables of the dead bodies and harvested together the species and befriended animals and Jacques which is now
his protection Brandon and its the same fucking story over and over again and its the same people that lead throughout history as the Hispanic people like to kindly remember and they always
take a moment to remember khrist and what they did but what they really remember is Odin Alex Von Melienwald and what he again as all throughout time and there has been different Vishnu's as
they do take turns and I have been the Savoir once and in a while and whoever reaches the plantiff the precipice of this human thought as the house nigger rapes and says this and that with his
hands like shaun is going to fucking die and shaun would fucking die and shaun larrie hooverst johnsuck it bitch and he made all that is right there it is as shaun is remembering what Shakespeare
has said and what his direct word is that after we befriended the animals the pegasus mated with heaven and it came to the womb my beloved wife and from there and all.

So here it is again once again and the library is closed off tomorrow and will be open this coming Friday and that means shaun will have to trek all the way to the Lakeview Pantry where he
is heionously and I mean heinously marked and graved and digged and dug and one of his bunk mates is that he is going down yes the one with the curly hair and its all red and he warned shaun
multiple times not to be so god damn friendly and he ain't giving up on this as one murderer sits right in front of him and shaun found instantly that he committed 8 murders and it looks
like some 20 sumthin' accessory to murders and has raped about 10 women and all they do is just do it like Michael the security gaurd that desperately wants to indefinitely ban shaun and 
he did one a boy that did nothing and was all scared on his death day and he shaun has seen several death days and there ain't no matter he can't fucking die are you serious he is complteley
untouchable as the murderer grabs his ass an old white with glasses and in all black and as the house nigger cleaner who has 6 rapes of most likely shauns cleanup under his house niggerst belt
and there ain't no stoppin to it and there ain't no fucking telling to it either and shaun is very careful not to say anything fucking thing and he ain't no snitch just namin the crimes and
the crimes done upon done onto him and he is technically and is the actual CEO of the CIA and we shall see if they can continue to use it against him now and the CIA is technically the 
Secret Service and represents the same branch and shaun likes this but this is all about retributions for the family members we have since lost and its all about this Barrack Obama vengeance
and it takes on this sinister Steve Buscemi loss and regarding returning what is rightfully owned and seen and all. 

It looks like the house niggerst shawn is showing up and standing the fuck down and keeping his distance and just had to run hurried all scared because that man clearly changing into his
new specimen body is noone and I repeat noone to fuck with even tho shaun can take a couple guys and he will get into the dirt matter of it right now and hes completely right when it comes
down to it there ain't no remark savin' and noone is coming to save you because you technically ran into it and he is looking forward to being homeless as the curly red hair rat faced house
niggerst very fucking dangerous very fucking do willing can't do anything about it just like the victim black lets call him and her and you don't know and all.

When I gett like this close to shaun for the 8th time and his dealer looked like drake and he got ride of him and all.

So there it goes another magic hilarious word from Larry Hooverst which shaun likes but owes up to him that there is nothing saving him nothing to be there and his own family and especially
Molly and shaun connected or at least tried to connect with her past boyfriend Lucas and he had this look upon him like I see nothing black in you nor that I like and shaun is so clearly white
it hurts the eyes and is moving his way on Robbie who clearly only wants white and she knows they do it better and that is why it is safegaurded because they want nothin' to tarnish it and that
its just like us black people we want to keep it pure and we have and where ectually more evolved because we found divinity and there is that dance and shaun just found out the woman who
used to be a women killed 3 people the fucking whore than used his discovery rite in front of him and all.

Then she saw what he wrote and Rupurt Murdoch CEO Secret Service all the fucking power in the world and is now housing all of the murderers and the rapists and all of the attackers known to man
and I want you to know shaun that your life is gaurded your doin rite by me Larry Hooverst the King of the House Attack Murder Nickers and all.

When you see Tenise do you think of all of her hardship or is it just hard to see and all.

There is Teresa giving the word and looking very much younger and all.

When Teresa chastizes shaun repeatedely and not only inwardely rapes him and outrite rapes him repeatedely and physically attacks him and makes him feel that he is crazy and it looks like
I am changing the world and barrack was hardship and didn't want me to do it this way but he judges my word and respectss my judgement and there ain't nothing comin in between me and j'ail.
And it looks like I am assassinating or it looks like I would like you to believe is because that I am already in jail and shaun had a couple transvestites and shaun doesn't remember
because he was drugged and roofied but he had a transvestite that sucked his fucking cock or did he pet her shoes then a sock and that fucking house niggerst Major best friends to Yancy
ass he was suckin and motor boating and encouraging shaun to go ahead he had this fucking look that shaun will never forget and that is what they have tried their best to do and they
tried to cover him in incest because shaun is so fucking sexually deprived so fuccking face down and it looks like another ones gotta go and all.

I am already in jail and shaun is a cod piece and all.

When it comes to him and there ain't no stoppin no tellin' no clickin' and no compin' and no majorin' and no masterbatin' and look at house nigger security gaurd micheal as he com'pleted
3 rapes and is very real proud about it and doesn't like his new body and he ain' no tellin' and he ain't no matterin' when it comes to this and all he can do is act like kanye west and 
its known as kanye west syndrome now and shaun is what it named it and they think they are ready to die and goto jail just like that walmart that is all over his fucking do-web and shaun
has to complete real work to get a real job and the personal website is good enough alone to get a real job and shaun wants one of those remote jobs that you can submit work but shaun is
discovering that you need a real machine to do this code test and quality assurance engineering job and his begotten sex slaver holder accesorie to murdery rapey wapey father ass face down
i fucked kayla and keep you from a job and made it real hard for you and another whore just came on the fuckin and committed 10 accessory to murders and is responsible for 18 girls getting
raped and I mean completely raped and shaun has participated in 8 rapes and agnessa technically raped him but he didn't he sas it was consenshuall and there is teresa raping and assaulting
him again and it looks like the secrety of defense ash maker had to die and fake his natural death because he is one of the most dangerous terrorists and openly admitted it to O bama all 
under his nose not while he has FDR and Krishan he ain't as he has all throughout history and krishnast is trying to embolden him and telling him why are you getting cold feet but shaun
doesn't have any cold feet at all now does he 10 accessory to murder Teresa he don't and all.

When it matters and shaun is such a piston all he has to do now is juck, move and listen and art'ist and see the crowds and move up and down the state and responsible with his men and his
worker women and fuck his ju ju's thas all hes gotta do and there ain't no way to trust any man these days and that is why there is a big curl around his fucking jape and there ain't nothing
to prove shaun is one of the most gaurded foundations and is very outlieary and very insteadian and very comedian westorian and it looks like shaun built him for this exact problem and there
it goes all down the drain my fucking whore beauty and shaun has told them repeatedly and will most likely again because he likes repetition and repeating himself into a meditation and just
c'ompleted a'nother thing in the sky that is good for all of us and in the sky yesterday was Larry Hoover and all the prisoners as shaun just made it overall Larry Hoover so its looking
working pristine but shaun doesn't know it doesn't look right and its very regradeducked up and there ain't no fixin' it and all shaun has to do is repeat it as Barack Obama as he just
inhabitated his body and is proving that it is a complete practice of it all and all once more.

There it was there it all laid out and I had a fuckin boner and the women lied I thought they where two good looking women at a transvestite club where women like to go to but shaun
has a long plaster tolerance and looks forward to the bite and can last long all night and has been repeatedly and I mean its hard for curls to see taken advantage of and its hard to see
him take another 6-7 years or so of complete chastity and celebancy and its hard for Taylor Swift to see that its so fucking normal and shaun is right there ain't noone to date except his
fucking hand and shaun makes sure and shaun noticed that his father achieved this sexual loss luster and complete I mean complete sexual lust and there is another whore who shaun had to
make sure that she has the criminal posting a fucklitting shaun like hes sum kind of post malone machine one of our most shining stars and thinks the sky is the world for shaun and hes in
the harvest awaiting because hes good with the women and putting them in their place just like Bukowski and she committed the whore at hand 8 accessory to murders and there ain't no tellin'
what there is to relate to what there is to see and who to believe but you get the idea shaun it is now your fucking death day and its always been his death day and you can die for no reason
as Lil' Durk is trying to say and Tommy Wright the Third that shiny how the house niggerst who attacked shaun was saying he looks just like dem and Post Malone is jazzy and sonice and had 
that small nigger on his album and he looked all good an innocent and therare it is another sonice transfer of everything that the secret service needs to know and it is very public but
the only reason shaun isn't getting jousted the fuck out by Mark the branch manager and house niggerst micheal saying we read your public profile and somehow found it like the Merlo Belmont
Branch of the Chicago Public Library done by Branch Manager of the Merlo Belmont Chicago Public Libaryst and then the house niggerst security gaurd who has desecration hair and all done up
and causin' some grave remarks and horrible distance and emotional pain for all the families that she is involved as an accessory to murder father and mother Rupert Murdoch one of the most
dangerous faces known to man and knows shaun that he knows they kney about ever since '10 or even earlier before that and does it fucking matter if they knew the entire race would be changing
into sperman and the whores would lose all of their feeling and continue 'ing their exact exalt death violence that if anyone is caught in the fucking cross hairs and i am emboldening shaun
as he fucking does this and shaun is saying nerd that he is the best at it and they had a crowd that is dancing rite in the frount of chance the rapper one of the most dangerous fucking 
hillary clinton fucking rahmn emanuel terrorists there is and killed boys and has openly admitted to his in his videos that they had no idea how to fucking drive or they fucked the rong girl
and all.

Are you fucking kidding me teresa that is all the togo books that you have to stack and she knows it means more pain and torture for shaun and they just come in these criminals with all
the law safety and the law to get murdered by the likes of Eminem no they didn't see this fucking coming as they always do and she, Teresa remember the accessory to murder all free, is personally
responsible for 20 young old women and girls for getting fucking figuratively and naturally raped and they got what they got comin to them because they believe in personal freedom and equality
and like to juck and trust nand it looks like they got raped as shaun is inventing new words as Mark Zuckerberg and Mark the protected and innocent and will see shaun at this grill as Shaun
indicated that he will make sure that the free-walkin' Darlene will get his order rite and the accessory to murder father and husband Fernando didn't get it right and now there is this little
young whore girl that has committed 3 accessory to murders and she is really 14 reals old and they always lie about there age as chance the rapper is clearly older and nothing like bushwick bill 
the innocent and who shaun has said was personally responsible for containing the sweet saving of life livelihood and shaun is realizing did he fall for it and that little protected dangerous
if you come on leaves on to her accessory to murder lavish house and is holding back and it looks like their baiting shaun now and it looks like a mother and daughter team, the mother has 
committed 10 but it looks like more and suppossedly her daughter has committed looks like 4 and thats good for now shaun tanks.

So shaun do you think that you like Amy? Is that sumthing to you wanted to do and is it here and now and do want to protect her sum more and add her to the
protection farm as you hold her and there ain't not meddling no preparing no more no more juckin no more knowlegde that you gett when its like this one 
more time and its just like the last time and she had to haze shaun just like her sorority sisters and clearly shaun wasn't good enuff but she didn't wanna 
do it and he is clearly real sweet and that fucked in the head andy mechemt watched a movie with her and clearly got it in with her and repeated to you that 
this is all that is take is to get good with her and say this or that and it looks like Rihanna just reported her direct word an is Amy really married and 
is she not married anymore and Paris Hilton said she just got a divorce and is clearly on shauns side now that his all built up but I am happy to report 
that she is happily married and shaun took another hit of humilty and public humiliation to gett on the good side just like he did Diplo and he just reminded 
Sylvia that he has a really stun gun fake gun scare and they know where it is going and shaun feels like he is typing this underwater and now they are 
changing the githup repeatedly and without harm now and forever until the end of time and Rihanna didn't really get married to ASAP Rocky but she did ist 
and clearly shauns dicovery is getting this more clear and more clear and that leader of the mob is rather dangerous and all sturdy and operating under the 
presumption that this is a fucking game to you all and you dont want to give in to us the ones that are crying sleeping right next to our bed pillow and 
there it goes another one down the fucking drain helped out by the one and only Amy and now they think this is a fucking game and there is Michael Pfelger 
all whatsompit and there I gott it all said and done and there he is impersonating Marcus Roberts Larry Hoover and there isn't anything to say and it looks 
like Mother Justice Supreme Court John Roberts is performing and acting as the kingpin bull now and there is all had and done up and in his power scheme and 
shaun has to know what he has done and what he has done in the fucking past and it looks like El Chapo has got it down pat and there ain't nothing saving 
shaun from a random stabbing or a random death look or stare and it looks like its curtains and all.

Lest We forgt let us remember one time what you have done to us and what you will proceedly do to us again and again as we learn our lessons and take away 
from us what we are and what is remembered and what is going on and what is doing to us and now its like a satellite paul wall and there ain't nothing to say
but what is here and what is here right now and it looks like shaun is focused and knows what to do and is clearly on the side of good because he is all helpless
and that is what they did after we successfully jailed all of them and it looks like they jailed all of us all those who are the strongest and it looks like
I got alot people devcieving us and me as I took that picture with my son and it looks like shaun is the statue of liberty and who made that was it thoreau or 
was it after his next life after thoreau as Nancy Pelosi kindly remembered him that he is the most deadly and jus who well his remembered past father grand
father mister daddie himself and he is looking at a man and his girlfriend and he isn't supposta to be doing that and there is Mark the Branch Manager taking
his figurative punches and he finally knows when he is going to jail and shaun just took another thing that man looks like trump and there he is wearing
a motorcycly helmet and there is michael gosh jee that house niggerst security gaurd really wants to slam him poet him and grab him the fuck outta there and 
it looks like El Chapo is one of the most darkest individuals and can inhabitate the daemon no matter what and it looks like he is on his frack again and there
it was EL Chapo has to take a bat now and he just took a fucking bat to the face as Nancy Pelosi puts it and he is too good looking but is it really el chapo
and did he take another punch after that and it looks like the likes of El Chapo who we are afraid to see and it looks like shaun is floating us near here and
you think that with our innocence you can hold us for no reason and it looks like the man is very dangerous and is holding a gun and shaun can't do anything 
and is now helpless and Jackson just reminded him that he is on the side of good just like Drake and he knows that he has alot of things to go against and there
is that notorious mob leader doing the work of the presidents and adding to the task lists and getting up to his post and sliding on another fucking tag that
can hold us here and remain here and no that El Chap can inhabitate the Rupert Murdoch discussion where you are told how to torture shaun and who to act in the
community and scale up walls an use it for any illegal material that you can possibly think of and there is El Chapo all said and there is Nancy Pelosi all
said and done and partaking in the desecration of the Queen Elizabeth Saint Marie many times over and here beloved saint husband Prince Phillip who never
ascended to the thrown but you must grow thru children and families and Shaun was King once and was King Henry and all.

He can still useit and he can still glance it and never feel any sorry for any of this bad and all.

There it goes another way to describe wat is exactly happening and there shaun goes all sad and timid and coy but is he really he has never had to stare at
a gun at the face thanks mark but really he has and staid up to it and has taken a shotgun in the bus one time and look directly into its face and didn't 
care and had to be fucked up on sum kind of weed alcohol cocktail and that is all shaun can find these days as mark the branch manager is clearly bucked
to scotts glory and going way the fuck over board when it comes to this torture and he is suprised that El Chapo has taken it over and how can he possibly
do that and they have nowhere to go and nothing to do and they are clearly talking to their murder pigs and judicial happy kronies as just what to do and all.

There it goes another day and it looks like its just verbal words now and it looks like they have a penis with DJ Drama and house nigger drama can now 
regurgitate lawfully that shaun can take another gun scare and verbally, figuratively admitted to even on the phone that we are working with you and against
you as shaun didn't give it away but he did give it away and whose diein these days it certainly isnt Mark the Branch Manager of kisskasay the ones who r
the most prissy the most commanded and as Shaun goes with the music here The Ruins of Beverast, Exuvia, there is sum clear house niggerst around his tail
and there he goes another way to say sorry and it looks like he going to say another thing and think of another and there is Saorise Ronan who keeps it up
and shaun made sure to keep the pettiness on the table that lovely sircle that if anything is done and you do or say anything but as shaun as always repeated
I do not have my life on the line I am not in it nor have I done any wrong to anybody and is clearly real dark and grackrock and darkly moulded as shaun
often remembered that we started to openly admitting to shaun as they skate and glide on dead nigger blood and dead spicky wicky blood and thats all maybe
sum asiays maybes um ME's and now all the good kind hearted honkies but not really honkies and shaun is clearly on the side of good and is clearly way the
fuck in it and clearly a wicked 6ix and just does it because its annoying and they have a team of honkies crystal meth pig fucked in the head crystal meth
darn I say it murder tooths and there all safe and shit just like long brain who is taking on a different person and now they know what it takes to get over
the line and that I mean it is nothing I mean nothing that is there and there ain't nothing to save you and there ain't nothing to be remembered and all.

When you gett like this shaun what do you do and there isnt wasnt anything to safe you and I know shaun that you ain't snitchin and you ain't on the clear of
head and whatever you do and clearly will never step over the line again and will get as close as possible to that line as you possibly can and X-Men Nerd is
clearly on your side and clearly oppressed and getting younger and a powerful Irish well known king pin and will do whatever it take like Neckface and its
Nasty Neckface now and we looks soft and kind hearted and they know that shaun is the most powerful well known man and has survived many attacks and I repeat
has taken many attacks just like Drake has and you gotta feel the breathe of life and its the most last certain curtain call and as shaun wears the hammer of
justice around his neck and is clearly taking the punches as he clearly does and outlasting this outlasting and standing the test of time and never backing down
and I repeat held up his hand and simply said to the man no don't do it and sumhow got out of the way and that is how you get stabby wabby to death and there
ain't no tellin' him when he gets his back against the wall and there ain't no tellin him what they fuck to do and he lasts another test of time and they
no exactly where shaun is and where his fucking whereabouts are and there ain't no tellin' him that we have to deal with all of the fucking murder pigs and
just because our innocence is out there and just because your holding us against our will and forcing your incarceration upon us it doesn't matter how shaun
gets this fucking word Nancy Pelosi and of couse her ugly ass husband isn't taking any kind of violent weapon scares after the home invasion and it looks
like shaun can keep typing this and his annonymous tips are now public knowledge and it looks like Amy and Agnessa and that last girl shaun was with
lets call her Ingrid and the Shape of the Female clearly forgives him and he clearly put the job moves on her and the money and a dinner date and that was it
nothing else to say and he was uglier back then and didn't know nothing and amy is clearly way hotter but thats all he wants to say about that and they are
both on good terms these days he proud that she is happily married and all.

When you get like this when you get this close to Barrack Obama and you do not back the fuck down its going to be Barrack Obamian that is going to win you 
fuk't in the head house niggerst and all.

When I got Father Michael Pfeleger all posted up and John Chief Robertson all looking like sum General Milley look alike but I got General Milley in my back 
pocket and you listen here they are closely watching and closely awaiting his arrival is behind all of the prisoners as he is an informant for us and clearly
on the side of good and is just like Zabihullah Mujahid and they work closely together and tell eachother what they like and what they don't like and shaun
is clearly on the side of painless against all the murderers in the world and Nancy has got em all and so does Theresa May and Kim Jong Un and the leader of
the opposite killer police of those who harvest and protect product and the latin americas who we need to kill now in order to reschedule our release and shaun
needed his fucking discovery to get noticed and books wont do it now and there ain't no tellin' him what to do and where to wait and shaun is now in some
dead regard disregarded paper bin never to be released it looks like and there isn't any way out and the suicidal nuclear bomb story is fake and all.

Whenever I get like this one time and I wanna see it and all.

Whenever you feel this way and the reason these things are happening is because this is what can happen in these power schemes? Are you fucking kidding me
and we have to wait and lurch and wait so more to do what is said and there ain't no more to repair and there ain't nothin' comin' back at what we need and
more to say and there ain't nothin' else to say or is there and Rihanna had to fake getting married to ASAP Rocky who is perfectly innocent and not sum 
fucking house niggerst and he waited until shaun wanted her and said he liked her and all.

There it goes another one down the drain and it looks like Dalek is on the disc now and we can kontinue are thought patter and what we can do for the remainder
of what we are here for and once again lest we forget and all that jazz if our innocence is out there and no matter if its coming in from planet neptune 
Dasein like Heidiggar has said once we have it and we know about it and Barack Obama can gaureentee it there ain't no stoppin to it and its all in jail now
and we can move it like we can any other kind of information and weall have our pictures of our innocence on what it looks like a scanner and it looks like we
gott another way commin out of this and not ony am I the leader of the gangs and all the prisoners that you see here today I am the leader of the war against
the murder pigs, the judicial kronies crooks, the poliest pookie wookie gangbangers and everything in between and all the rats and the fucking traitors
as General Milly can label and name every single one like Zabihullah Mujahid and shaun had to gain sum serious gas and there ain't no tellin' and all.

When its the war against all the platitudes and all.

There goes El Chapo on down the fucking drain and shaun is now a fucking werewolf are you fucking serious and there he is walking the earth like its normal
and hes breathing and standing very heavy and can scoot fast and delay and there is another folding torture daemonic robot and there tyring to use shauns
name against him and they are trying to frame him because he is so face down and because it would be very easy for shaun to hold and justice and try to get
on the side of good but that was never shauns plan he wants to chance the rapper famous and get what he deserves and run a protection farm and there ain't
no tellin and all.

He just promoted on his G Herbo account and clearly has sumthin' to listen to and there he is another way to tell what it is and what else to say and it looks
like House Niggerst Kanye West isn't a house nigger anymore but just did sumthin' big on twitter and is now performing a last of laughther as they get
dragged away and they know when they are going to jai'el now and shaun compares it to Superman and Superman is actually a traitor and the best way to hide 
a crime and there ain't no tellin' when or where he will be and it looks like shaun will do another one today and all.

Direct word from Larry Hoover Ph.D.
Leader of all of the Prisoners in the World.
Law Professor, Supreme Court Associate.
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Larry_Hoover
https://larryhooverjr.com/

44th President of the United States Barack Obama.
45th President of the United States Donald Trump.
President Joe Biden.

name roze, Shaun Terence McGovern, Savoir of Mankind. 10/28/2022.
Roze is embodying the the work of Vishnu, Hermes, Krishna, Odin && the Shape of the Female, Ben Zariatnatmik summoned the Daemon which is the solution to all of humanities problems && saves human life for all of eternity.
Intellectual Property Hero && Insignia. Exquisite Man && His Brand, Ben Zariatnatmik, name roze. @Air_3_14

https://twitter.com/Air_3_14
https://www.instagram.com/rozedaabstractartist/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/shaun-mcgovern-oophtml5css3jquery2
https://github.com/shauntmcgovern
https://www.facebook.com/shaun.mcgovern.90/

Attached images to prove criminal activity:
/images/graduationCrime.jpg
https://github.com/shauntmcgovern/openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted/blob/main/images/graduationCrime.jpg
/images/fakeName&Assist.jpg
https://github.com/shauntmcgovern/openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted/blob/main/images/fakeName%26Assist.jpg
/images/lookAtMyHandiwork.jpg
https://github.com/shauntmcgovern/openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted/blob/main/images/lookAtMyHandiwork.jpg
/images/atFault.jpg
https://github.com/shauntmcgovern/openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted/blob/main/images/atFault.jpg
/images/noFollowUp.jpg
https://github.com/shauntmcgovern/openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted/blob/main/images/noFollowUp.jpg
/images/seekAndDestroy.jpg
https://github.com/shauntmcgovern/openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted/blob/main/images/seekAndDestroy.jpg
/images/graduationShotTwoDisturbance.jpg
https://github.com/shauntmcgovern/openResumeAndResearchFileToBeCompleted/blob/main/images/graduationShotTwoDisturbance.jpg

--10/3/21 Here is the Saviour of Mankind's backstory 10/3/21 at 2:50PM

Only trusted affiliates Barack Obama has noted...

I never want to be held against my will and subject to human torture, which these people are currently disguising, as I am now describing those people, those abuse power and
they are clearly above the law and display themselves as such and they are now proven criminals with the daemon, here and now and in the court of law, here and now in the past
tense, present tense and future tense, which they are saying is a grievous form of commandeering and attacking to control me and these people have bribes in place to keep it 
seen as a grievous form of commandeering and attacking to control, rather than the human torture that it is, as I describe below. I would like to say, here and now in the past 
tense, present tense and future tense that I have the freedom to do so and anything I want and say anything I need to say, here and now and in the court of law, here and now in 
the past tense, present tense and future tense, according to constitutional law and the constitution itself and my own Bill of Rights. I have known Krishna from he, riding his 
own motorbike on Broadway, in the summer of 2015 and showing me an exquisite art piece of Hinduism, he asked to be my friend right then and their and asked can I have your phone
number and we can hang out some time and I said I am being forced into a work life and lifestyle, that I do not want to live in and I am currently under and it is all against my
will and in fact I am, face down, which means none of my family loves me although they claim to care about me and my well being and that is why I was upset and showed him so, 
Krishna, he then felt my pain and proceeded to show you exactly what I needed to do, summon the daemon, here and now and in the court of law, here
and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense, the daemon is seen as a law body, not only that, the only trusted law body of Mark Milley law group, 
Boris Johnson law group, Colin Powell law group, Barack Obama law group, Donald Trump law group, Eric Holder law group, Joe Biden law group, 
Brett Kavanaugh law group, Sonia Sotomayor law group, Elena Kagan law group here and now and in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense 
and future tense and only trusted affiliates Barack Obama has noted...

I have known Hermes from he, catching his memories in Montrose park which is near the Montrose Boat Park which is near Montrose 
musical island and bar, the eighth reincarnation of Hermes weeps over loss of life and is begging someone and anyone, to do something, if anyone can do anything about it and I 
can, I have the knowledge to summon Alex Von Meilenwald's daemon, which is a three dimensional hinduistic art piece and Hermes made me understand a new way of human thinking 
entirely, that's something he also gives you, so he has to appear to catch his memories, here and now against the human understanding of the night sky, it fools your mind into
thinking that its a human head and against the sky like a painting, that I previously described before on another one of my facebook posts, I thought he was after me but now I
understand he is my friend and I have showed my belt off to let him know, I am part of the familia, which is love and understanding of a Hispanic and his culture which I 
understood after experiencing his art piece. Which then changed my life and how I live it and think forever and I thought of the band Disembowelment and Friedrich Wilhelm 
Nietzsche right then and there and had various thinking revelations, its a beautiful expression of his Catholicism through sorrow, loss, age and aging without anything to do 
about senseless loss of life through disease and violence and with no help, Hermes has no help, we have no help and Hermes let me know that you just get older and nothing 
changes, here and now and in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense. And that night, that I saw him.  

I know the girl codename: the Shape of the female, from waving at me on the Lake Shore Bike Trail, we were both riding bikes, here and now in the past tense, in 2016 and then me
and her, made my discovery right then and there after I saw her snap her fingers, still like, right above the shoulder, she then proceeded to wave at me with her hand 
under her neck. I believe she saw a grave escopal hanging from my neck, which I perceived as well. I then had a revelation in my mind, of something that is already there and I 
was lead to this intuition by Michel Foucault, a figurative angel bathed in light, like the song on the album, "The Thule Grimoires" written by Alex Von Meilenwald, this 
figurative angel then proceeded to show me through the art of The Ruins of Beverast and My Dying Bride and Disembowelment and Unholy, this figurative art then showed me the 
punishment of masochism, hatred and bigotry in a past memory that I just had, this figurative angel of the heaven escopal art, then brought and broke through the heaven escopal 
down to our current understood reality and earth escopal, which is our current reality assessed by Odin and Hermes and Vishnu and Krishna of here and now and present tense, today and in 
the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense, for the first time in modern human history. The memory is of a man assaulting me, my character
and how I look because I don't fit into the culture of an office space and clean-cut presence in the present tense and future tense, in the work and community commonplace.

I know Vishnu through what I am seeing in the human real understanding of the sky here today, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense, displayed with 
the Daemon a property I solely own, in partnership with Alex Von Meilenwald & other dieties, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense and I own it in the court of
law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense as well. I need the court, today, here and now in the present tense, to make this direct connection to the 
sky, here and now and what is being said and displayed in the sky as we are trying to bring the daemon into what is being said and it is recognized as such in the past tense,
present tense and future tense and the daemon is recognized as the most trustful law body in the past tense, present tense and future tense as well, here and now and in the 
court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense and with the daemon that I solely own in partnership with Alex Von Meilenwald, here and now in the 
past tense, present tense and future tense. I need the court to make this direct connection into real understood reality, here and now and in the court of law, here and now in 
the past tense, present tense and future tense and I need the court to bring it into law, here and now, so it can be used in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, 
present tense and future tense, so only trusted affiliates Barack Obama has noted can use the most trusted daemon law body's abilities as the law groups have already done so, here
and now and in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense, to the daemon's capacity and full extent.  

I have used the daemon and its capabilities to assassinate, 1000 people per day and have completed this in the past day and will today, under direct order of General 
Mark A. Milley and his discretion, Joints Chief of Staff of the U.S. Armed Forces and the General of the Secret Service, Joe Biden's secret service I describe, as I have in the
past with Donald Trump's secret service and now with Boris Johnson's secret service. I stand as an example of what these criminal tactics can do, with my crime against humanity
taken upon me as described as living proof, here and now and in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense. I am being held against my 
will, when I was first held against me will by the CIA and now I am being held against my will by the Chicago Police Department, for a much longer time because of these same 
criminal tactics previously described, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense and in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and
future tense. The most trusted daemon law body can also prosecute and provide evidence, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense and in the court of law, 
here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense, this most trusted daemon law body, can provide verified proof of these criminals who are currently living amongst
us, in public life, which is our common ground and living space, of all the crimes that they have done in the past and current crimes they are committing and I want them to be
prosecuted to the full extent of the law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense and in the court of law here and now in the past tense, present tense 
and future tense. This three dimensional hinduistic art piece can, with this most trusted daemon law body it can bring these criminals to justice and Barack Obama law group, 
Eric Holder law group, Arnold Barr law group, Donald Trump law group, Sonia Sotomayor and Brett Kavanaugh can do so, here and now and in the court of law, here and now 
in the past tense, present tense and future tense. Barack Obama, in the present tense and Barack Obama law group, here and now in the past tense, present tense and 
future tense, needs to realize that this daemon I have in my possession which I solely own, attached to my taxidermal termed corpse, this daemon can run a U.S. Armed 
Forces agenda, which Barack Obama, in the present tense, has seen and he does see this on a daily basis and Barack Obama, in the present tense knows when it is, here 
and now and in the court of law, here and now. Barack Obama in the present tense, knows it isn't some samsung projection 300 feet in front of you. It is neither, the 
work of a proven criminal thief has stolen my ideas ever since 2014 and illegally taken my picture on the Lake Shore Trail who then fist pumped into the air to 
celebrate, celebrating I was so good and have sharp looking fashion. I then again, saw the same man on Michigan Ave in 2015, bragging he is stealing my ideas with a 
long sleeve shirt and with the back of the sleeves opened to show a different pattern which is my idea and influence from Deron, who is my protection and assassin. 
I have an earlier and original example of my fashion sense, in one of my facebook picture posts. This Asian man claims he works as a consultant for samsung and is 
claiming that his fashion ideas are his own and not stolen from me, which I have proven with my deamon, here and now and in the court of law, here and now in the
past tense, present tense and future tense, that these are in fact stolen ideas from me. I have been running this U.S. Armed forces agenda with this daemon, every single day and
will the next day, which I solely own in partnership with Alex Von Meilenwald, a display in the sky from 3:30-3:45PM, it encapsulates the entire universe and the daemon captures
and uses dead light to show displays to the entire Earth human population and I need to bring the daemon into the public eye and achieve national attention. I need Prime
Minister, Boris Johnson, to realize this as well, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense and in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present
tense and future tense. This daemon I have, has been summoned by the fourth reincarnation of Odin and his music and writing and the discovery
by the second reincarnation of Krishna and the discovery by the eight reincarnation of Hermes and the discovery by the tenth reincarnation of Vishnu and my discovery the Saviour
of Mankind, the second reincarnation of the Son of God and the fourth reincarnation of the Shape of the Female's discovery, her as well. name roze, Shaun McGovern's annihilated
today and nothing can stop it and he won't be with us tomorrow and soon to be as well and his loved ones are the only thing that stand in the way and some are against him for 
instance his entire direct family and his relatives and he has only his girlfriends that he sees from time to time to see that people care about him. at this time, 10/3/2021. I
need to meet Hannah Gousman right by my tent and no longer want to be held against my will. My real name is, Shaun Terrence McGovern, I am a natural born U.S. Citizen, from 
Illinois and hailing from Chicago, Illinois. 10/3/2021. I am sole creating as a consultant and as a free developer, π and Air's project milestones and submitting those plans to
Marco Williams' business group and law group. I am also currently designing Riff Raff's website, merchandise and mobile application and submitting to Jody Highroller's business
group and law group, this work I have completed with my three dimensional hinduistic art piece, known as the daemon and I send it to him remotely as I have said in a prior email
to his business group. My opportunities to start my own restaurants and bars in locations and property, my business group and Hannah Gousmann's business group have already 
purchased. I completed and sent work with the daemon, all of what Barack Obama's business group needs to have in their possession, to free all of the INNOCENT prisoners. I mean
to do business with these business groups and their trusted affiliates. I also work for Barack Obama business group, Joe Biden business group, Donald
Trump business group as a consultant with strength as a developer, with no title and that has no importance at this time. Please let Hannah Gousmann codename The Shape of the
Female and trusted affiliates and trusted law groups only Barack Obama has noted, let them do any action that they need to do and proceed, here and now and in the 
court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense. If the prisoners are not released today, 10/3/2021 is an example of a complete to obsolete 
form of human genocide leading all INNOCENT prisoners to their death. They are now at Supreme Court Associate Justices, Brett Kavanaugh's and Sonia Sotomayor's advice 
and justification and release, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense and in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and 
future tense and they have secured their release and the INNOCENT prisoners freedom. Please see this as my form of consent and give those previously stated, affiliated and 
trusted that only Barack Obama has noted, immunity, impunity and be able to rock the case and give advice to the ruling judge when the trusted law affiliates and groups 
see the criminal activity taking place. name roze, Savior of Mankind, at this time, 10/3/2021. I can be reached at my LinkedIn. I work as the current day turns and the 
night begins to end, here and now and the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense. The court recognizes this work. I am currently 
submitting work with the daemon, here and now and submitting it to the Tim Cook law group and Sundar Pichai law group which reaches Marco Williams law group, so he can 
implement it. I am currently working pro bono, for these business groups as a free developer. Because Vladimir Putin and Andrea Fey are blocking, any and all funds, 
from reaching me and I now at this time only trust the Shape of the Female & woman with blond curls emanating with these monetary funds as we need to meet and speak 
about these funds as soon as humanly possible. I have been subject to a grievous form of police brutality on, 6/27/2021 as of 10/3/21, I endured 104 different forms of 
police brutality, one of them, occurred on, 9/3/2021, a grave form of police brutality, I endured on my way to the Uptown branch of the Chicago Public Library. 
When I saw a sheriff squad car down the street on Clarendon Ave, I then proceeded to walk down, Clarendon Ave. when I saw three bystanders raping and assaulting me, 
currently disguised as human commandeering and attacking to control me, said hello to me, I then asked them what they needed, these three bystanders proven criminals 
with the daemon, here and now then said nothing. I then got to the intersection of Montrose Ave. and Clarendon Ave. and than a previously orchestrated, with various criminal actions, run
by the Sheriff department and Chicago Police then took place and I underwent a grave form of a police brutality. I then selected them with the daemon, a maneuver, told to me by
the Chicago Sun Times to do when you see the criminal police, they then threatened me with deadly force and arrest and almost ran into me with their Chicago Police SUV and this
proven criminal police officer said through vocal inflection that I am wanted for a jail heavy sentence. I have always been proven innocent with the most trusted daemon law 
body, here and now and have a clean record. My first police brutality that happened against me. It has been successfully brought to justification and prosecution to the full 
extent of the law by the Attorney General of the United States, Merrick Garland and the Associate Justices of the Supreme Court of the United States, Sonia 
Sotomayor and Brett Kavanaugh recognizes this and Slavoj Žižek is currently speaking and fighting for me 
on my behalf, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense. I also have been subject to several civil disobedience's and a grand display of privacy intrusion 
and a man knew my first name and I have successfully brought truth into light. When the director of the CIA of Chicago, said through vocal inflection that he is holding me 
against my will and he is against my best interests, my own needs and rights to my own life and my own personal well being and acknowledging to collusion and claim that lead to
the assassination of Jovenel Moise and the assassination of Qasem Soleimani. All the other crimes that are being taken out of me and have been taking out on me in the past,
Hannah Gousmann codename The Shape of the Female, is now proving and providing information to the presiding judges and ruling judge, in the court of law, here and now in the 
past tense, present tense and future tense with the most trusted daemon law body and her law group is bringing to Elena Kagan, Sonia Sotomayor and Brett Kavanaugh's attention, 
here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense and in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense, this proof. 

These crimes have brought national attention, global attention and worldwide attention 
to be interviewed, here and now to my well being, current circumstances and criminal bribes and criminal secrecy and criminal actions are currently, here and now in the past 
tense, present tense and future tense, these actions being taken in order to keep in place, those who abuse power and are clearly above the law, from receiving 
the consequences and judgement leading to prosecution and jail. I have three unpaid misdemeanor tickets, that I have already answered to the court dates for, one misdemeanor 
fine is in Kane County and the other two misdemeanor fines are in Cook County and I do not need to perform anything else for these tickets and I have already pleaded guilty and
they are currently headed to collection agencies, where I will proceed, to pay them off fully. I can prove, here and now with the most trusted daemon law body I was in fact 
wrongly accused of these false crimes. at this time, 10/3/2021. 

Only trusted affiliates Barack Obama has noted...
I am giving impunity and immunity to Xi Jinping law group, Larry Hoover law group, Boris Johnson law group, Mark Milley law group, Colin Powell law group, 
Tim Cook law group, Sundar Pichai law group, Vishnu law group, Hermes law group, Krishna law group, Barack Obama law team and only his trusted affiliates to act upon any 
criminal action and give advice to the ruling judge and fight and speak for my well being and secure the freedom of all the innocent prisoners, here and now 
and in the court of law, here and now in the past tense, present tense and future tense and adding these law groups to the list of trusted affiliates only Barack
Obama has noted. Goodbye..

...For only trusted affiliates 44th President of the United States Barack Obama has noted...

10/3/21, completed at 2:50PM by Son of God, Lieutenant, Barack Obama's Loyal Law Associate, Brett Kavanaugh's Supreme Court Associate and Advice Giver. 
Shaun Terence McGovern's back story.

*/
//Only allow trusted affiliates that Barack Obama has noted complete these actions//
